title,selftext,subreddit
Quick message from the moderator team,"Yesterday, we've seen a very large spike of homophobic comments / posts in this subreddit. Although we do our best to look at all posts, sometimes some posts will slip through the cracks. We'd just like to remind you to continue utilizing the report button if you see a post that you think violates the rules. 

Additionally, I'd like to also remind everyone of our zero-tolerance policy for homophobia, even if it's a ""joke"". **It is a bannable offense and you will not be unbanned.** 

Have a great day.",gay
That's what friends are for.,,gay
😏,,gay
Just saw thisnon twitter and thought reddit could relate.,,gay
What do I do now?,"I am posting this from a new account cause I don't want my friends to see it. I am 52. My husband , with whom I have been for 23 years left me two years ago over some young guy he fell for. I was devastated and crashed on the inside. I was so hurt and I still am. Driven by insane rage I went to their home after they got married, 10 months ago and I did a huge scene which ended up with them calling the police. I was taken to a cell.  When I went out I was told they hadn't pressed charges against me. Then I went home and tried to hang myself. I was saged by a huge coincidence when a friend of mine that lives in the flat over me heard me come home and stopped by to see me( I don't lock the door during the day and I didn't think to do it then). I was then forced to do therapy and some stupid anti depressants that have 0 effect. I have changed 4 therapists but things still seem as desperate as they were when I first started. They keep telling me some lame clichès or turning every statement I make into a question about ""how did that make you feel"" or some other shit. I feel so broken and alone. How could he just leave me like that, like everything we had meant nothing. And I still love him so fuckin much. And he is out there happy with this new guy and I am thrown away like rubbish. I am so sad honestly.",gay
I‘m so terrified by the president of Brasil,"To all gay people living in Brasil, I‘m so sorry for you guys! 
I hope you make it out of there! ",gay
strength,"My sexuality has ruled me. It’s determined every decision of my life and I feel so fed up with it. I’m so jealous and angry that I wasn’t born like a normal person. I didn’t ask to be born this way, or born at all. Life would be so enjoyable if you could just choose who and what you were attracted to. I feel like I’m cursed to have a difficult life caused by something that, in reality, should never matter.

I know deep down that if I tell my family who I truly am that I’ll be rejected. Even if I’m not rejected, I’ll still live an uncomfortable life. I’m jealous of so many people on this sub that have the strength to not let one small simple feature of themselves define them. I wish I had that sort of strength. Maybe this is a cry for help (although this isn’t the first time I’ve considered taking my life), but how do I find the strength? Family is everything to me, and to have that disappear as a consequence of being who I truly am just doesn’t seem worth it. I don’t know what I expect from doing this",gay
Gay confusion,"Hi everybody:) I wanted to expose to you some of my doubts. I am 21 years old, male, probably gay; well, I always sorta knew I was gay, but never accepted it till these last months. So I started to come out to some friends, and I plan to tell my other friends and my family and slowly trying to live it ok. Now that someone knows it I admit I feel better, with them I feel more spontaneous and I know there is someone I can count on if I have some difficulties.
BUT: since I came out I started having new doubts about me: I have never had sexual gay experiences, don't know about romantic attraction; sometimes I am afraid that all of this is only in my head. It happens sometimes that maybe on online chats or gay apps someone send their dick pic (usually not really requested) and when this happens it usually cuts off any sort of excitement. Some days I think I like someone, other days I don't know what to think anymore.
The question is: is this confusion normal? (probably the post itself is confused, i am sorry) has anyone ever felt something like this?
Thank you in advance:)
PS I am writing this post on mobile, I hope it will be readable when posted
PPS I don't know why the post is marked as NSFW",gay
[NSFW] paint me like one of your French girls,,gay
Today was a gay day and i saw a gaynbow in the sky.,,gay
Whose your biggest celebrity crush?,"Mine is Chris Pratt, he’s just so damn hot. Muscular, handsome, funny he’s got the lot 😍 ",gay
Im writing a gay romance book but I don't know what to call it.,"[https://www.wattpad.com/648248154-not-sure-what-to-call-it-help-me-with-the-title](https://www.wattpad.com/648248154-not-sure-what-to-call-it-help-me-with-the-title)

&amp;#x200B;

I really need Help with the title.",gay
"Rules is rules, fellers",,gay
I have heared stories of gay peple being rejected makes me feel sad. So here is a BIG hug for all of you❤💓❤,"Love you all
☁😘😘☁😘😘☁
😘😘😘😘😘😘😘
😘😘😘😘😘😘😘
☁😘😘😘😘😘☁
☁☁😘😘😘☁☁
☁☁☁😘☁☁☁

",gay
Gays r gay,,gay
Older Gay guy here that wants to give younger Gay guys some reflections and thoughts on trauma and how I was able to overcome it.,"Hey all, now keep in mind I chose the word reflection and not advice  because I don’t want to sound like a preachy know it all.   I had a rough coming out.  In my family being Gay was not accepted.  All the Gay characters on TV were dying if AIDS, and the only message I received was that being Gay meant you were going to miserable, contract HIV and quickly.  I knew that I was not in an environment where coming out was safe.  I also have older parents, that were born in other countries that they fled because there was no way for them to make any money in those countries.  They both held on to some really old world values.  It simply was not safe to come out.   My older brother, also shared the anti Gay mentality.  

As a child and a teenager I was in the closet.  If any of you have been in the closet because you feared for your safety or feared that your parents would not love you, that you would be cast aside, that other guys would bully you, you have gone through trauma.  Think about it for a second.  At a young age, for the sake of survival you create a false identity.  Character of yourself.  This is not something any Gay person should be ashamed of.  It something that you do to survive.  Many Gay men create a false identity and for many, lying becomes so normal—because it is the to survive. 

I am going to say this again.  Having to be in the closet, making a false identity because you fear abandonment from the people who you depend on for survival is a very deep form of trauma.  As a child and a teenager you are supposed to feel safe, and protected not as if you are in danger.  That is a traumatic experience to go through.

My coming out story was really sad.  I didn’t have a whole world of support.  I didn’t speak to my mom for ten years, my brother told me I was disgusting and I basically left for college disowned, on my own, and tossed to the world without help from the people who were supposed to protect me.  Again trauma

In my twenties and most of my thirties dating was tough.  For my generation, most of the people were trauma survivors as well.  Many Gay men have gone through the experience I have, and that trauma does not go away easily for most.  It can be rough to navigate intimate relationships when you are living with the trauma of having had to create an alternate identity for most of your life.  Lying subconscious becomes normal.  Being yourself becomes shameful and those are the wounds that many Gay men live with.

My cultural upbringing made me not seek help for the trauma I survived.  I was always thought therapy, mental health services were BS.  Therapist don’t know what they are talking about.  It was weak and self indulgent to go to therapy.

Therapy is not self indulgent, and super important for people who have gone through trauma.  There are some studies that show trauma changes you not just mentally, but physiologically.  I know that not everyone can afford therapy and that is unfortunate, but if you have the resource and identify as GLBT know that you most likely survived a type of trauma.  It’s not your fault, it’s the screwed up worlds fault for the system of discrimination it relies on to make one group feel superior than another.  There is nothing wrong with you if you are Gay. 

Go to therapy if you have the resources.  Work on your mental health and healing.  Be compassionate with other GLBT people.  If you cannot afford therapy, then go to the library and find books about surviving trauma and do the work to make yourself mentally sound.  Many Gay people are masters of cultivating the outside, their physical selves, their looks.  Please also remember to do the other kind of work.  Your mental health is important as a survivor of trauma.

Therapy really helped me, and I wish I would have been able to do it sooner.  I wish I would have challenged the cultural upbringing about therapy being a waste of money or self indulgent.   Also learn to forgive.  I forgive my family because they were just doing what they were taught.  My immigrant parents suffered way more than I ever did, in imaginable ways and for their generation—-you didn’t talk about, you lived with it. Remember to work on your mental health is important and make that part of your wellness routine.

I am happy about how it’s getting easier for the youth.  I became a public school teacher to help stop bullying and to be an out role model for kids.   Within the 12 years I have been teaching professionally I have seen the improvements, and the world getting better.  It makes me hopeful.  This younger generation does not seem to discriminate like the generation did when I was in school.  It does get better, it’s been getting better and I have hopes that it will continue towards that route.

",gay
Obsessed with boyfriend having sex with his ex,"My biggest fantasy is watching my boyfriend get fucked by his hot hockey-player ex.

To the point where my bf gets upset and angry with me.

It all comes back to the time my bf cheated on my with his ex. 7(!!) years ago.

My bf doesn't want to bang him again, event tough i have asked him over and over. 

I want to forget the whole thing, but every time I get horny this fantasy pops up in my head. 

&amp;#x200B;

Ive tried to change focus over to other guys fucking my bf with me, but my bf dosn't want any one else but me.

&amp;#x200B;

Any tips on how to get my bf keen on the ex? Or others in general?

What to do? 

&amp;#x200B;",gay
"Why I can't go to a gay sauna even though I want to, I need your input and advice.","here's the reasons why I can't go to a gay sauna even though I want to.

READ CAREFULLY.


- I'm unattractive and I'd get stared at in a bad way and nobody would wanna do anything sexual as I know they have glory holes and people next to me in the gloryholes would see my face and he would think ""I feel sorry for the guy who's sucking his dick""

- I'm not muscular, Most things i've seen on gay saunas are pictures of muscular men and I'd feel unwelcome.

- I'm thin i'd feel weird among muscular men and the odd one out

- I'd get bullied for my body for me being skinny.

All in all I think me being among muscular men I'd get made fun of and that would piss me off big time, Now I'm not a twink but my body is of a twink, But I'm not muscular nor am I a ""pretty boy"" or a ""douchebag"" and me not looking like them and having the body like them would really fuck with my head/mind and make me wanna be that way and that's now how I wanna be.



",gay
The most romantic night of my life,"I just wanna share because it was so special. 

My friends and I decided to go to a corn maze on Friday night. This guy, let's call him Ben, was a friend of a friend and he started to hang out with us since last November, and of course he came along to the corn maze. He's 100% straight...no doubt about it...but oh man he's soooo handsome and dreamy. If you don't believe me, you can ask the girls in my group. All of them were trying to get a chance with him. Ben and I became really fast friends on the first day we met. I can feel there was definitely a special connection between us. We get each other so well despite only knowing him for less than 1 year, and I'm slowly becoming his best friend in the group. Even Jess, our mutual friend, thought we were friends long before he came to this area. 

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, so after corn maze, my friends were lame and planned to go home. I told Ben I wanted to explore more of the farm and asked him if he wanted to join me. I wasn't expecting much because he has gone off the radar for a long time; I don't know if our friendship has changed. He was dating one of the girls from our group, and they broke up just recently. Maybe he didn't think it was a good time to start hanging out with us again, or maybe he thinks he needed the time to heal..I'm not sure. But corn maze was the first time I got to see him in 5 months. I was so glad that he agreed to come with. 

&amp;#x200B;

""Yea, of course, anything with you!"" Ben replied to my request. I don't know..I felt loved in that instance; no one has ever said anything like that to me (not even my best friend). So we told the group that we're gonna stay for a little while but they can go home.

&amp;#x200B;

So it was just me and Ben, and that was the first time that I got to experience what it feels like to ""go on a date"" with a guy. Mind you, I'm still very deep in the closet...so being with this handsome guy one-on-one was certainly something special. The farm was soo beautiful that night.. his blue eyes under the lights...his smile...I felt like I was in heaven. 

&amp;#x200B;

There was this big slide on top of a hill in this farm. Ben and I went on it. I went in front of him and he then followed. At the bottom of the slide, he unexpectedly gave me a hug from the back...not just a casual one. It was long and intimate. I glanced over my shoulder. I can't believe his beautiful face is so close to me. Everything felt so right. 

&amp;#x200B;

We spent the rest of night just talking and drinking. He told me about how his ex-gf and him didn't work out, and he was sorry that he had gone off the radar because of work...but he promised he's putting his life back together, and will make an effort in seeing us more often. I then drove him home. 

&amp;#x200B;

I know some of you might think this is nothing but sad. I know. I understand I'll never have a chance with this straight guy ever in my life. Just seeing him on Tinder randomly hooking up with random girls breaks my heart because I can be that somebody. But life is just so cruel. I afraid if I get too close to him I might get hurt and disappointed. But at this point. I'm happy that he's in my life. I'm happy I got to know him. 

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Just told my friend I liked him,"Context: 
I'm gay, my friend knows this, all of them do. I've liked him for a pretty long time. I just think I have a natural attraction to him because hes just a really nice guy. Btw I'm in high school, grade 12, never been in an actual relationship before (dated a girl for a month 3 years ago before I knew I wasnt bi) 

Today my crush told me he likes this girl and it crushed me. I tried to give him advice and shit because he knows she likes someone else a lot. Basically I ended up just telling him I liked him. He responded really well, he was very nice and made sure I knew he wasnt gonna stop being my friend. The thing is, i feel like I'll never find someone like him. I've never liked someone as much as I liked him and idk how to get over the fact that i have no chance with him at all. Every single guy ive liked has been straight and it sucks. I only like people I'm friends with too so that's an added bonus. I'm going to cherish our friendship but I really want a boyfriend. I feel like I wont find someone who I get along with as well as him. Even my friend thought he liked me because of how nice he was essentially to me. 

Has anyone been in similar situations? Did you end up with anyone? Like I need hope because right now I feel kinda shitty that I lost a potential partner. I just feel like I'm gonna be stuck in a cycle of liking people but never being liked back. How do you stop liking straight guys???",gay
My Coming Out Experience,"Hi fam,

I hope you're all having an amazing day. Just thought I'd share my Coming Out experience for those out there who may need a bit of positivity or just want to hear my story. Sending love and light always x

Watch: [https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kvF2fZYg8wI&amp;feature=youtu.be](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kvF2fZYg8wI&amp;feature=youtu.be)

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
What should I chose?,"I really love my mom, I also love my friends and my hometown a lot. Imagining being away is so hard for me. But I hate the way society is towards gay people here and how the laws are too. I have to chose between 2 things, both of which mean a lot to me. And I don't know what to chose- I either leave my mom and my (few) friends or stay single all my life. It's such a huge and hard decision.Moving will take years of effort but at least I will be able to be myself. But so far away from home and many people I love. I don't know what to do.",gay
Does anyone have an issue with fissures?,"I had a surgery for HPV when I was 18 and ever since Ive just had issues (10 years on).  It's as if I have scar tissue from acute occurrences that have compromised the area a bit.  If Im even mildly dehydrated theyll come on so its a massive balancing act.  Nitrate cream seems to help but doesnt do anything about that scar tissue.  I can still bottom so it's not a major problem yet - it just adds a whole nother level of gritting my teeth until I adjust, but it rules out repeat sessions in a short time (which sucks).

Any advice?  Any possibility that surgical intervention may help - or will it only exacerbate the problem as it did the first time around?",gay
Some gay books reccomendations,"Hey, after lurking in comments and stuff on here I thought I'd finally chime in with a post of my own, and reccomend everyone some gay fiction that I like because honestly good books with gay characters are really hard to come across, so here's a couple of my favourites.  


What If Its Us- Written by Becky Albertalli and Adam silvera this book follows two boys (Arthur and Ben) who meet up by accident in a post office. Both being believers in the universe, they take a shot at dating each other with a string of failed dates to follow.   


Black Wings Beating- Written by Alex london this book is set in a fantasy world where humans train eagles to fight and live alongside them. Kylee longs to leave the village she lives in but is trapped by the debt her father left after his death and her brother Brysen just wants to be a champion. When Brysens boyfriend lands himself in trouble, he and Kylee go on a mission to save him.   


More than this- Written by patrick Ness, this book is about a boy who dies and wakes up in a stark afterlife with no clue of how he got there or how to get out.   


History is all you left me- By Adam silvera. After Griffins ex boyfriend, Theo, dies before he can reconcile with him, Griffin is left struggling through the stages of grief without him. This one is definitely a personal favourite of mine, due to the sheer emotion and thought put into it plus the subtle twist between first and second person in between chapters is done fantastically and really helps paint the story.   


Simon Vs the homo sapiens agenda- Becky Albertalli. This is the book that the film Love, Simon was based off of! if you havent heard of that yet though, I'm still here to follow up with a summary. The book follows Simon, a closeted teen who starts emailing another closeted teen from his school anonymously. Really I'm trying not to accidentally spoil stuff because i've read this book so many times it just blurs, but its fun to guess who the identity of Blue actually is!  


Now i know i only reccomended gay male books here but thats because I havent really read any f/f stories yet. However I do know becky albertalli wrote a book called the upside of unrequited that is an f/f. I havent read it but i hear its good, so check that out! ",gay
A bit paranoid,"I just feel like I need to talk to someone. 

I'm a lesbian. It's been that way for a long time. Growing up in a homophobic family in the South in a Republican neighborhood doesn't mix well. I have a gay cousin and she had a lot of history with them. I haven't gotten in contact with her since I don't have her number. 
Anyways, it's been something I've hidden my whole life and away from my family. Growing up, I would pretend to say I liked a boy or some boy band guy, so my parents wouldn't get suspicious. I was always attentive to women. No, I'm not going through a phase or whatever. I feel an actual liking to girls and girls only. Men never interested me,nor was I ever attracted to them in any way.I just never showed it because I didn't want any backlash or complaining.

I haven't come out to my parents, but that's the least of my worries. I'm more focused on my GPA/school and other stuff. I've said that I was bisexual, but that was because I was holding back. Instead of facing the truth, I refused to listen and made exceptions. Like a ""I had to like guys somehow so my parents won't kill me"" Not anymore.I wasn't accepting my true feelings and was going through a very confusing time, especially with my parents (who I don't have a good relationship with and they refuse to have family counseling because I'm ""the only one with a problem"" Not them apparently). I've only told a few friends and very little certain family members since I trust them more. I've come clean and accepted my sexuality.  (Fun fact, I would pretend to hate gays to impress my dad, but also so they wouldn't suspect I was gay when I was a jaded and denial child. Biggest mistake ever) 

My dad is a bigoted and tryhard bastard. He likes to say he hates gays to boost his ego and fragile masculinity. He's nothing but a coward, as I've seen right through him as I grew older. If anything, he's a sheep in wolfs clothing. He caused a scene at a mall on my mother's birthday shortly after my uncle died, because he saw two women holding hands. He made her cry and played victim ( he thinks no one ever listens to his opinions) and told me to shut up when I tried defending her. She then scolded at me for the way I talked to him during that horrot fest. All I said there was nothing wrong with that to him when he was talking about how disgusting it was seeing a lesbian couple. Then shit hit the fan. 
I was at first more worried about how heartbroken my mother was from that. Then as days went on, I started to become a little paranoid on how my dad would react to me being gay. Which would not end well. My mother would be in a state of shock, and my family would go berserk. Majority of them are homophobic as well. 

I've only come to my friends at school, the only place I feel comfortable in, and I even joined an LGBT club there as an outlet. My parents don't know, but my sister does and a few other family members I trust who know I'm gay. 

 I've been emotionally abused as said by one of my friends from what they've heard, been put on the spot, or felt little to no support. And it's still like this. I'm 17 and has been looking for a job and has been applying and gotten denied 20 times. There was one place that called me, but my mother made me cancel it due to her saying she ""couldn't afford to drive me"" there. Mind you, I am wanting to get a license, but my parents haven't been teaching me like they said they would and I don't even know how to park a car or go into a highway. I asked them if I could just get classes because they don't seem to be going by their own word or ""parent taught"" driving program. Of course, they said it was too expensive and they keep saying they will teach me. It's been 12 weeks and nothing came about. 

During this timeframe,, I've been contemplating on drinking and smoking my sorrows away and just not wanting to exist anymore. I feel like I'm a burden to my parents and family with no purpose. Of course, I don't drink or smoke even when the thoughts eat at me because I know I'll only be causing more pain to myself and others, this not solving anything. I'm doing anything in my power to stay headstrong. I'm kind of being my ""own therapist"" since they stopped taking me. Listening to love songs, running miles everyday, talking to friends and laughing with them, and not to mention just watching old cartoons from when I was a kid like Dexter's Laboratory and Powerpuff Girls. Just anything I could do. Those thoughts still haunt me, and I'm always currently fighting them as I go. 

I just wanted to say, how can I come out to them at one point (because I know eventually they'll find out) and has anyone had any similar experiences? 

Thank you

",gay
Naruto speaks out,,gay
No romantic luck,"I'm in 10th grade and I go to a school with a lot of openly gay students. I came out about two years ago and dated someone soon after, who dumped me about three months later. Since then I've had a crush on and been rejected by six boys. I deeply want to date someone, not just because I'm a horny teenager or anything of that sort, but I genuinely want to be loved by someone. It's the biggest pit in my heart. My friends all tell me I'm pretty, as well as people I'm not close friends with, and I don't want to come off as vain but I don't think I'm ugly, so I'm not sure what's wrong with me and that's fed into a lot of paranoia about myself. It's tanked my self esteem. I'm not sure what to do, it's one of those problems you I can't solve myself, all I can do is hope eventually someone likes me.",gay
We went as Sexy Dementors this Halloween,,gay
Inability to communicate with guys because of dating apps,"I don’t think I learned how to communicate with other gays properly when I first came out and it has had a really  negative effect on my relationships/encounters with other gay men.

My decent into being a gay man started out with Grindr when I was sixteen and that was the only way i knew how to talk to other gays. The years went by and so did the swings of gratification from strangers and the self induced self hatred from the rejection . After losing track of how many men I’ve hooked up with , it became routine to use these apps even though it made me feel like shit after being on there for years. Though I would have rather felt like shit because men used me for sex , rather than to feel that empty void of being alone.

I am turning 22 next month and I haven’t had a good stable relationship yet. And I think my lack of ability to communicate with other men in person has played a big role in that. Besides this being a factor, the guys that I have managed to organically meet at bars and parties haven’t seemed to work out because apparently monogamy is dead in the gay community and the only thing people want is sex. I am personally so tired of being treated as a sexual object rather than a person, I feel like I have so much more to give than that but I can’t find the means. 

Does anyone have any advice that could possibly help me overcome these factors ?",gay
Hey Guys! Made this video as a class project to talk about my struggles with my sexuality and understanding where exactly I fall (bisexual vs gay). Please check it out and let me know what you think!- The Love Me Right Remix (Lyric Video),,gay
questions inside.,"I’m a 18 y/o male who is a try everything once kind of guy. 
I’m close to testing my sexuality and seeing if I’m bi or not. I have a nice boy my age set up waiting for our schedule to align. 
I will be topping. 

Writing this post to get ANY type of advice from you all that would be wonderful. 
General tips welcomed. 
Sexual tips welcomed. 
Good things to keep in mind tips welcomed. 
Cautionary tips welcomed. 
Aftermath tips welcomed. 
Overcoming initial first time with same gender shyness advice welcomed. 
Stories even and Anything helpful welcomed. 
Thank you all",gay
Break up - Big mistake?,"  

I just broke up with my boyfriend after a 2,5year relationship.  
The past months I was so committed and sure, that it’s the right decision, now I don’t know if I made a big mistake.

&amp;#x200B;

We had almost nothing in common. He was interested into soccer, politics and cooking. I’m into gaming and adrenaline stuff.   
We barely had any topics to talk about. The only thing we did regularly together, was play Pokemon go, what made me kind of sad, because it was the only thing.  
Sure, from time to time, we went to the cinema or bowling, but that wasn’t that often, that I did consider this in my decision.

&amp;#x200B;

He was 8 years older than me, but u can tell for sure he was totally in love until the last second.  
My love faded over time. After the first year he gained like 45lbs, what stopped the desire of having sex with him.   
In addition to that, he was a strong smoker. Over the time he had 3 attempts to stop, but he didn’t make it. I tried to tolerate the smell, but it still grosses me out. Bad breath, the smell of the skin…

&amp;#x200B;

We didn’t live together – I stayed for the weekends. But when I was there, he cooked and made the dishes without complaining once.  
He always made sure, that I wasn’t cold or thirsty. I often told him, that I didn’t need that kind of special treatment, but he insisted, because he was happy, when he was able to make me happy.

&amp;#x200B;

I don’t know why I was unable to keep loving him, although he was such a caring and love worthy guy. I feel like an idiot for breaking his heart and leaving him in tears.   
In the end I wasn’t able to stand his love without feeling guilty for not loving him back. 

I’m pretty sure, that I won’t find a second person, who will love me, that pure.  
Was it the right decision to leave him, only to try finding someone I do love back? 

&amp;#x200B;

P.S. Sorry for my bad English ",gay
"The Oscar winning documentary on gay/lesbian films 'The Celluloid Closet' is on Youtube...if you haven't seen it, settle in",,gay
Sao Paulo Fashion Week,,gay
Help,How does one tell if a guy is bi?,gay
Kill me,"I can hear my neighbor having sex and I'm super fucking uncomfortable. Every couple seconds I hear her moan and I want to die.  

Anyways, something that actually relates to the Big Gay: I was at Payless today getting some sick shoes, and my mom pointed at a big ass hairbow for little kids and was like ""Oh man, I bet you'd love that"" as a joke, so I replied with ""I may be gay, but I'm not a queen."" And I don't think I've made her laugh harder tbh. ",gay
Last night I posted here and I'm so sorry,"I deleted the post since but I was the guy who was ""drunk and thought was gay"" well I'm not drunk anymore. When I arrived home I just opened reddit slapped in ""gay"" then posted away, I wasn't even thinking straight (ha puns, am I rite?). For some reason I included a picture of me which I took mid depression/eating disorder 2 years ago because I thought somebody will pity me. I was supposed to write like a life story shit, but I was so messed up I settled for ""I'm drunk.I might be gay. I'm 22. Here is a picture. Somebody love me."" 

Sorry again. ",gay
Gay asian men being jaded on Tinder.,Today I messaged an asian guy on Tinder and the conversation was going well until he asked me if I was a rice queen. I asked him if he was a potato queen. There was silence and then he deleted me. I honestly don't get how some asian men can be so jaded. I get that there are men out there who like to use asian men but I'm not one of them. Have I dated asian men in the past? yes but I only date men who I have chemistry with and whom I find physically as well as their personality attractive. There is a bid difference between fetishizing someone and dating them only because of their race not caring about anything else and dating someone only when you find that there is a connection. If you as an asian man you ask that question on a first date or via text it's very offensive.,gay
Heads up. NSFW question,"I’m a horny 18 y/o male who seems to be ready to test my sexuality. My guess is I’m bi. 
I have a nice set up ready to go just waiting for a day we both are able. 
I will be topping and would like ANY advice from you all that would be wonderful. 
Maybe even stories ya know just helpful things. 
Sex tips are very much welcomed. 
Cautionary tips are also very welcomed. 
Thanks a ton ! 
",gay
This picture represents me eating Chick-fil-A for the first time but i realized i was chick fil gay so i cant eat there but it taste so good so whatever.,,gay
I went into London in full drag with my boyfriend,"So I've been out for 3 full years now as bisexual, and the past year and a half I've become exponentially more comfortable in myself, and I had the idea to go into London with my best friend and get stuff to get in drag, then I tried to do my own makeup and went into London with my boyfriend in full drag.

It's not supposed to be a serious attempt because drag isn't something I feel is a part of me, but I'm so happy that now I feel comfortable enough in myself to do something like this and not care at all.

&amp;#x200B;

If anyone is interested, the last video is [here.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tyLioAQc8jo)",gay
Whatre some good questions to hold onto for a first date?,"Suffice to say I dont really date that much.  When I have in the past I probably tend to talk just a bit too much - primarily due to nerves. Obviously they have to be tailored to the situation, but whatre some general questions that you should make sure to ask on a first date?",gay
A new location,Now that my plans to move to Ireland some day have fallen apart I am looking for new ideas for countries. I wanted Ireland because it is an English-speaking country so I wouldn't have to learn a new language but I guess I will have to. So I am looking for suggestions for new countries to look up.. The requirements are that it is 1. An EU country and 2. Not homophobic. Please help me with suggestions.,gay
"Alright boys, time to get myself a man!",,gay
"They're funny, they're smart, they're everything you could ever look for. They're","straight 
🙃
.",gay
Is it possible to be completely loyal as a bi person,"I've thought about marriage a lot, and how as a bi person I'd have to essentially choose one gender over the other, or manage to find someone who's okay with occasionally hooking up with someone of another sex. It genuinely worries me that I wouldn't be able to be completely loyal by the nature of who I am, at the very least I'd have desires. How can you grapple with having to commit yourself to one sex when you're attracted to both?",gay
My country is at the brick of electing the most despicable homophobic and racist politician. I'm scared.,"I'm sorry if this falls under rule 6, have it removed if so. I'm just scared.

What kind of advice would you guys recommend for situations like this?",gay
Do gays still meet outside social networks?,"I'm 34 and my bf 41.
We've been together for 11 years, and we found ourselves talking about ""new gay generations"". 
We talked about how now all gays meet through grindr or other apps, and what they're missing out.
Is it really how "" new"" gays meet now? Like...all of them?
My Lil sis is bi and she told me that basically the reason behind it is that it's just ""easier"" , but when I asked her if she ever tried to meet someone irl she said no.
So easier compared to what?
I get that hook ups are definitely easier through an app, but ppl looking for ""love"" ...is grindr/facebook/whatever really the way you fall in love with someone?",gay
Nothing Gay about this post...just depressing and sad.,"On Thursday my ex-wife had to put down my 9 year old boxer. I left her there with my wife and sons when I moved out because my sons needed her more than I (although it killed me to do so). A few weeks ago she started having seizures and they never got better. Tuesday night after a seizure she lost her eyesight. When I went over to see her on Wednesday she couldn't even get up. Usually she was at the door before I even walked in because she knew the sound of my car. I laid on the floor with her and held her for an hour while I sobbed. 

She was my baby girl. She always slept snuggled into my back. When excited or feeling exceptionally loving she snorted like a little piggy. Anytime we said nub nub her nub of a tail would give a little shake. When I sat on the couch she would immediately jump up and sit next to me with her arm resting on me like a boss. Naturally I would pet the fur off her and shed let me. If she knew you were taking a picture of her, she refused to look at the camera. We would assure her we weren't stealing her soul, but it didn't matter. She just wouldn't look. 

Two nights in a row I've cried myself to sleep, knowing she'll never greet me at the door or lick my face until I had to beg her to stop (she couldn't hold her licker 😊).

Rest in peace Lucy. I miss you dearly and always will. ",gay
Torrents invite,"Hi all

Does somebody perhaps have a www.gay-torrents.org invite they are willing to share?

Rgds
T :) ",gay
I Can't Believe How Gay I Feel!," Long story short, I am a 54 yo closeted Gay male who identified as Bi since my teens, and who has dealt with all the internalized homophobia generated by growing up when I did in an intensely religious household in the south.

 About 2 years ago, I realized my porn consumption was about 90% Gay and on the rare occasions that I came watching straight porn, it didn't feel right, so I decided to focus all my sexual
energy on guys. (I am not particularly relationship 
oriented and am over glory holes and random hookups, so we are talking mostly porn, cams, and some phone sex, though I am looking at Grindr once in a while).

 Anyway, I have had some interesting changes in my interests since I focused exclusively on my homosexual feelings. Previously, my main fantasy with men was getting topped by clean-cut,  athletic guys (black and Mediterranean guys especially), but now I am fascinated by smooth euro boys with hot bubble butts and love watching romantic deep kissing and fast forward to the analingus and fucking scenes.

 I also am more receptive to gay stories in Media than I was previously. I watched all of Game of Thrones recently and was totally into the guys and gay scenes.

 Maybe this year I can find a fuck buddy or two!
",gay
Turn offs?,Curious to know what turn offs people might have early on in dating someone or when they stay over.,gay
Guy mislead his age; and i have a date tomorrow.,"I (22) met this guy on Grindr and his profile said he was 28. He looks 28 and I thought he was hot so we've been talking for a few days and have a date tomorrow.

He told me that he had deleted his Grindr before the first date. 

Tonight, he tells me that he's 35. I asked him why his Grindr said 28; and within the minute, he edits the info.

So, I've caught him in two lies; his age, and that he had deleted Grindr. I never directly asked him about his age until tonight; but it's weird how his profile said 28.

He seems like a nice guy overall. I'm just afraid something terrible could happen.

What do y'all think about this?",gay
gay_irl,,gay
Can straight guys tell if a guy is hot.,Idk ask ur straight friends if a guy is hot.,gay
Pls help,"So I'm 17M and feeling a tad depressed, Just started college and I've still never been in a relationship, like, never... I see loads of peeps getting together and I feel really left behind. I'm in 'that' nerdy group in a fairly small place but I still go out to festivals and parties etc. I seem to be able to make friends with all sorts of people very easily but yet nobody seems to want to be more? I keep telling myself that I'll meet someone in uni but I can't shake the feeling that I'm REALLY ugly or that nobody actually likes me or maybe I'm just the only gay guy in the UK... Ugh. Keep tumbling into this series of catastrophic thinking and it's really bothering me. Maybe I'm just your typical dramatic teen :) Any advice or tips would be appreciated",gay
Me and you... What you say?,,gay
Gay Australian penguins get an adopted child!,,gay
Advice for when I still feel shame for being gay?,"I live in a very working class area in Scotland as well... so yeah. Lot's of hard minded people who give you looks in the street that make me feel less confident about it, and a little shame.

What do you guys do when, and if, you feel like this? ",gay
Is snoo top or bottom?,Pick and defend. I think little mac is packing big time so he is top boy all the way. But then sometimes he keeps package hidden and plays the little boy card and bottoms w best of them.  Total versatile personafied,gay
In need of advice. Should I pursue a relationship?,"Hey r/gay. I have a crush on a boy. It's news to me... here I was, I thought I was bisexual but for all purposes straight, when out of nowhere I'm between girlfriends at twenty something and I fall hard for another man. He's cute, he's funny, he admires me(!) We've only talked once, and hugged once, and my heart skipped a beat and I didn't want to let him go. In this case I'd usually tell myself: ""he's probably straight, get over yourself, focus on more important things..."" - however - he's in all probability *also gay*. Due the situation around us running into each other I feel safe to say this. I'm used to being careful - my gaydar is absolute shite - and I still think it's safe to say. 

Now I have a twofold dilemma. I'm still hesitant about being with a guy. I'm not secure in my sexuality. I feel as though it's a bad look. Not to hate on the people that are - I respect the hell out of them, if nothing else, because they are living their real life. And of course, there's no reason to think differently about a gay person in love or a straight person in love. I hate myself. I hate other people's views. I can't be 'out' because I don't have the courage to withstand the way it'll change people's opinions of me. And, if we could all be honest, people will look at me differently. I think other people will say it's a bad look, and to some extent, I internalise that, and I pay too much attention to what they might think, so I end up saying that being out is something I want to avoid. 

The other problem is that I'm in a very emotionally chaotic state right now. I don't know if these feelings are real or if it's because I'm vulnerable(?) I've never described myself that way but I suppose it's true right now. Things in my personal life were thrown all about by what I can only describe as a tornado. I came out of it raw, with a bit of a fresh perspective on myself and the world but also hurting. Maybe love at first sight is so powerful because it's not meant to be real. 

Can anyone who's been here give me any advice? Any words to help me with? Thanks for reading. ",gay
It feels so wrong,"It feels weird knowing that once I'm 18 in a few months, anyone 18+ can hit on me and won't be super creepy until they reach 30s. Like, I'm 17 now and if a 20 year old hit on me I'd be freaked out - but I'll be a legal adult at 18 and it will be legally okay. That's so weird to me. So weird. I'm illegal now but just wait a few months and boom, taxes (once I get a job lmao) and legally allowed to fuck. Weird. 

Also why tf aren't we taught in school how taxes work and how to pay them? Like, just write a fucking check and write government for the receiver? I know that's not what you do, but that's what comes to my mind immediately. At least I know the fucking Pythagorean theorem, would be lost without it. ",gay
Legit I just need someone to talk to,"It’s late, the stupidity of the day won’t leave me alone, and I’m just in a low point in my life rn. I’m really young and would prefer to chat with someone around my age but it’s whatever.",gay
Is it futile?,"Hey guys and guys,

I was honestly just wondering if there's any hope of getting into a closed, long term relationship because almost every other non-heterosexual person that I've met doesn't seem to want that. Everyone either wants wham-bam ,
thank-you ma'am or isn't really interested in anything monogamous or long term. 

Is it hopeless or am I just whinging? 

Please and thank you. ",gay
The Abusive Step-Father,"My stepfather was an abusive and threatening homophobe. For over a decade, I suffered his abuse. While I was not out, I was feminine, uninterested in women, and got caught with pics of hot guys on my laptop. It was obvious that I was gay. After I came out at 18, he coincidentally befriended a gay coworker. He suddenly had a ""come to Jesus moment"" - for lack of a better phrase - after realizing his gay coworker was normal. Then he accepted me. 

His excuse for years of abuse? His father was abusive - constantly telling him he was feminine and gay. He was forced, sometimes by violence, to ""act like a man"" and ""stop being a pussy."" His father would punch and hit him for no reason at all. He was also called gay at school. He says he was following his father's example to raise a man, and that he didn't want me to face the same bullying at school.

I am not angry anymore. But I also can't forgive this either. He keeps asking me why I still hold it against him. In my mind, he will always be accountable for this. I have no love or sympathy for him. If he fell and broke a bone, I wouldn't be able to bring myself to call an ambulance. The most I would do is throw him the phone.

I can't forgive someone for stupidity of this magnitude. We should question everything - deconstructing our beliefs like Descartes. I don't believe half a damn thing I was raised to believe - particularly religion. I think for myself. 

It just seems like a shit excuse for being a shitty person to say ""I was parenting based on the way I was raised.""

It fucked me up even more that this man isn't even blood. He married my mom just as I entered middle school. He's no one to me.

He claims all the things he's bought for me and provided me show his love. How does buying things I needed erase the trauma and depression and instability I live with because of him and others? I feel like he does this to swap guilt back on me. I'm glad he helped my struggling mom raise us, her kids. But he will always be the man who abused and bullied me at the same time.

I don't know why I posted this. I just needed to feel heard without having to pay or months weeks in therapy. My psychiatrist already drains my wallet. 

I feel better. Also, I hope someone with a similar experience can find some relief in the fact that they are not alone. Has anyone experienced this? How did you recover?

Love and peace.",gay
Hmm...the universe is trying to tell me something.,,gay
Need advice,"I’ve been dating this guy for over a year now, we had a good connection and I really enjoyed his company. A couple of months ago we started fighting because he’s not honest with me. We’ve had a couple of situations were he tells me that some guys that text him are his “friends” but I always end up finding out that he had something to do with them in the past. What should I do? I’m honestly tired of it already.",gay
Portland Oregon Gay Massage,"Hi,
Can anyone recommend a good male to male massage place in Portland Oregon?
Thanks!",gay
I have a crush but i got over it,Ok so I liked this boy for so long and I even became obsessed and one day I just realized it's unhealthy and that he's straight so I stopped being obsessed and moved on. But now I have no crush and I know I don't need a crush but I want one. ,gay
I guess I have a new 2020 campaign slogan,,gay
I think i have a stalker or like something,"Ok so there's this guy and I'm not sure he's a stalker but he makes me uncomfortable like I don't know him the well and he said , "" I've missed you and something along the lines that I made him sad for not talking to him. He also said if I was his friend I had to hug him and im not but I felt bad because he's bringing up depression nd being sad. What do I do with my obsessed Stan.",gay
Hey Guys! I'm a 21 y/o gay UCLA Athlete and I just made my first Youtube Vid today!!,,gay
(NSFW?) My orgasms are so intense,"What's up I'm new here, I've had a burning question for some time.

My orgasms are intense. I've never seen someone having orgasms like I do. It's been like this since I started wanking, that would have been around age 12? But over the years it has gotten more intense. I am 19 now and I've had a handful of occasions where I actually fainted for a few seconds. More often so while I'm standing, my legs start shaking like shite and turn into pudding which brings me down to the floor. Very dramatic, lol. Again, I've never met anyone who feels the same way. Some of the dates think it's hot as fuck, others think I'm about to start having a seizure. It's all over in a matter of 30 seconds. I don't actually mind any of this but I wonder if this is like a thing? ",gay
HEY YOU,"Yeah, you. 

You gay? 
You around the PH area? 
Around 20-30 years of age? 
Single and looking to get into a committed relationship? 

If you are, hit me up and we can get to know each other if you want. 
If you aren't, hit me up anyway so we can talk about shit you like and maybe we can find a common interest. 

♥",gay
Looking to chat I’m in ma I’m male,,gay
"Not gay, but here to learn","So I’m wondering, what’s the reason for homosexuality? Are you born that way, is it a social construct, sexual preference? I want to be educated as I recently slipped up and said gay and queer are the same thing, well, it didn’t go well...",gay
Best fetishes or sex experiences,Let's get sexy :) ,gay
Theme Song,"Hello All from England. 

Id like to propose we all pick a song that most makes us feel gay lesbian trans etc. 

Its not what most would pick. My Choice is?
Tainted Love - Marc Almond.  
I nearly picked Small Town Boy  -  Bronski Beat",gay
This is so gay,,gay
I need help :(,"Background: I am a high school freshman so sorry if this is a little weird to you.

This boy in my class is really hot and he plays Overwatch and watched Rupaul’s Drag Race. He acts adorable all the time, and he’s gay. The problem is, I’m ugly and I have nothing to offer. What do I do?",gay
Depressed friend,"So a friend of mine is gay and he was recently outed to his family. He did not choose to be outed. They live in Indonesia, a country that doesn't have a great track record on gay tolerance, even though homosexuality is not illegal (although several bills in the last ten years have certainly tried and failed to outlaw it). Homophobia is a definite issue.

His family is Catholic and upon learning that he is gay, have treated him with suspicion, intolerance, at one point violence, and have kicked him out of the house several times. Apparently now they've also suggested (I don't know if they outright said it, I wasn't there) that he kill himself. 

He is depressed and reached out to me to tell me he was contemplating suicide. I made him promise me he wouldn't do that. I don't know what else I can do other than check up on him everyday. 

Are there any support groups in Indonesia for this kind of thing? 

Any and all helpful suggestions are appreciated. ",gay
lol,i am gay,gay
My Little Gay Spooky Story,,gay
Ask me summthin,"Just took an eighth of shrooms (what's the kid cudi line?) 

Lol 21 y/o college senior ask me something",gay
Why do fem guys hate being called 'fem' or 'fem queens'?,"I'm not a full-fledged fem (I act somewhat masc but my interests are fem), but I proudly call myself a fem queen. However, my gay friends (almost all fem) hate it when I do that. I know that 'no fems' is a thing in our community, but if you go to /r/gaybros, you'll see that masc guys feel like they're being excluded. Also, let's be real, somewhat-fems and fems make-up a large portion of our community. 

Just thought I'd hear some opinions. Why not embrace ourselves for who we are? Fem queens unite! ",gay
Work hard 😝,,gay
Depression,"Well I guess it was the first time I experience something like that. The boy I like already have a girlfriend.
That's right, I'm a boy too.
Like a barrier without an end",gay
GayBro w/ GoPro,,gay
"What is ""Straight-looking""/""Passing"" &amp; Why does it matter to some people?","Why do some people enjoy shaming other gay men with terms like ""straight looking"". I usually see it used to shame men with more masculine qualities.

Isn't that just perpetuating the idea that homosexuality = feminine? Whats wrong with being oneself? Why do gays need to ""pass for gay""?

Ive never dressed myself and wanted to look/be straight (Whatever that means??); so how does that make me, a more masculine man, ""straight-passing""? Why cant masculine-gay-men be ""gay passing"" (LOL). To me, sexuality is just who you have sex with; Its never been about projecting/hiding anything about oneself on-to/from others.",gay
Born gay? Disclaimer: No offence intended,"I have read the rules and I hope this is okay - the last thing I want to do is cause any offence but please let me know if this  does indeed offend. I'll delete it right away or you can report it. I just want some clarity (selfish really).  

I've always been of the mindset that people are born gay. I've never given this a second thought, never needed to. 

I waited five years for my best friend to come out as bisexual and she's still scared of telling her parents. We're mid-twenties now. I've watched her go through really difficult times, questioning herself and her place with her family (and some other less-accepting friends). 

Recently, an 'acquaintance' started arguing to me that nobody is born gay and started talking about scientific studies. I haven't read any science on the subject and never really intend to, but she was throwing all of these facts at me and I was finding it difficult to argue, even though I disagreed with her completely. I asked my friend and she said she wasn't sure at first, and that she had to be with a man before she knew she preferred women. 

What I wanted to ask, is - were you born gay? Is that the way it works? Is it homophobic to say otherwise, because I thought it was? 

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you for any replies you can offer and once again, if this offends then please let me know - it is the last thing I want to do. Ideally, I'd like to be in the right and change someone's mindset about the matter. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Any teen friendly gay restaurants or businesses in the Birmingham AL area?,"Hey guys, this is a new account I made because I lost access to my old account. I was wondering if there are any teen friendly gay events, restaurants, or businesses in the Birmingham area, I'm a junior in high school and I'm looking for places my boyfriend and I could go to on dates or just to hang out and meet new people.",gay
Single gay dad looking for other gay dads,"40ish dad with 8, almost 9 yo boy and fostering a 7yo. Would love to meet or chat with other gay dads about all things boys.",gay
"Me - ""why don't I have a boyfriend?"" Also me, attempting to flirt -",,gay
Advice,"So before I met my current husband, I was married to another man. We were madly inlove, had a relationship of 7 years. He died one year into our marriage. I went throough a lot of pain but I managed to move on. Or so I thought. I am normally not a nostalgic person but I kept in my belongings a little gift he gave me on our second date so long ago. A few days ago I was going through my old stuff and saw it wasn't there. I asked my husband and he said he threw it away. And then I lost it I screamed at him even left the apartament and went to my parents for the night where I listened to old songs we used to love and cried my eyes out.. what was that? Did I overreact? What should I do now?",gay
need relationship advice.,"met this guy on grindr a couple days ago. we talked for a little bit, then he gave me his snapchat. we start snapping and stuff and then we video chatted for an hour and a half and really seem to hit it off. Wednesday rolls around and we actually set up a date to meet on thursday (yesterday). So then we went on our ""date"" yesterday which was just us walking around the mall and talking and getting to know each other. At the end of our date we hugged for a solid minute, and he said if I stuck around with him 2 or 3 more times he might take me to his house sometime. I'm really eager to start a relationship with this guy because he seems very nice and sweet, and so I want to snap him a lot, but he's busy a lot of the time and leaves me on read a lot. Should I be worried that he's not interested, and how should I approach asking for another date? really need advice on this, been my first gay relationship and idk how to approach it. thanks to anyone in advance",gay
I need a advice..,[https://www.reddit.com/r/askgaybros/comments/9roddk/is\_a\_good\_ideia\_to\_have\_the\_first\_kiss\_and\_first/](https://www.reddit.com/r/askgaybros/comments/9roddk/is_a_good_ideia_to_have_the_first_kiss_and_first/),gay
What are the coolest things you've talked about with someone you are meeting online?,"I'm from Brazil aehoo
So, I'm talking to this guy I met online and he is a sweetheart, but I'm kind of out of ideas about what to talk to him. Any suggestions? Think of the things smb told you and you though it was super interesting or cute 

Weeelp",gay
What do you think when a guy doesn't specify his HIV status on grindr?,"It's important information to have when you're looking for sex.  I'm not sure why someone would leave it blank.  Also, if you are a person who leaves it blank, please comment and explain why.",gay
My theory about why some people are gay,"     Based from info from this subreddit, basic biology, and reading WHO’s F-66 article(s) I have my theory.

     The 2 logical biological reasons somebody would be gay are genetic or neurological. A genetic reason would be a mutated or extra chromosome. A neurological reason would be a mental illness. But there is a third reason that is the most supported; interaction in a social world. 

     The F-66 articles say thee is a lack of “empirical evidence supporting the pathologization and medicalization of variations in sexual orientation expressions”  in essence homosexuality is not a mental disorder. In other parts of the F-66 it says there is slight evidence toward specific cases of homosexuality being a disorder, but there is still lack of empirical evidence.

   The rest of the F-66 article(s) summarized say that there is certain evidence toward social interaction contributing toward homosexuality, although hormones (testosterone and estrogen) have a role. So you are not born homosexual or heterosexual, you just end up being gay or straight based upon your interactions with the world. If you are adopted from a young age by a gay couple, you likely will be gay too not inevitably, but likely. 

    *this is based of of current information from WHO. This is not fact, at least not yet.*",gay
"8""","Just went to take a shower , grabbed my dildo and some lube and had some fun.

The tip was hard to go in as always , then once it was in , I fucked myself as hard as I could and after a few minutes I came; I always come so much when I used it.

I wish I had the real deal inside me.

Question : Does it feel the same with a real one ?",gay
Advice for a gay high school teacher,"I’m an openly gay 25 year old male high school teacher. This is my second year teaching at my school and I’ve quickly established a positive rapport with my students and fellow teachers. Many of my coworkers know that I’m gay and for those that don’t, I’m sure they assume. Some have asked and I’ve told them, but I’m also not hiding it from anyone. 

I’ve always wondered what my student think about me. Several have made comments about my looks (I typically wear a shirt and tie so nothing really “gives me away”) and feel comfortable talking to me since I’m relatively close to their age. Some have asked me about my family, if I have a girlfriend (never a boyfriend), or if I have kids (LOL). 

Today a student asked me “which team I play for” and said many students have been wondering about my sexuality. I played dumb with her and quickly changed the subject. 

I don’t want to avoid the fact that I’m gay because I know it could potentially be beneficial for some students and provide them with someone they feel comfortable with. However, I remember that I work with teenagers who love to gossip with one another. 

I guess what I’m ultimately wondering is how others in a similar situation have navigated this scenario and what advice they might offer to me. I want to be open with my students and not be afraid of them knowing, but I also want them to find out in an authentic way and not just know me as the “gay teacher”. 

Thanks in advance! ",gay
Does anyone know if The Cock in NYC is still open?,"For the next three months I'll be back and forth to NYC for a week to 10 days every other week or so. I'd like to visit the iconic Gay scene in NY. Stonewall, The Eagle, The Cock, [Insert anywhere else you suggest.].

I read that The Cock was closed. 

Thx for that and any other guidance. 

Cheers. ",gay
Rih,"So do tell me, hypothetically  If I have never been in a relationship with a girl that means I’m not gay(even if I say and feel that I do like girls)? 

Does that mean if you haven’t been in a hetero relationship with someone, you’re not straight?

Remember, sir, You don’t need to be in a relationship to validate your sexuality. 

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Looking for friends in Georgia.,I don’t have a lot of friends and I’m trying to make some. I’m located in GA if you play videogames or watch a lot of series lmk,gay
"When you’re friendly with a customer, he eventually asks you out, but you’re not available/interested...","How do you cope with that if it’s a situation where he shows up to my store every few days?

I didn’t mean to give him any impression that I was interested and didn’t intend to lead him on. He still says hi and asks what’s up since he asked me out, but even though he understands that I’m not available, I still sense that he’s not giving up. I’ve tried to interact with him less since it happened.",gay
Oh man... Coming out :D,,gay
Oysters and bloody Marys,,gay
“Tip your waitress.”,,gay
"Any cute, baby face rugby players?","Only found one - Archie White

Edit. Just found another one Sam Skinner... he's like the guy of my dreams

https://instagram.fybz1-1.fna.fbcdn.net/vp/e81b475b96626b5f007436cde5e96578/5C847428/t51.2885-15/e35/26406733_151929615468582_5866642837747007488_n.jpg",gay
"My gay Halloween costume, gay fantasy-scifi novel and a gay guy all in one pic! Oh and a kitty.",,gay
HOW TO KNOW IF SOMEONE IS GAY?,"Hey y'all,


I want to know whether a man is gay or not but not based on stupid stereotypes and social stigma. 

I hire a technician for repairing stuff at the house from time to time. His ass is usually partially exposed but that may be because he is climbing a metal ladder. He touches his front junk for 5 secs or less couple of times over 2 hrs period of time to fix his junk positions.

His appearance:

Uneducated

Hot and attractive

Got a good ass no muscles leaned a bit skinny

Poor outfit becoz he is broke

He is living with his brother and roommates

He is young

Single

Simple and friendly

I donno maybe his actions come from his ignorance about manners. We live in a HOMOPHOBE country. He may be straight and not knowing he is acting gay 


Thanks y'all.....
",gay
What would you say is/was your biggest turn on with a partner or a hook up?,"Bored so I thought why not go on Reddit 🤷🏻‍♂️ for me it’s feeling my boyfriends chest area especially when I ride him, as his chest hair just turns me on immensely 😅 feels great. ",gay
How do i flirt?,So theres this guy in my lgbt group and hes cute as hell and i want us to be a couple. How do i make him like me and how do i flirt with him? How do i get him to hang out and any other advice like that?,gay
WHO SHOULD GAY PEOPLE HAVE AS A PARTNER?,"Should gay people (including me) date a STRAIGHT partner or a Bi/Gay partner?

Send on your opinions girls and let them be heard 😉

EDIT: Who do you think is perfect as a partner to gay people? Straight men or Bi/Gay men? Or maybe someone else out there I didn't mention?

I've always fantasized of having a straight partner. But  I wanna hear the opinions of my fellow gay men here. ☺️",gay
For all my fem queens out there: 11 Fabulous Reasons to Date a Fem Guy,,gay
Why I dont come out as gay,"how do i eat strawberries i am wondering this lately. i am not gehy like u but i now that this is a gud ting to wandr abut. 

[PLS HLEP ME OUT](https://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=U%20gay)

i have tired to get a gril friend beucause i am not gehy and guys dont like me sohow do i get a grilfreind easy plase help me. i am 9 help me plase",gay
Text or in person?,Do you mind when people ask you out over a text or do you prefer it when it's in person? ,gay
My actually mood,,gay
Kinda outted my cousin,So I super FD up...,gay
"Pride, mastermind of the gay agenda",,gay
I kinda just outted my cousin,I deserve any comments thrown. I deserve anything. He was the 1st person I told in may and he told me he was bi same time. He fd me over really bad but i feel so so horrible right now,gay
Australia's churches must welcome LGBT+ people of faith,,gay
Looking for a man to fullfil my fantasy,I’ve been looking for a dominant aggressive verbal big chubby man to plow me out. I love a man who can talk who can fuck and takes what he wants and likes. I’m a very submissive bottom for the right man I’ll do whatever love conversations get to know one anaother trade pics talk over the phone dirty video chat then possibly meet. Im a first timer submissive chub.,gay
What is a woman? Toxic debate over trans rights engulfs Britain,,gay
Gay ex-turned-to-be-my-bff- forever,,gay
whatever will we do :O,,gay
Hit me with that gay shit,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/wd96lq1xbdu11.png",gay
when you realize that nobody thinks you're hot and you're just hung.,,gay
is this weird?,is it weird im not attracted to hunky built guys? like i'd never be with someone like that. im more into guys of my own average stature haha.,gay
I Still Love Him,"It’s been nearly three years since he walked away and for better or worse, I still love him. I know I should move on and learn to love again but I don’t know how. I know this is probably not going to be popular and I am prepared for the onslaught of down votes. I just had to put it in writing tonight. That is all, thanks for reading.",gay
No one else to tell; a storytime. (tl;dr included),"So about an hour ago, the BF &amp; I are sitting in the car in my driveway, having a smoke before we call it a night. My car is facing the open garage; an SUV inside to the right, and a couple of bikes on the left. So when we see the blue blur of a figure walking by my car and into my garage, it’s on my BF’s passenger side. It’s not unlike a family member of mine to pull up and go into the house through the garage if it’s open, but this person veered from that path, for the bikes; Grabbing one and making his way out of the garage around the driver’s side of my car. I realized that since we had no lights on in the car, the thief didn’t even realize people were in it watching him the entire time.  

Now my brain was having trouble processing all of THAT and reacting quickly, it’s like all I could do was watch and think ‘what the fuck, someone’s stealing one of the bikes.’ 
But my BF? Was out of the car and around to my side already swinging at the guy. He dropped the bike, didn’t even make it 10 feet from the garage, and was chased down the street a bit and warned not to come back around the neighborhood, to put it in the lightest way, as my BF had an angry mouth on him. 
I could tell the BF was on edge and amped on adrenaline as he came back to all the kisses, appreciation and admiration you’d expect after that. When I asked him if he was okay I got an out of character and hearty ‘hell yeah’, which only made me chuckle and swoon like a damn damsel that just got rescued more. 

It blows my mind that something like that literally happened in front of my eyes and I could barely react, and if the BF weren’t there I’m not sure how effective I would have been at stopping the bike thief since I’m a smaller than average guy. My neighborhood is home to mostly young working families and retired elderly couples, but I guess that’s where you’d go to find the best stuff to steal. The thief dropped his chain cutting tools too, so obviously he had a night planned being around here and just thought he came up easy. Nope, sorry, next. 
AMA

Tl;dr: me and bf in car smoking, ‘hidden’. Guy try to steal bike from out of garage. Bf beat and chase guy, get much love. Me mindblown. 
",gay
Why is the gay community so segregated/racist?,"So I'm kinda feeling upset being a gay black guy and I'm 27 years old, and I wish I had a boyfriend. People always think I'm crazy when I say this community is racist, but I believe it is.

This is a recent picture of me. I think I look good. 

* https://i.imgur.com/pkZ4gLV.jpg

I just noticed how segregated and racist this community can be. I feel attacked and alone because of my preference and the type of guys I'm attracted to. Just because I'm black, and loud and feminine and ghetto, doesn't mean when it comes to relationships, I'm looking for that. I like more opposite guys, more bear or nerdy guys, more unconventional guys. Guys like the Amazing Atheist etc. 

I feel because I'm not like other gay black guys when it comes to preferences and attraction, I feel people think I'm trolling or joking, when I'm not. 

This is a prime example. Although they seem to be having fun, this is way too ghetto and ratchet, and this is the ""black gay"" community. It's not very diverse at all. There is a white guy in the clip, but he might be gay, but I believe that he's a open minded curious straight guy who's possibly a tourist. But it's very segregated. Nothing but black queer people. This is fine, but I don't like the division. I don't. 

* https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3NiAY3um4UU

Now here's the opposite. I feel more attracted to these guys, but again it's not very diverse. I don't see nary a black guy there. I think I saw one black guy but he was off in the corner by himself.  So if I would to come to this event, I most likely be rejected, passed up, I would get attacked, called racist names, ""What is that nigger doing here? "" etc. There have been racist incidents like this told from other gay black men and minority gay men at gay events and gay clubs, I'm not making this up either. So it's tough.

* https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEY3ekrfC0Q

I mean people can do what they want, but I just wanted to call stuff I don't think is right out. This is exactly why I don't go to gay events due to how cliques form, and being a gay black man I can't fit in either side. I just want to know why is this community so segregated like that? ",gay
Only 1900s kids will get this,,gay
Just want to talk,"So I don't really know of an app to just talk...

I mean I'd like to find someone for more but right now I just wanna talk and don't know of an app for it.",gay
Out n Proud,,gay
Should i come out to my crush???,"Okay so last year i moved to guatemala and attended school for a year, i met this one guy who was a lot nicer to me than literally everyone else. He became my friend ig?? but id never been friends with anyone i like so hed talk to me and id freak out and woudnt be able to respond much. I honestly think he was just being friendly although sometimes i got big gay vibes from him. but i do know that he has dated women before.

Anyways, the school year is over and i dont think ill be returning to Guatemala to study, and if i do it wouldn't be at that school since they dont have certain classes id like to take. 

I know i want to thank him for not patronizing me constantly like most of the other boys at our 200 person Christian private school but i dont know if i should tell him i liked him. There's a pretty good chance he's a good Christian who hates GaEs 

&amp;#x200B;

(ignore my lack of punctuation and pretty much anything- first post and tbh im too lazy)",gay
in 10 hours I will be giving oral for the first time.,"so nervous that I could die right now, I am(23) pretty much a late blomer when it comes to guy on guy action while he(18) have plenty of experience, we have been chatting for a couple of months, even meet one time and kissed a bit, but tomorrow his house is empty and I am going there and we know whats going to happen and fuck I want it bad but I am so nervous that I can't sleep, guess I just wanted to writte this to calm down a bit.",gay
Gay and Lonely,"May as well ask around :)

I'm new to the whole 'being gay' thing :(

Please PM me, I'm just interested in meeting other homosexual males in a more controlled environment.

I intend to respond in tomorrow, please include your interests within your message such that we may have a topic to discuss.

I appreciate any responses",gay
"""Who's the guy and who's the girl""","I'm getting so fucking tired of hearing this from the same people. What's the best way to handle this??

I shouldn't care if someone points at me as the ""girl"", because that shouldn't be offensive. And sometimes people will say my bf is the ""girl. It's like some twisted fucking game that's amusing to them and I'm tired of it.",gay
Why all the hate?,"I know this is an extremely tough time for many people and I am sorry if this is inappropriate, but I really dont understand: why is there so much hate for LGBT people?

I suppose a lot of it comes from religion, but I also know nonreligious people who essentially have nazi-esque beliefs about gays, trans people, etc.

 In your experience, why do people feel so strongly about this?

",gay
"Saw this somewhere and decided to create my own version. The Right-Wing Gay Guy Starterpack, gentlemen. Also, right-wing bros, it's a joke. Don't get triggered and don't act like a snowflake.",,gay
White guy that loves darker skin tones!,"I’m a white guy that is not attracted to pale complexions like myself, but men of darker skin tone, such as black or Hispanic. I’m wondering how popular this is amongst my white peers and also if there are any coloured dudes out there that are the reverse, and are attracted particularly to white guys?",gay
Anyone up,Yep anyone up is it. Just trying to talk to someone,gay
Hey this thing appeared on my penis any help pls?',"So this purplish, reddish in the middle spot appeared on my shaft, and it seems like one of those bruises but Im not sure what it is, anyways heres the link if someone knows about this pls help me, I'm really scared, also theres no feeling of pain there.

&amp;#x200B;

Pls take a look: r/[https://ibb.co/fbVkfq](https://ibb.co/fbVkfq)",gay
How did you meet your partner?,Just wondering how any of you guys met your partners or if there is any funny stories out there to hear! ,gay
Single,"I'm almost into my 30ies and I'm single as fuck lol. I mean I'm pretty good looking hwp, pretty slim,  college educated working on my second degree but I can't seem to find a meaningful relationship.  Sex is so boring, at this age I want something more than a quick fuck.  Oh well =( ",gay
When you're on Grindr at 2:00 AM,,gay
Gay Bars in Nashville are Receiving Anti-Gay Flyers Promoting Guns and Trump. Some seriously deranged people out there now.,,gay
Still early in the night so gay bar for the 2nd time ever??,It would be a $35 ride each way and I don't really know what my expectations are. I just know I need to do something...,gay
To find: mi amigo mejor,"Dear people of the internet ;)

I have been wanting to see the movie Mi amigo mejor for a long while now, but I have strolled the internet a couple of times and haven´t found it yet. Of course I am willing to pay for the movie. I don´t know if it is allowed here, but here is a link of the IMDb page: ´[https://www.imdb.com/title/tt6400166/](https://www.imdb.com/title/tt6400166/)´

Does anyone know where I can find this movie?

&amp;#x200B;",gay
My Sexual orientation?,"Show me porn of gorgeous women, and my member feels nothing 

Show me muscular men, and my member is raging hard

Sex with girls i can't get hard at all but i like relationships with them

I dont wanna date a man but i have cock on the brain alot

Could i be bisexual?",gay
No friends to go to a gay bar,"I've texted like 6 friends and none have even replied. Well my cousin did and said she's going to bed which is chill, but she'd never go anyways... All I asked was to grab a beer and game of pool. I know it's a week night but it wouldn't even matter.

Friends suck",gay
Gay Iceland,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/a2j20ltg82u11.jpg",gay
who is right?,"My boyfriend and I had a huge argument recently about something that happened when we were in bed.  

When we are cuddling, he sometimes likes to gently rub my thigh, stomach, ass, whatever, in a romantic way.  The problem is that he rubs the same spot over and over, and after a very short time it really irritates my skin and starts to hurt.  I have told him this, and he doesn't always remember, and that's ok.

This happened recently and when it started to hurt, I took my hand and gently pushed his away.  When I did this it seemed to really annoy him.  He said ""you can just tell me to stop"".

Hence the argument.  I told him that if he doesn't want to get pushed away, he shouldn't do something that hurts me.  It's my body and he doesn't get to dictate my reaction to him doing something that hurts me. Yes, I can improve my verbal communication, but I don't think my effort to do that means I'm any less right if I want to push him away.  

He believes that I'm the one with the problem.  He thinks I was totally rude and that I have no right to push his hand away and that I should just tell him when something is bothering me.  

He believes that addressing my reaction is more important than addressing his initial action because I intended to push his hand away, whereas he didn't intend to hurt me.  I think the exact opposite because the fact that he hurt me outweighs any intent.

Can anyone weigh in on the situation?  Thanks for your advice!",gay
Came out to my best friends ago and I've been trying to meet guys since then,"Hey guys,

I know some will like, others will dislike but I really wanted to share with you because I'm looking for answers.

I'm (25/m) and I came out as bisexual to my best friends. Some were surprised because they never thought I could be into guys.. and others didn't because I was very pro homosexuality. Since I came out the closet I've been trying to meet guys through Tinder but every match I come up with they're usually guys who live on Instagram. Basically they live way too much the modeling life even tho some of them don't look fit enough for it.

Thing is: I'm that kind of guy who didn't have any1 to talk with about gay experiences and I gave a try to Tinder cause I thought I could meet someone through it. I'm currently 25 years old and I've been trying to settle down for e.g ""stable relationship""... but these guys can easily drop you off because you're not ""trending"" enough for them?!

I'm not a jerk, reasonable good looking and I really enjoy to stay fit... Do I freak them out when I tell them I'm looking to meet new people and become friends first, then get into a relationship if it has to happen?

What's your opinion?

Sry for bad english lol

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Looking for guys to send pics,Snapchat:nightmares155,gay
"Labels, labels, labels....","Ive seen a lot of posts regarding labels. Am I gay, bisexual, pansexual, heterosexual, trisexual, robosexual, mono sexual, motorsexual...whatever.

Please don't get me wrong. I understand that being able to identify with one of these (although I made up some of them) helps with your own identity. That's fine. 

I just want to remind you not to get too focused on a label. People get so wrapped up in what other people think that it truly hinders their own growth. The fact is you can't control other people's thoughts. You can't make them feel a specific way about something. Yes, intellectual conversation can educate people, but change them? Rarely.

It's up to YOU to be who YOU are. Screw the rest of the world. If they can't except you as being Gay, Bi, Pan or whatever then that is their loss.

Revel in who you are. Enjoy life for what it is. Find your place in this world and live it to the fullest. If you can't find a place to fit in, make one. Follow your heart and love yourself. Everything else will fall into place. I promise. 

S",gay
make amateur website,,gay
A need of help,Can someone dissuade me from have sex in exchange for an iPhone xs? ,gay
I met someone (need insight),"Hello all,

I (22m) met someone on Grindr. He's ( 28 m) bottom; and we're both LTR oriented to my knowledge. He seems like a nice guy, but we haven't met in person yet. He's hot too; has a cute face with 175lbs of muscle. I'm still working on myself; I weigh 145 and I still have a bit of a gut, but am muscular in all other areas.

I identify as a vers-bottom; and, due to inexperience, I've never topped. I was up front about this with him, and he still wanted to exchange numbers.

I've been led on before just for sex. What are some things I should look out for so I don't repeat this mistake?

I understand that I have to wipe the slate clean for everybody; but I can't help but feel a little guarded.

Also, off question: is it weird that he has a phonetically similar name as my previous sexual partner? What do y'all make of the difference in age?

Thanks for taking the time to read or respond :)
I'm really nervous about people on Grindr; and was hoping for some insight.

TLDR: I met someone and I'm nervous.
",gay
Help me with Grindr,"Hi there,

Thank you for reading my post, I need help setting up my Grindr account can someone help me?",gay
Rambling a bit about a crush,"So I'm in my sophomore year of college and one of the freshmen on my team is really attractive(and gay!). So I've been crushing on him pretty hard. It's part of the reason why I came out a few weeks ago because I hated having these feelings and not being able to act on them. Yet now, I still feel like asking him out might not be the best idea. As I said, he's on my team and if he says no or it doesnt work out it might be awkward for the rest of my time here. Also I'm not sure if we are really compatible outside of me being really attracted to him. From speaking to him I can tell that a lot of our view are really different. Idk though, we only met 2 months ago and don't see each other that often so I'm only going off of what I've learned from our infrequent conversations. I just want to hear some people's thoughts on it, some similar experiences would be cool as well.",gay
"So, yeah....","I'm horny.


That is all. ",gay
Coming out goes well...,,gay
How do I come out to my wife?,"I’ve been living a secret life for going on 14 years. I’ve been forced to hide it from my wife and it’s really become a huge headache. I’ve finally found the love of my life, but I don’t know how to tell my wife. Part of me thinks she suspects it, but part of me thinks she has no idea. Has anyone else been down this road? ",gay
"Im not gay, just got this subreddit ,,respect for ya'll and always let everyone is who u are just dont hide",,gay
Need encouragement,"I going to come out to my parents tonight and was wondering if I could get some encouragement 

I know they’re going to be fine with it I’m just really nervous still

Thank you guys in advance

It went really well guys, thanks for the support. I really do appreciate it",gay
Gorg,,gay
What is it called when you are not particularly attracted to the same sex,But also not opposed to experimentation with them? I don't think it's bisexual because that IS being attracted to the same sex as well as the opposite sex.,gay
First time post just to say hi everyone 😊,"Hi everyone I’ve been a reader for a while of this Forum and others too, but I’ve finally joined Reddit officially. Thanks for making me laugh with some of the posts you make! I’m 24 and obviously gay so that’s about it really. Looking forward to interacting with you all 😊",gay
"Wanting to be there for someone, need help.","Hello,  


I'm posting because I need help on how to address this situation.

&amp;#x200B;

I have a cousin who we've all suspected was gay, but recently I've had this confirmed this via. other friends I have who he has asked out or has messaged on Grinder. Our family is extremely religious and would never be okay with him coming out and his parents would probably ""disown"" him. He's in his mid twenties and has no idea that I know. I don't know if I should just ask him to come over and have a chat with him or if I should just let him be. I'm worried for his mental health due to the strict beliefs of our family and feel like he would be pushed into marrying a woman and living a secret life.

&amp;#x200B;

I want to help him and for him to know that I'm here for him and will always be. I am a straight female, worried about someone who I love dearly.",gay
Too Gay for youtube? :{," 

[https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCn6K21OKfxpHi8YQmWOO7ag?view\_as=subscriber](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCn6K21OKfxpHi8YQmWOO7ag?view_as=subscriber)

Guys I feel very depressed. I like to make people laugh and entertain them with just being silly. Recently I decided to start a youtube channel so I can feel happier and get some fulfillment out of my life by letting some people find escape from the real world and get a couple good laughs after watching me or relate to me and the things I have gone through and see it will get better. Long story short the main people I thought would support me have 100% let me down. I have even been told that I am ""too gay"" for them to even watch my videos. Yet I am 100% authentic and I act on camera how I am in real life. If I feel like being sassy one moment I am, If I feel like being serious another I am. But for friends/family members to say, they can't watch my video because I am gay. It really hurts. I have not felt the way I am feeling right now since I was in middle school and was bullied for being gay. I also caught some friends talking about how ugly I look on video. I literally have not cried like this since middle school. Are my videos garbage and really that bad? Should I delete my channel? I don't know what to do? Are they right? Please I am looking for some honest critique and advice. Am I too gay and ugly for people to watch me? Please someone comment and give me advice? I started 2 weeks ago and I have posted every friday or saturday. I hope that if its something I am doing that I can fix it :{",gay
Rant/Vent/Unload,"Hey all, relatively new to this sub, y'all seem pretty cool. So me, I'm 30/M/Gay in KY working for one of the Major employers in the Ville. Much to my surprise, I got out of my early 20s naivete mindset and finally got to an independent point in my life. I'm not rich, but I'm not struggling either- but money isn't a HUGE motivator in my life (crazy as that may sound to some).

So I've dated on and off over the last few years and I've learned a lot about me and my personality along the way. I'm not perfect by any means, but I am certainly doing my best to be the best person I can be. That said, not to sound stuck up or what have you, but I have a great personality. I'm a little shy at first, but I become outgoing with people quickly. I absolutely LOVE making people laugh. Plus, I'm a creative person with writing, love to cook, have some music talent (catch me on the ivories), and just LOVE to travel and go on the spontaneous adventure because this is the one life we get, am i right?

&amp;#x200B;

So my whole thing is I work a pretty typical 9-5 Monday thru Friday deal. After the week, the last thing I feel up to doing is going to the club. I just feel like its no longer my scene. I'm more of a casual person in that regard, but occasionally I'll have the wild hair to go out and club out - but again, it's *very* occasional. I've tried doing the dating apps. Plenty of Fish, Tinder, Bumble, even Grindr - I've tried them. And with one exception, I haven't really met anyone that's led to anything longer term (the one exception lasted for maybe 6 months-ish?).

&amp;#x200B;

I spend a fair amount of time with my online friends from another online community. I'm lucky to have good friends all over the place, which adds to my love of travelling perfectly. I've even gotten lucky enough to visit some of them. And one, I even got to date for a little while. I did meet up with one, that I'd hope would eventually turn into something more. I definitely saw many signs that led to this being a possibility, but timing just hasn't been on my side, so nothing has come of that.

&amp;#x200B;

So I'm just not sure what other ways I have to meet others. I work 40 hours each week, don't really feel like going out after the work week, and the dating apps haven't worked for me - leaving me to believe that most of the guys on the apps really aren't interested or are just superficial, etc. It's not the biggest city, where I live, but It's not a small town either - and there's definitely a gay scene here.

&amp;#x200B;

Just feeling lonely and worrying I'll be alone for forever, as annoyingly cliche that sounds.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks y'all! :)",gay
"some people cannot take a joke. I just joke about straight people and they call me heterophobic, which is so weird!","Joking about straight people wont make me heterophobic yall. stop being so serious! i treat straight people better than i treat myself, thats the truth. you need to calm down. stop being triggered! jokes are jokes. I can remember that in 2010s, people tell insensitive jokes without being called way too many labels!

People straights joke about gays, people say thats okay. But when gays joke about straight, gays are called heterophobic. shut up dumb straight sensitive snowflake!!!!

",gay
How important is sex in a gay relationship,"I stayed in the closet for longer than I wish I did, but looking forward I am 27 years old and I am in my first serious relationship with a man. It’s a very new experience, and I am so inexperienced that there are a lot of emotions and feelings that are probably normal but are completely new to me- and it’s a little tough to navigate sometimes. I have been in this relationship for a year, and it has changed my life. 

At the end of 2017, I was battling some heavy depression. I wasn’t sleeping, wasn’t eating, then things got worse when a friend of mine killed himself. It totally changed my mindset, and I realized how short life is, and I wanted to be myself 100% and stop hiding the fact that I am gay. I fought it my entire life, and at times convinced myself that I could date women in order to be “normal”... but after my friend left us, I just had enough. I started dating guys. 

I had a couple random hook ups, some good and some bad, and even dated a guy for about 2 months before he broke up with me (actually he just stopped talking to me). After that ended I used an online dating app and I just wanted to make some gay friends, and found someone who said he was looking for the same. I went over to his house and we watched a movie together. No sex, we just enjoyed each others company. We hung out for about 2 weeks before we hooked up, and he asked me to be his boyfriend soon after. 

Fast forward to six months later, he was offered a job in San Francisco... when he told me about it I thought he was saying he was leaving me, but instead he asked me to go. Soooo... last year I was in the closet trying to date women and now I live in downtown San Francisco with a sexy man and I’m loving life. 

There is an age gap, which I do worry about a little. I’m 27 and he is 39. Is that too much of a gap? 

And then here’s a nsfw question for anyone willing to share some sex advice;

He is horny all the time. He would have sex 2 to 3 times a day if he could, but I only get horny every other day or so... sometimes I’m down to “get down” once a day, but usually not. This comes from anxiety and depression- and I am getting better and better (with the help of a shrink) but I still don’t want to have sex daily on a regular basis. UNLESS we have sex and I DONT finish, I’m down to have sex multiple times a day. I almost like doing this too, because I still get half of the pleasure from sex as a bottom, and I am ridiculously horny, but it is a challenge not to release myself. 

I’m looking for input on approaching sex like this. Is it a good thing to practice to make sure my guy is taken care of? Is it weird? 

I have never thought he would cheat on my, but we live near a gay neighborhood in SF, with gay bars, strip Clubs (sort of- mainly just bars that have hot dudes in their under ware on the weekends) and sex clubs - and I know he really loves sex, so I just feel like it’s important to make sure he’s taken care of at home so he doesn’t feel like he needs to find new outlets. 


I’d love to hear other guys stories who have experienced coming out later in their 20s, or any relationship advice would be cool too! :)


Thanks everyone, for reading ",gay
I maed this (not lgbt related) but still support your gay creatives.,,gay
BUBBLINE IS CANON 20GAYTEEN,,gay
Homosexuality: It's about survival - not sex | James O'Keefe | TEDxTallaght,,gay
H,,gay
Some fantasies are just not meant to be,"I just met this 50 yo straight daddy [like a literal daddy he’s married to a woman and has two children] (I’m 22) and while I thought jerking off with a daddy like him was my ultimate fantasy this felt nothing like I imagined it to be. Upon undressing I just felt disgusted of myself so I just left without doing anything.

✖️✖️",gay
I celebrated my first pride after coming out to my parents! I wanted to go as another bi icon that was strong. Finally pride pics I can post on facebook,,gay
How to get over straight guys,"Hey everyone,

This seems like a very simple thing that every gay guy basically goes through but I have no idea how to stop liking straight people. I've tried getting over them using every technique possible but it never works. Its just so frustrating. If you guys have any tips that would be great. ",gay
Thailand Set to Legalize Same-Sex Unions,,gay
Should I come out?,"I am a very ordinary Chinese. I am 28 years old. I am now living an ordinary life with my rather traditional parents and a cute puppy. I started to find that I liked men when I was about 12 years old. The first time I saw a male model named Tony (real name Anthon Sandstorm), thatＩbegan to have some fantastic dreams about him. At that time, I really felt terrible, but I didn't know who to talk to. The following year, Leslie Cheung, a very famous Chinese pop star, committed suicide because of depression. I didn't know until then that there were other men in the world who liked men just like me. I once tried to use this opportunity to discuss homosexuality with my mother, who said that she thought homosexuality was disgusting, abnormal, and she showed no sympathy for the person who committed suicide because of the distress. I never discussed homosexuality with her again. I dare not go out with my parents and friends. After all, in the Chinese environment, coming out might mean losing them. So I reject the love negatively, childish think at least so that I can maintain a bit of self. After graduating from college, I began to use the gay dating software to find people I could get along with, but I was frustrated to find that many of them, concealing their homosexual identity, marry and have children, but also carry their wives and children to seek physical relationships with other men. I am so disgusted by this behavior that I think it will only hurt innocent people. Sometimes I really want to be myself, want to come out to the people around me, but in the end I still can't muster up courage. Recently, I suffered from depression because of the guilt of lying to my family and friends, and the anxiety of not being myself. I feel like I can't go on like this anymore, and I really want to turn to Reddit folks, what am I going to do?",gay
I just don’t fit in with the LGBTQ,"I’m gay (M17) and struggle with coming out, 1) Stressed on what my family and friends will think of me and 2) I just don’t fit in with the gay community which sucks cause I just feel so isolated with myself and it’s just driving me crazy. How do I come out?",gay
Love you 😘,,gay
For all my anime lovers out there. Just wanted to know if anyone had seen this anime? I’ve cried way more than I should and I’ve seen it more that a handful of times.,,gay
I received a picture of my apartment.,"Late Friday night I was missing the BF. I was home with my kids and knew he was out with friends. We texted here and there but I knew I wasn’t going to see him that night. Eventually he said he was headed home.  I knew I would get to see him Saturday and was content with that fact. 

About 20 minutes later he sent me a text message  that said “home” and it was a picture of my door from outside my apartment. I knew it was current because of the Halloween decoration I had put up since he was last over. I ran to the door and found him in the vestibule with all his bags and a huge smile. He came over to surprise me!

I love this man. He surprised me when I was least expecting it. I got to spend an nice evening with him and have a great morning with the kids just the 4 of us. 

I’m really happy I got a place that’s convenient for him to visit at times like this. He doesn’t need to drive in the city, but the train is nice and close. ",gay
Vent/advice? Straight crush,"Well I really like this guy, like really like him.I never used to pay attention to him really but now that we started talking more I guess Im kinda coming to terms with my feelings.  Whenever im around him I feel safe and comfortable the only other guy im like that with is my ex. He makes me feel so good about myself and ever since we started talking more frequently at school my anxiety and depression have gotten way better. He makes me feel good about myself and I don’t hate my face and body anymore. He’s smart and funny and attractive but the most important thing is that when im with him I can let my guard down. I can open the gates to feelings and experiences I keep locked away from even my closet friends. I think he might even like me back? But he truly makes me happy in every sense of the word. The thing is he’s straight, or at least says he is. In class he asked me if he came out would I date him, he said it seriously which he never does because he’s usually a pretty sarcastic person. So I don’t know what to think.

 I love every part of him from his eyes to his hair and even the way he looks at me and how he talks. I want him so bad and I might even go far enough to say I need him. Hes my anti depressant, the ray of sunshine in the darkness that clouds my mind. He’s the whole package and he plays baseball which is always a plus.

I was wondering if there is a way I could get him to like me back, I feel like he might because he makes an effort to sit really close to me in class and always asks to wear my hoodies and rings. I don’t want to confess because I don’t want him to feel weird around me and I don’t want to ruin what we already have. Can someone help me out? ",gay
Place to go when you want to talk to someone,r/gayconversations,gay
Me_irl,,gay
I think I married a geek.,"Last night at 2am: ""Are you not sleeping?"" - ""No"" - ""Me neither""... ""What are you thinking about?"" - ""About my robot project. You?"" - ""About how to measure how much pigs fart."" 

PS we are both engineers.",gay
We’re all a little gay,,gay
What are some old ridiculous myths about gay people?,"I need to explain how TV and movies induced gay panic and demonized gay men but can't think of much except misguided pedophilia accusations and Silence of the Lambs. It's for school so I need something less obscene.

EDIT: Already touched on media that perpetuates flamboyant stereotypes. What's something you'd hear an idiot say a gay person would do based on something they may have seen on the news or TV in the 80s?",gay
Advice needed (crush on nerd?),"Usually just lurking here, but today I could really use some advice.
There is a guy at my work. I've actually known him for years, just not very well, because he doesn't really socialize.
Around half a year ago I decided I wanted to get to know him better.
(Ok fine, the person I used to chat with during breaks got fired, and I wanted someone to talk with.)


It was kind of difficult at first because he'd just go along with whatever you say instead of showing his real interests.
But eventually it worked, he talked about his hobbies, stuff he is excited for, what he did on the weekend, got to know each other basicly.


By virtue of it being this subreddit you can guess what I eventually started to wonder.
There are several reasons, his need to constantly impress me, the way we sometimes looked at each other, the fact I caught him mumbling the word ""cute"" looking at the picture of a guy…
Ok maybe not proof but I trusted him enough at this point, that I told him that I'm into guys and that I was wondering if he is too.
Unfortunatly that was answered by an akward laugh and a ""No, but that's alright.""


Oh well. Our friendship kept going as it was for like 2 months. He even told me some pretty personal stuff.
But then something strange happend. Some days he would just completly ignore me, but still some days he would be really nice again.
Thought he's just in a bad mood for some reason, but the tendancy went more and more to ignoring me.


When I went out for a drink with a common friend of ours, I couldn't help myself but ask if he had mentioned anything that I did that annoyed him.
""Don't worry about it he's always been a little weird.""…
Keeping in mind that I haven't mentioned anything else yet, the next sentance caught me a bit of guard.
…""Also don't tell him I told you… but I'm pretty sure he has… feelings for you. Just afraid to admit it. Maybe scared of his parents. Rather ignores it than face it.""
I of course asked how he knows, mostly little clues he picked up just like me, but unlike me this guy is straight, no reason for him to make it up, while in my case it might be wishful thinking.


I guess what I'm saying is I still don't know, but what he said got me thinking.
Thinking why I even care so much.
He isn't exactly pretty and his unpredictable personality drives me mad, but when I watched him sitting there in his shorts and sweaty t-shirt, his blue/grey eyes absorbed in his work, black printer toner on his hands and his face covered in grease, I couldn't help but think just how much I want to hug him and then kiss him on that messy beard of his.


Maybe I'm an idiot for even trying, like is there even any way I can find out the truth?
I asked him if I've upset him by previously suggesting we're both gay, or if I had gotten too close to him. He almost freaked out and explained not worry  that thats totally fine, I'm just pushing him too much?
We may be back to talking to each other but he always seam super nervous when around me alone.
Like we talk about cars, video games or work and it feels like he seams to want to sink into the floor.",gay
"So, talking to other guys seems really EASY for a lot of you.","I wouldn't say I'm shy. Definitely not when I'm drunk. But I have a fear of rejection, and that puts me in this nervous state when I see a guy I think is cute. Instead of just going up to them to say whatever, I always second guess in my head what would be the best thing to say ... what my follow up will be. 

And than even IF we have a rapport, I never know how to take it to the next level and ask for the date or the number or whatever. 

I suck. But apparently that's EASY for a lot of gays? 

&amp;#x200B;

And here's another thing that's funny. 

A few years ago me and a ""friend"" were messaging on facebook and I was like ""hey, if i think a guy is cute... what's the issue with going up to him and being honest and saying I think you're cute"". He said that it could come off as ""creepy"". And that I should make up some other reason to talk to him ""i like your jeans"" etc. Which I feel is not genuine, which makes me feel like honesty isn't the way to go, which is why I second guess everything because I don't want to come off as ""creepy"". 

I'M A MESS!!!! ",gay
Grindr or any app profile,"I've never done the dating app thing, but I've only been out a few months. I think i'm ready though. I don't want just a hookup though. Someone on here mentioned meetup so i'll look at that too.

It sounds so stupid saying what I'm about to... I kind of have a timeline to even create an account. I fly to Jacksonville on the 2nd for a beach wedding (cousin that's cool af). It sucks bc we're only there literally 1 damn day but I'm gonna use it to kind of reset and try and start looking for someone.

I feel so awkward because I've never done anything like this. Any advise is awesome. Ty",gay
Strangers that make you feel like shit,"I hope it's ok to post here, I'm bi, mostly into girls \*but that's not relevant\* So, people assume I'm gay for my appearance. Does it happen to you, people of all ages, that strangers comment negatively on you?

it's not like I'm wearing something flashy like rainbows, or pink, etc.... nope, I dress like anybody else. People harass me and it makes me feel so angry. I want to reply to their hate comments. But during that moment I feel inferior. I feel so small. I don't get it, because I'm very relaxed usually, and I don't care about being called names, I'm used to it. But in that moment, the comments make me feel like I have no power over things. I'm seen as this really young guy, who has a 'softer' personality just because he's gay (again, bi, but whatever)

This is what drives me mad. Wouldn't every normal person be mad at someone calling them names? I have nothing to demonstrate to these people. I don't want to pretend I'm a strong person. I just want this to stop. I want this to stop. I think about it before I go to sleep, and it makes me emotional. Here we are, I have a soft personality if you will, but really it's just that I want to be left alone. I want to not feel like an outcast/idiot everytime I walk out of the house.

I'm building up so much anger inside. These people who were making fun of me today were like, 15 years olds. Oh my god. I know I shouldn't take this seriously because they're immature at that age and it's stupid. But today I felt so hard the desire to punch these people in their faces. It's just a fantasy that I have. I would never make it a reality but the longer I keep this anger inside, the longer it's going to hurt me.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Homophobic people are such snowflakes!!!!,"I made a post about them and I said they should leave the earth and hate themselves till they choke! Lmao, they were so mad at me, they DM me and sent crazy threats to me. I knew I was wrong because I tried to fight fire with fire so I apologized (not because I am scared of them). They could not get over that and they are still mad at me. Lmao honestly triggering homophobes is the new hobby. hahahhahah snowflakes! ",gay
Im spending 4 nights with a guy I met once,"Granted this isnt the first time I've done this.  Somehow I manage to always get myself into these long weekends away with people I dont really know.  Is this normal?

Even still, I really like this guy and we have been talking regularly for a while online.  Whatre some creative things you would get up to if you were in this situation?? :)",gay
Queer in the style of Friends,,gay
😋,,gay
Ghost him for Halloween,"Loving someone that can't love you back the way you need them too is one of the most difficult things to let go of. I'm struggling letting go of someone that I connected with more deeply than any of the guys I've dated. 

We've been friends for a few years now, and we share a large group of friends together. I introduced him to them and they all took an immediate liking to him (mostly because he's a good looking straight guy and my friends and I are a group of 15 gay men). He would come out with us to dinners, bars, and even parties.  

As our friendship grew, so did my inevitable feelings for him. As I tried to conceal the feelings, we would start to hangout more of just the 2 of us. We would just spend time together and when we weren't together we were definitely messaging memes. 

Recently I've come to realize that our friendship isn't healthy for me anymore. I've grown dependent, and stunted myself emotionally talking to only him so I blocked him. I blocked him after having a panic attack at 4 in the morning about never having him love me back the way I need.  

Completely ghosted. No message goodbye. No farewell letter.  Just blocked.  

I guess I'm feeling guilty and just needed a place to vent.  Thanks reddit.  

",gay
Sugar relationships,"So a few nights back i was asked if i was interested in being a sugar baby, i asked for a few days to get back to him on that. Now im trying to weigh the pros and cons of such a relationship. 

Im 18 and he’s +45

He’s offered to give me $1000 a week as an allowance. 

I looked up these kind of relationships and found people usually put rules in place but im only really able to think of any. i dont want to be smacked around and beat up thats all i really know.

Can somebody give me some advice?

If you can provide experienced advice thats vary appreciated.",gay
Gay mascot 😎,,gay
Want to try it now. Can you help?,"Bi-curious for over a year, and played a little by myself, but how I want more. Need help.  Cant sp this near home, to many eyes.  In Plainview for tonight, maybe tomorrow.   Just meet me and show me, top or bottom, dont care.  Gay or tran, any is worth what my heart is telling me is right.  I'm 5'10"", W/M, average build, 35 yrs old.  Meet me in public, and make a choice.  Help me feel this, or choose to leave.  Hit me up b4 I change get my mind.  

No games or drama, just honesty please.  Dont need judgement, just good clean NSA fun.  Please now.",gay
Where can I find a boyfriend? [16M],"Turning 17 in 5 weeks and am in my last year of school.

Seen several people in hetro relationships at school. Feels as if half of the year have boyfriends and girlfriends. I'm still single. I want 17 to be the age where I finally make a bit of progress in my dating life.

However, it is much less easy for gays my age than straights.

Anyone here who had a relationship at a similar age to me? If so, how did you get them and what can I do?",gay
My bros dog is my wake up call. Kinda needed it to get outta bed,,gay
Me and 5 friends used to regularly compare our dicks back in 7th and 8th grade,"Back in 7th and 8th grade me and of my friends would regularly (every 3-4 weeks) compare our dicks, keep track of our sizes and growths, inspected each others private parts and doing all kinds of comparisons and things.",gay
This Guy Has Me Feeling Conflicted,"Last week, this guy had hit me up on Grindr (tapped me, specifically.) Now, I wasn't really concerned about it, I had already met another guy a few days before and we hit it off pretty well, and was actually on it to see if he had hit me back up. He didn't, and this being the second time he had promised to contact me, I was feeling pretty salty. 

However, I noticed this new guy had tapped me twice before already, this time being the third (come to find out you can only do that by uninstalling and re-installing the app.) So I reached out, he said 'hi what are you looking for,' ya know, the usual. But I did something I had never done before. I was upfront about how I had been feeling, and just told him I was tired of the fake bullshit people give out just to get laid, and that I was looking for something more. I also stated that I knew we probably wouldn't have a lot in common due to the age difference (I just turned 22, he's 44, get your disgust out now,) so I wasn't expecting much from him. Apparently, he was a fan of that because he invited me over to his place, which I agreed to.

Now, he claimed that he wasn't experienced in terms of gay sex, had kids, been married before, etc... none of that really bothered me, I was just expecting another meaningless hookup that didn't involve full-on intercourse. Then, when I got to his place, we talked. And talked. And talked. I've always been a listener, and he was pretty intelligent, so I didn't say a whole lot, beyond what he asked me, and trying to relate to his experiences. I was happy to listen, mostly.

 Finally, It had been an hour and I had to go to work in 3, so I was ready for SOMETHING to go down. We got naked, cuddled and made out for a while, which was great because making out is my #1 turn on, above everything else. He liked it too, and he was actually a really good kisser, better than most of the guys I fooled around with.*

Then the talking DURING the cuddling and kissing came, and suddenly everything felt like the world was melting away, like nothing else mattered. His honeyed words about how he had never felt like this with a guy, how I had a big heart, and at some point during our time, he told me he was going to delete his account because he knew he was happy with just me (I watched him do it a while later.)

I was in total shock. Typically, the guys I've fooled around with only ever told me how great my body was, which is great to SOME people, I guess. But this felt different. I had never felt this way before, and was genuinely happy. There were no awkward silences, no anxiety or fear of saying the wrong thing, no script I had to read off in my head of how this should go down. It was easy. And after I left, I got done with work 5 hours later and was still beaming from that experience.

Of course, all good things must come to an end, because the day after, the dude I was talking to before him had hit me up for a booty call. I explained to him that I had met someone else who wanted to be with me and that I couldn't see him anymore. And of course, nothing after that. Didn't matter to me none, cuz I had a real life relationship thing happening, or so I thought.

I called this new guy and let him know what had happened, since I was trying to be as open as one could be, and he sounded disappointed, he told me that I shouldn't have done that. And again, I was left in pure confusion. Did we not agree upon being exclusive, what the hell is happening right now? I didnt speak to him for a few days after that, but we just agreed to meet the next day.

*Im now going to shorten the rest of this story because thks is getting pretty Wall of Text-ey.*

I called him again, we got to talking and somewhere in his self-conversation having, he said he would never come out as bi. This really pissed me off cuz I thought he wanted to be something with me, and he told me he just wants to be discreet for his kids (and because he's comfortable with not being out,) which is understandable, I guess. We agreed to meet the next week, though I was still really upset.

By this time, I had decided that, even though he made me feel like I never had before, and now knew what I was looking for in a guy, that I needed to find someone else.

We met ealier today, I was fully intent on grabbing the shit I had left there the last time I was at his place and dipping. But, he asked me what was wrong, and I couldn't just let the person who I thought I had been looking for hang out to dry. So I told him that I wanted to BE with someone, not duck and dodge and hide away. I had already done that for 6 years, I didn't want to do it again.

He said that he does care about me, and he does want to be with me, but things are... complicated. His kids are in therapy from abuse, he's in the process of a divorce, he's currently a med student... and he asked me if I would be willing to wait for him, and that I can still find someone to be happy with (that isn't him) because I deserve it.

So at this point I have no idea how to feel. I want to see him again, but I also don't think I can handle that kind of stress of hiding away again, it was hard enough when I felt like I HAD to do it for myself. I just have no idea how to handle this, if I should just see where it goes, because there was a true and meaningful connection beyond the surface unlike the other handful of guys I've been with, or if I should just cut it off so I don't fuck up his life or mine later dkwn the road.

TL;DR I met this guy, we basically were made for each other, he tells me he just wants to be friends, Im hurt, he tells me later that he wants to be more than friends, but just not right now... and I hate waiting.

•On a side note, what is it with these older guys not knowing how to make out? 4/5 Ive been with just open their jaw as wide as possible and either shove their tounge in the back of their throat or sling it down the back of mine. That's not hot, it's not sexy. I need your LIPS, please and thank you.",gay
Normal relationship drive vs my relationship drive.,,gay
Gay Man Accuses Senator Cory Booker Of Sexually Assaulting Him In A Restroom,,gay
Had anal sex and can't stop peeing! Has this happened to any one else?,"So I've taken a few dicks(3 of them) and they usually were average sizes(6 inches), now about 4 days ago I hooked up with a guy who was 7 inches almost 7.5 and we fucked(used protection) and then starting immediately after I got home, less than an hour later, until today(almost 4 days after), I been having the urge to pee a lot! And when I go pee it doesn't burn or anything. I just have the sensation that I have to pee. Is this normal? I've never had this happen After having anal sex. Also I been feeling constipated as well since then too. The urges aren't as strong and frequent now but its still there. Also every time I do go pee urine usually does come out. Sometimes a lot or a little and when I take ibuprofen the urge and feeling goes away. ",gay
Found my dream kitty 😻🌈,,gay
I mightve told my crush i like them and they mightve not responded (gay and scared),,gay
Just your daily dose of mama hugs ❤️🧡💛💙💜 hope everyone had a good day,,gay
Why would my ex drive by my house after he left me? He choose to leave me even after knowing I was sick.,"So my ex boyfriend broke up with me 6 months ago. My ex employer had been harassing us both for 4 years. Then the last few months they started death threats.  Also apparently I was mean to him for 4 years as well, I found out I had a tumor in my brain that effected my emotions extremely bad and I had no idea until April this year.  My ex  knows about the tumor and what it did and knows I’ve gotten medical help to fix it, he also knows I’m no longer with my employer, so all of a sudden after 6 months he drove well out of the way to drive past my house. Why wipeout he do that if he left me? Ana he’s made no contact even after knowing I left my job and had chemotherapy. Why drive by?",gay
It's not all Gucci being straight-acting,"I find myself developing a friendship, making a real bro even, before learning out of the blue that they are homophobic af.

feelsbadman",gay
Cosmo and Wando,,gay
I hate falling easily for boys,"This kid in one of my classes just hugged me one day out of nowhere, and now, I’m obsessed with him. Send help",gay
Co-worker on Grindr,"I've worked at this new job for about a year now. There is this white dude, and he has a pretty nice muscle butt from what I can see. Like every time he walks past me or in my vicinity I'm staring at his butt. 

Anyhoo, very early on I did notice a profile on Grindr. I'm almost certain it's him because of the distance, his face is not on his profile pic but the body looks similar. 

I've NEVER messaged him or anything like that. Especially since we don't REALLY talk to each other all that much. There's occasional ""chat"" but nothing deep and nothing flirty. (additional note: my Grindr profile pic is my full on face - so obvy he knows it's me... and I'm certain he's seen my profile... if I've seen his, y'know) 

&amp;#x200B;

So. 

1) what do YOU guys do in situations like these, because I'm sure this has happened to a lot of you. 

2) what should I do? Because I was JUST looking at him and my first mind told me to at least send him a ""tongue"" emoji. ",gay
Very lost right now,"Hey Reddit. I'm very lost and confused about my sexuality right now and could use some help. Sorry in advance for the poor rambling that is my writing.

&amp;#x200B;

Let me backtrack a little: I (18M) never really felt like other guys my age. Growing up, I played with dolls, was never interested in superheroes or sports or whatever the guys were into, and most of my friends were girls.

&amp;#x200B;

I started to realize towards the end of middle school/my freshman year of high school that I had a thing for guys. I noticed myself wanting closer relationships with them and obsessing over how they dress, look, act, etc. There were several guys in my classes that I couldn't stop looking at/thinking about. I'd wake up and go to bed longing to have a sexy man pulling me closer. I could see how people can think I'm gay (I have my moments where I can be more ""flamboyant"" than usual) but I also feel that I could easily pass as straight. While I've never dated or had a serious relationship with anyone to this day, I'd never felt that same level of sexual attraction with any girl, so I assumed I was gay. I've come out to a few close friends as well as my mom, and luckily all of these people have been really accepting and supportive of me.

&amp;#x200B;

Things have changed since I've started college though. I had fun the first few weeks because there were so many hot guys to look at. I had a guy hit on me (he was drunk but whatever lol) and it felt so good! But the past few weeks have been hell for me. I've been feeling lonelier recently- my school has a larger campus which I guess can get overwhelming at times and it can be hard to find your niche. I've started causally bringing up my sexuality to some people in my dorm, but I seem to find that as soon as I come out, I immediately regret it and start doubting myself. I also have had a few encounters with girls that is making me question if I find them pretty or if I'm sexually attracted to them. All the while, I feel like my feelings for guys (which I had a lot of, *believe me*) aren't as strong anymore. I would have never considered myself to be bi and never would've thought of dating a girl after coming out, and as far as I know I still crave the body and touch of a man. I also have anxiety issues at times so my sexuality has been tormenting me to the max for the past few days and I feel like it's driving me into a depression and pulling me away from my studies. I guess I just thought that everything would be easier once I went to college and I could make a fresh start (my school is very LGBTQ friendly and is an escape from some of the homophobes back home.) In reality, it hasn't been and I feel so alone in all of this. I plan on talking to a therapist, but in the meantime any advice you guys have is very appreciated.💙",gay
Halloween costume ideas,What are you guys dressing up as for Halloween? Or what are some cool ideas that you’re thinking about? I’m drawing a total blank. Preferably something that involves little clothing and lots of makeup lol. ,gay
I’m here trying to save my feeling by not pretending that this chick I’m talking to is giving me fix signals and at a Point where I kinda wanna give up any advice?,,gay
A Vent and a Story (looking for advice),"Hey everybody, I  just need somewhere to vent my feelings since I don't have many gay friends. (I didn't realize how long this was going to be so sorry about that)

So a couple years ago, I met this guy on grindr. He was't very attractive but I decided to give him the time of day so we started chatting and we actually had a lot in common even though he was 10 years older than me. Eventually, we continued talking for hours upon hours, day after day. He always made it clear that he was attracted to me but I wasn't attracted to him and I was a closeted 20 yo (inexperienced and frankly scared of what an actual relationship meant) so I always declined his requests. Even though I always declined ""Anthony"", we still kept talking and I just enjoyed his friendship: we shared stories, opinions, laughs, talked sports, he let me make fun of him, talked shit about other people and overall just enjoyed each others company even though it was over text messaging (eventually calls and vid chats). Eventually, our conversations dwindled down due to life happening but each time we would always come back to each other and start our rapid messaging until all hours of the night.  The whole time I was always convinced I never truly liked him: he was too old, not my type, not in the best shape. Don't get me wrong, I enjoyed his company but didn't think I cared for him in that way. I think after a year of talking with each other, he met someone else. He started talking to this new guy but he would still carry on conversations with me like before. It pains me to say this but, I was kind of thrilled that he kept conversations with me rather than this new guy so I felt like the relationship was a dud so like before I felt I had superiority over him (I swear I am not a bad person). He would always confide in me about his relationship and I was always there for him. As time went on, Anthony's new beau found out about me. Let's just say he wasn't too thrilled and told Anthony to stop talking to me. Of course, Anthony tried to explain there was nothing there, but the jealous \*\*\*\* told Anthony to quit it. So, Anthony and I messaged in secret, when his ""bf"" wasn't around or real late at night. It was nice knowing that Anthony would do this for me even though it was in a platonic way (or so I thought) but the bf figured us out and threatened to leave Anthony if he didn't stop. I realized that what I was doing wasn't right so I told Anthony that we should stop talking for a while, he wasn't really ok about it, he even said he would end the relationship if he thought there was a shot between the two of us but like always I told him no. We stopped talking after that.

Faster forward about a year, out of the blue, I kept constantly thinking about him. So, I decided to message him, and we started talking again. Not like before, it wasn't the same and unbeknownst to me him and that guy were still together. I could tell in his responses that I was the one carrying the conversations and felt an unwelcome vibe so I stopped messaging him. If he wanted to carry a conversation on, he will message me back. He never did. A couple months later, I changed my phone number so there really is no way for him to get a hold of me. I eventually forget about it until like a month ago. I realized what I had with him is something I have never felt with anybody else on this Earth. He just knew me and I knew him and call it strange or what not but I could see past what I thought was unattractive or bad qualities as now something I don't even care about. I can't express how much I miss our conversations and the desire I have to talk to him or what it would like to be with him. I just been having all these emotions about him and I can't get him out of my mind. I have never experienced emotions like this for any guy (especially for someone I have never met in person), I've never even been in love but damn I can't stop with these feelings. 

I just wanted to write this to get all these feelings out in a cathartic type of way. Feel free to comment with questions or what not, I'd like to hear if anybody else has similar experiences. Also, let me know if you think I deserve to feel this way  or just how to get over him.

Lastly, if you have someone that you just adore or makes you feel bubbly inside, shoot you shot despite whatever cons there may be because you may regret in the long run. ",gay
Advice?,Hey. I'm still kinda new to being gay. How do I meet people? I'm really shy and my town doesn't have anywhere for lgbt people to hang out. ,gay
"So I’ve seen a lot about people coming out and losing their parents due to coming out.. I’m a momma, so here’s a big momma hug ♥️♥️ you are so loved",,gay
Is This Bad????,"I recently deleted my account but decided what the heck this is a pretty good advice place. So here I am asking for some more advice.  What is your thought of me a 16 year old boy or guy or whatever you want to call it, going on a gay hook up site and wanting to meet with guys.  I know its dangerous in a way. But I end up telling my besties before I do something bad anyways.  So if I ended up to go missing they'd do something. But I do want to be bottomed or even maybe me topping someone.  So please leave your opinion. 

Thanks, 
Anonymous0506
",gay
How do you know if you’re settling in a relationship?,,gay
Some Advice pls...,"I'm 19 and I am usually more reserved and very proud to have done sexual stuff with few guys, but I moved out of my home for college reasons, after a month I was on gaychatrandom and met a dude, and we met, in my place and while I didn't deny the kiss I resisted a lot when he kept constantly asking me to give him a handjob, but eventually he convinced me, the thing is after that I really don't have a hold of myself I did stuff with 2 other dudes after, and eventually met a sweet guy and we met for coffee first, then went to his place to watch a movie and we cuddled and his computer overheated before the movie ended, as we waited for it to cooldown I eventually kissed him and so on.... but then he stopped me and I agreed because I actually liked him and I wanted to go slower.... but after a weekend without jerking I got crazy horny and did stuff with one of the previous guys, and now I feel like a whore... Someone pls tell me how to stop, my hormones are going crazy and I'm hating myself and feeling disgusted of myself.... Should I even keep meeting the other guy? I feel like I don't deserve him... ",gay
Should I stay in this relationship?,"Hi guys. I’m new to relationships and I’ve been really struggling with this guy whom I’ve been with for the last 2 months.

He’d been with someone for two years before i came into the picture. They had to separate in May because his ex moved thousands miles away to pursue his PHD. Since then they’ve been in touch everyday. Phone calls(they stopped calling because I told the guy I’m seeing I don’t like it) texts etc.  he promised me they are only friends and even tried to show me their text messages. Should I be upset about it?

He’s very shy and introverted. When we started dating, he would send me messages to check on me. Now he goes to work, I go to school or to my part time job. We never text each other unless he wants to ask me if I would like to come over to his place. And I’m basically staying at his place every night for the past couple weeks. 

He never says “I miss you” or “ I love you”. 

We never hang out any where else besides his apartment which makes me pretty depressed coz I’m an active person who enjoys outdoor activities. I asked once. He told me I could still do whatever I would like to do and maybe he will start going to the gym downstairs. I asked because I want us to do something together. 

He doesn’t have any issues with any of my decisions with my other friends. I told him I would go on a four day Halloween trip with a gay friend and all he said was okay. He’s so chill and calm that makes me wonder if he really cares about me.

I know he still wants to be with me all the time and he would never cheat. He’s off Grindr since we started dating but he doesn’t mind if I’m still there. 

Anyway, I described the best I can as English isn’t my first language. Do you guys think this relationship still makes sense? Should I stay or leave? I’m really confused and frustrated sometimes. I just wanted to find a place to vent and hopefully to find some helpful advice as well.

Best wishes to you all. 






",gay
Brother says he’s flustered,"My brother [15] doesn’t know what he classifies himself. Being his sister makes me cringe inside because I know he’s different, &amp; he definitely not straight? But he says he doesn’t like guys nor girls. He’s more on the feminine side though. 
He’s on the color- guard team and is working hard to be a majorette for his band. He tells me, he’s not into men nor into girls? I see him distressed about classifying himself? So... can anyone help? I know he’s told me that people get really offended on what you say; just to be clear, I don’t mean or want to offend anyone. Just want help my little brother find his peace. ",gay
I’m bisexual but have only dated girls. How do I date guys?,Hello r/gay I hope it’s okay to post here if I’m bi. I was wondering if anyone could help me figure out some big differences between dating girls can guys? I have no clue how to meet guys and I don’t know what a relationship would be like. I worry I don’t understand the dynamics and would be weird or awkward. Any help is appreciated. ,gay
Me looking at my crush,,gay
Dealing with casual homophobia,"I live in a 3rd-world country and, despite me believing things'll get better, casual homophobia is really getting on my nerves.
Recently I was drinking with my current and some ex-coworkers and one of ex-coworkers, who is a head of department now, told a story about some gay guy making an article at company news site about high levels of homophobia in our society being cruel and dehumanizing.

- He wants us to treat them like normal humans (laughs).
- Hope you fired him?
- I wish. He is not my subordinate or I'd drive him out.

Then everybody just laughed and went on to other topics. I was like ""ha-ha"" and continued drinking beer.

I'm, obviously, in a closet and till 24 was a virgin, cause I was afraid to make a Grindr profile. Now I'm trying to get it on, but things like this do crush my hopes to be myself, find a nice bf to cuddle with and stop feeling so lonely.
I have no idea what I should start with to improve my situation and self.
Maybe someone here went through stories like that and can give some advice.",gay
When a bottom’s ass gains sentience,,gay
Confused with colleague’s behavior towards me,"Hi everyone, I am new to Reddit and after a long thought made an account so I could kindly ask for an advice in this great community. This is a longer story, so please bear with me.
I’m 25 and gay, but have not really been in a real relationship yet.
I work for a pretty small company (~20 people). We are a good team, although I do get along with some colleagues more than with others, based on our similar views and life.
About 2 months ago I started noticing that one of my colleagues, let’s call him Simon, began to act strangely towards me - he began talking to me more, asking me more personal stuff and most importantly, get physically close to me or seek out opportunities to get closer to me. I couldn’t see it for a while, but it hit me when I was about to give a presentation at university as a rep for our company and came all dressed up in the morning to work. He started really complimenting my look and how I styled my hair. Then he stood up from his chair and said “oh, you just have something here” and reached out to my hair and started touching it. It felt really awkward for me, but I said nothing and just stood there.
From then on, I remembered all the situations where he got really close to me or literally made up situations to get close to me.
A couple of weeks ago we had a teambuilding and I sat next to him when we were eating and he constantly put this foot next to mine, so they would touch. The same with our arms touching. Anytime I pulled away, he reached backed and touched me after a few moments. 
After lots of these ‘signals,’ I really thought he was trying to tell me he had feelings for me and didn’t know how to tell me. I tried inviting him and a couple of other colleagues (so that it wouldn’t be too obvious) to my place for an after-work hangout. He kept refusing so many time that I grew frustrated and I just told him that he doesn’t have to come and I’m not forcing him. 
Whenever I tried to get closer to him, he kept pushing away, which made me even more confused as to what is going on.
I then once (recently) accidentally saw how he was texting his guy friend some heart &amp; love emojis through Messenger. I also saw he had him on speed dial on his phone.
However, Simon is still giving me all these signs, like when we take a group photo at work, he always pushes away anyone standing next to me and stands himself next to me, so he can touch me. He makes of fun, but in a light hearted way. He keeps asking me stuff (like about my family, hobbies, etc.) that he had never asked anyone else at work. It’s gotten to a point that one colleague noticed Simon’s different behavior towards me and asked me about it. I said I didn’t notice anything. 

So, here I am, asking you for an advice or maybe an insight. I can’t get my head around it and it’s starting to drive me crazy, as I genuinely like him, get along so well with him and we share a lot of similar mindsets. But at this point I just feel like he’s playing with me. 

Thanks!

-CryingAtDiscoteque ",gay
Goodnight everyone. Sleep tight and remember you matter. ♥️,,gay
Going to try out GSA,"Finally have the balls to go to my school's GSA. It's going to be loud, there's going to be a shitload of people I don't know, but I'm gonna try it out. I do wish there were more guys in it though lmao. Went once and there were only like 4 ish. Don't blame em though, it's harder I feel for guys to be open about being queer (at my school I mean) because the guys here are super masc and may not be okay with gay dudes, even if they are masc gay dudes. Queer girls here on the other hand are very open and don't take shit when it comes to homophobia and other forms of bigotry. I wish queer and trans people could be more open in general. ",gay
Old fling,"Why is it so hard for gay men to be honest with their feelings? Is it because people are afraid of rejection so they settle for something less? 

I had this old fling and what we had was fun. We confessed our feelings for each other and after we still had great sex but things kinda went south. It felt like I was always initiating the conversations so I gradually stopped to see what he would do and he didn't do anything so I was kinda bummed out and left it as that. But now I see him again and damn he's hella fine lol. Don't know if I should try again idk. He did say that he's bad at texting but idk idk Haha. Guess I'm going to be single forever ",gay
"Been talking to a guy for about a week now but he keeps giving me the cold shoulder. I keep going back and forth between, ""I deserve better."" and ""Give him another chance."" He also thought I was ditching him to go out with someone else just because I didn't go clubbing with him because I had work.",,gay
"Im straight, but I needed to talk. I have social anxiety and depression so badly and it hurts me to be made fun of about taking my meds. It’s not my fault that I’m this way. I wish everyday that I wasn’t.",,gay
Being gay,I hate being gay. It's the worst curse in the world.,gay
Need someone I have no connection with to talk to,I just have some things I want to unload about relationships and such can’t tell anyone I know. I just want to say it to someone. Any takers?,gay
"It's over, isn't it?","so,you're reading my post. how sweet of you. 

I'm still not over you. The way you made me feel, how you talked to me, how you made me feel special, how we felt like we were made for each other. I'm still not over how you ended all that by leaving me clueless, lost, swept away by my own dreadful thoughts of what I might've done wrong to you. I'm still not over what we were, and what we hoped we were going to be, but you seem to be doing just fine. I think it's pretty clear it's over, so why can't I move on? ",gay
Can I use LGBT slang?,"Before i post, as a gay guy,I would like to say that this is a genuine question. If you find this offensive, I’m sorry it was not my intention.
     Some words can only be said if you’re a certain race. For example the n word. Just as a curiosity, If im gay can i use words like dyke and faggot?",gay
Seeking older mem,"Hi Im 38 and I love older men. I love to show them my cock and jerk off for them online. If you are older and want to watch me, send me a message. ",gay
need gay-torrents.org invite,"please i need an invite to gay-torrents.org

if you can invite me i would really appreciate it. thanks in advance",gay
U gay.,And that’s ok.,gay
Gay romance for us,"One of the most common misconceptions about gay relationships is we don't do foreplay and stuff like that.  Straight people think it is all about sex and hookups for us.

&amp;#x200B;

Well, last night while watching Halloween H20 in the family room, we took our clothes off and started doing it.  Oops, the lube is upstairs.  So, we went upstairs and spent the next hour doing stuff.  We talked, he gave me a BJ, we talked some more, he gave me more BJ, I topped him, we talked, we cuddled, etc. Then we went back down to the family room.  We started doing it again.  We talked.  He sat on me facing me.  We made out.  We had sex again.  We climaxed together again.  Cleaned up.  Oh, it's been almost 2 hours?  Find where we left off in the movie. 

&amp;#x200B;

We made cookies (yes, homemade cookies) together while keep watching H20.  Then while eating our homemade cookies, we cuddled and watched Haunting of Hill House.

&amp;#x200B;

We got married when we were really poor so we never had a honeymoon.  So, this past week we decided to book a week long vacation in Cancun as our belated honeymoon.  Better late than never!  Why the hell didn't we think of booking a vacation for our 6th anniversary we celebrated a week ago?

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, I guess what I'm trying to say in too many words is I know a lot of you guys don't want to enter a committed relationship and worry more about hookups.  I encourage you give long term commitment a chance.  It gives you time to explore each other and build up the security and romance between each other, something that is lacking in most hookups.  ",gay
Self confidence and the relation to male body image/my own weird sexual kink,"So I have no idea where to start, but I just recently came out about half a year ago more or less, which was so terrifying as I was outcasted the first time I did in high school and it kind of held on to my mind for a bit longer than I had hoped (even now i still feel like my friends may not like me just for who I am but I know that it's a different group of people and I didnt do anything wrong back then)

With that being said... I feel great now, just being able to talk about guys around straight friends guys or girls and them just being happy about me not being so closed up as I was before, but since coming out I've noticed I really have no interest in relationships and don't really view myself as a sexual person.

For the 21 years of my life I've never had any relationships which obviously stems from me being closeted and not wanting to play with girl's feelings. But doing so has made me feel very unnatractive, not necessarily ugly just I feel so lost in this whole game of life knowing Ive never had my first experiences many should've had a while ago.

At this point im not worried about the relationships but im young and thirsty and all i want to do is fuck.. thing is im insecure about my body for being formerly severely overweight, from 270 pounds to roughly 200 now but I've been going to the gym lifting weights for 2 years now. 

Ive always viewed the ideal male body shape as very muscular people and I feel like I dont or wont be considered attractive without a six pack (i already have the muscles everywhere else) but not only that i find myself liking extremely muscular men as well as muscular men who are a bit into gaining a gut. 

I dont know where im going with this I just wanted to rant but has anyone else hadproblems with their own body insecurity/sort of fat shamed themselves or been confused since I genuinely like bulkier guys but I feel my own self loathing anytime i try to add weight on top of the muscles I've built in the gym. As well as if anyone can explain why I like men who would go to extremes of being 300 pounds of pure muscle or men like eddie hall who are just as large as possible",gay
Wow a music producer said that,,gay
Simon after he came out,,gay
This guy is asking for it.,,gay
I'm in an amazing mood!,"I don't usually say this, but I am feeling so gay today! In both terms (happy and actually gay). I don't know why, I just do. I spent an amazing day with my friends, and when all but one of them left, me and him just cuddled up together for a bit. Still continuing, I just danced around the room to Ellie Goulding's ""Still falling for you"" (Bridget Jones' Baby) like a complete and utter idiot. God I'm so happy. I hope you feel happy too. Have a great day (or night)",gay
Should I try gay sex again?,"So basically I have always been in a straight relationship with females. I had never so much as touched/kissed a man in a sexual way. I’ve had contact in the gym, boxing sessions and changing rooms with men but never anything sexual or sexual thoughts during. 

I have however had thoughts of being with a man and with me currently being single it’s gradually grown into a desire. So I thought I would act on it. Now I’m obviously not going to come out as gay or bi sexual and label it when I had no idea what it was, I didn’t really want it posting on social media like Grindr etc or go to local gay bars where it’s more talking. I had a look and thought gay saunas would be the best option for that physical feeling with no strings if it wasn’t for me. 

I went to one, it was very quiet only 4 other people, far enough from home to not know anyone and close enough so I didn’t have to stay over. Walked past someone in the jacuzzi and someone in the corridor who started following me about and then sat in the sauna where there was someone my age. He was sat looking nervous but putting a confident front on with a towel open at the front. 

I started a small chat found out he had been to one before. Said he had interest in girls too, I don’t believe this though. He was shocked at my lack of experience or lack of it at all, so pretty much suggested we masturbate together. We started and I moved over to sit next to him and we started doing it to each other and progressed onto kissing. 

Now this is where it gets complicated. I don’t know if it was the fact that I’m just not into guys or that I wasn’t into him.  

There was an obvious difference between us in most ways. I don’t want to sound like a prick but I had trained 8 times in the last 6 days so at 6ft with a large veiny member and a face to match the body I seemed to make him nervous but horny as hell. His way of kissing did nothing for me! The fact he kept wanting to do it everywhere did nothing for me and his body didn’t either. 

It progressed and we did oral which I didn’t enjoy giving as much as I thought I would. Strangely though I want to try it again, I don’t know if this is my competitive streak coming out from sport and wanting to constantly do better. He played with my arse which was good and I will probably now try myself. 

Now when it came to finishing he was constantly pushing me away because he was about to cum. However for me after over an hour playing about I took his hand off and took over myself and even with him playing with my arse I really had to go for it to finish off. 

He then stayed with me right up to getting changed commenting on my underwear then got his phone out wanting to swap some form of details. I declined and it seemed to crush him sending him bright red which I feel horrendous about. 

So really what I’m asking is should I try again with someone else or just give up on guys as a been there done that. I feel like I could go either way and really don’t know if it was just the wrong person or wrong sex. ",gay
Them straight guys,"When I was in college I fell hard for this straight friend of mine. The most painful part was he knew about it and we talked about our feelings but noting happened. It's a long story but to this day I have not met a guy like him that literally took my breath away. And to this day I haven't walked with someone in the rain without an umbrella. Took me two years to get over him. I know, pathetic, since we didn't even date but I know those feelings we had for each other were  real. That's why it was so painful.  To this day I still think about him every once in a while. ",gay
Falling for someone who doesn’t fit in your social life?,"I’m 30 and a guy I’m dating is 39. Which isn’t a huge age difference except my friends act 23 and he acts 57

On top of that he’s a bear(which I love) and I’m kind of a twink. My friends don’t really get why I am attracted to him.

Obviously I don’t really care about what they think of him physically but I will admit whenever we combine it’s like having an old man in a room of dumb twinks. 

Also I still love a good dance . Love a wild night out and he doesn’t. He is much slower. I mean he still reads the newspaper... and that turns me the fuck on. 

Also he’s great in bed.

I kind of love him but it does complicate life a bit

Sometimes I’m out dancing alone
Or my friends will not want to invite him to their  crazy parties.

I’m getting old anyway but it’s confusing 

When combining the two it’s socially just awkward.

",gay
I love you all and internet hugs for you all♥️🧡💛💚💙💜,,gay
Gay men and substance abuse,"This is a personal, possibly insensitive question, but I want to learn.

I've (33 straight M) meet hundreds of gay men, been to several gay clubs, even was a best man for my good friend at his wedding to his husband last year, but have never gotten a straight answer. Do a majority of gay men drink heavily or do/have done a lot of drugs? In my personal experience, all of the gay men I've met have had a substance abuse issue.

I've never meet a sober gay man or one that has never had a drug problem. I'm hoping that I'm just ignorant, but I wanted to get some feedback, hopefully from the gay community.

My theory is, because our society has been so ignorant and intolerant of the gay community, the gay men, prior to coming out (or sometimes after), turned to drugs and alcohol as an escape from the hatred and ignorance they may have faced from friends, family, and/or society.

Any insight? Sorry if this came of as super ignorant or mean. You gotta rustle some feathers to learn sometimes...",gay
RantCMV: most homophobic people should leave earth and move to the MOON and live there alone because they are just evil!!!!,"
they should be lonely on the moon and never return to earth!!! most of them are evil and ruining gay youths like mine. literally, I spent my childhood crying because I got attacked by them every day at school when I was younger.

now I am 16 and I am stronger, I realize that they should fuck off this earth so this earth will be more beautiful. they can move to the moon, please move to moon homophobic motherfuckers!!!!

I really wish I had got a taser when I was younger so these kids could not have beaten me!!!! now I don't tase these bullies so people need to calm down. I have tased no one!!!

",gay
I swing both ways but now i want gays,"HMU ON SNAPCHAT : abradinezad
Im looking for friend and ship 😘",gay
I like being friends with gay people,"It started when i was about 11 years old and i was an introvert then i met this kid who was very kind and very funny...

We started having sleepovers and stay up all night, tell stories, etc.... 

Then came this one night he admitted to me he was gay and he felt very nervous telling me because he was always rejected by some other kids but he was suprised that i had accepted the fact he was gay

Then i realised that i have more gay friends than straight friends i don't know why but there is something about being friends with gay people that i can't really describe...

But i could say that i liked it..  And btw the kid i mentioned became my best friend for 5 years
😊😊😊",gay
"newly bicurious, need advice"," 26/m, only been in traditional relationships with women my entire life.

i've been wanting to experience more and had more abundant thoughts of being with another guy or testing the waters of that situation for some time now. i don't feel comfortable going ""out"" to pursue this and as such am resorting to online/apps.

what i want to know is, what is my best course of action to really get some experience or know what to try and with who?

i don't find male face/body particularly arousing - but the thought of experimenting is a huge turn on to the point i want to branch out.

send help.",gay
I think I am gay... help,Title ,gay
"Hello! I'm feeling lonely, anyone to talk?","Btw, im 19",gay
Thoughts about dick pics,I personally like them,gay
Fuck hormones tbh,"I have a crush on a straight friend. He's really nice and I love being around him BUT I don't know if he considers me a friend. I definitely consider him a friend, but we really only ever talk when I initiate conversation or the one off chance he invites me over to his to get high. I don't know how to tell when someone considers me a friend or if I'm just an acquaintance. I really want to be better friends with him. I keep thinking about him and how fuckin adorable he is and his giggle. I keep thinking about the one time he stayed over at my house and I got to see him with bed head and how he fell asleep on me when he was high. I wish all this could be directed at someone I had a chance with and not someone that may not even quite consider me a friend. He just looks so huggable. I don't have any friends really to tell this to so my ramble is going here. ",gay
"Frankly, I can only be myself with this person","Hi all,   


I'm isoeugenol, and since some years, well, and since I met this person, my life is not basically the same.   
I also kind of think about him in the past while drunk or drugged, but well--- I've never jerked off about him, because i still find women actractive.   
Well... how to start telling that I feel like follow in love with him with more like super-bros, lik super-friend. I think he's like straight more or less, he has an open relationship with this girl. But well... I'm saying that I've finally decide my sexuality but fucking hell, finally I found a person that is like very very like me, with more and down, it's like for me air for the fire. I also met in the past women like this, but it was different. I feel honestly, my sexuality is changed.   
Maybe I'd fuck him in the future? i like him? yes ofc. It's very disturbing but also depressing since without life is not just as great. BUT hey! I've never had friends like him, and I fucking feel with him the energy in my life.   
I would like to explore much as possible sexual aspect of this, i'm curious you know? Maybe it's just a represed bi-part of me or something, but damn... I know sounds too strange, but NO ONE in my life is like him no one.   
I like to be myself with him, i like not to worry about. Like, heyyy I can finally be myself.   


I couldn't see him in the past for months and it was depressing like hell, i was very bad. fuck   
and last day I was talking to him about something and one girl said to us: Well, you look like a good bro-couple. And i was like yeaaaaa   
Btw, maybe it sounds like strange but thanks to reddit because I'm writing this, and no, I don't get a boner while writing this, but who knows.   


Cheers",gay
Just came out at 35 years old and it feels good to finally be myself. It's never too late,,gay
Bisexual relationship,"Would you ever get into a serious relationship with a guy who's bisexual? And I'm talking about the ""w'ere gonna get married at the end"" kind of relationship.",gay
[Crushes] I'm lost when it comes to this,,gay
New to all of this,"22 years old, and just recently realized I have a pretty strong taste for guys, never been involved in this world before though. What's it like? What does it entail? How do I involve myself?",gay
I’ll just never understand how people can look down on us,,gay
Moving forward...,"I don't even know if it's about being gay because its been over 4 months since I came out. But I don't know why I kind of still hide. I've got friends and family I don't lie to anymore but if they joke / talk about me and a chick I don't say anything.

I was super down in may right after coming out but a 2 - 3 week vacation in june on the beach snapped me out of it. Since then its just been up and down but a little in each direction. Found myself sighing a lot, like a lot a lot, in the last day and that's so much worse than crying.

Aside from talking to someone that's a psych does anyone have any ideas?",gay
At a bar w some friends omfg i wanna dip,So I dunno what to do to not seem like a massive dick,gay
Am i being stupid?,"So im 16 still in Highschool and independent. I think i want to get a bf but my school doesn’t really support that, actually their completely against it and i can’t enter bars yet so I’ve been thinking about online dating apps like grinder or bumble. Am i rushing something that can easily make life harder? ",gay
Who are you favourite models?,Mine would probably be Augusta Alexander and Matthew Noszka among others ,gay
Amen brothers,,gay
1st time dating app advice???,"It's been forever since I came out it seems like (april/may)  and I still haven't really put myself out there. I gave myself til the end of the year to at least try. I'm not looking for a quick hookup so tinder/grinder I feel weird about.

Any advice ty",gay
How do you get over a straight guy?,"So I’ve never really liked anyone before, but I haven’t been able to get this guy off my mind for a while, then I forgot about him over summer break, and now he’s back on my mind. I assume he’s straight bc he’s only dated girls. We’re in choir together so I’m around him all the time. I’m just tryna get him off my mind, but idk how to do that. You guys know how?",gay
"As a gay person, If you won the 1 billion dollar mega million, other then investing, paying your bills, and/or your family’s bills, what is the next 3 things would do with the money?",,gay
Boo boo,,gay
Honest opinion on me? Rate me out of 10?,,gay
Help on a Complex Situation with Friends and Dating,"So for a brief history, I dated someone at work for about two weeks about a month and a half ago, and I had an interest in him, but eventually I decided that I just thought of him as a really good friend.  Fast forward to a few weeks later, and I was hanging out with my best guy friend that also works at the same place, and an incident happened where we got close and then there was an interest for a few weeks until we decided to start dating when we confessed our mutual feelings.   However, the three of us are pretty close, and I wanted to tell my ex about it before news got to him from someone else, but my current bf told quite a few people at work, word got around, and now my ex knew about us before I could tell him because I’ve been sick for like the past week and a half and haven’t seen him, so that’s not going according to plan.  Now I’m stuck in this dilemma where I had to call my ex and tell him instead of in person, and he’s doing fairly well, even though he doesn’t like people victimizing him, but meanwhile, I’m pretty mad at my current bf for being a blabber mouth that caused this to get back to my ex/our good friend all while I’m learning that a good people at work our vilifying me, which is fair since this is my fault (even though I was basically forced into the first relationship by them) but also for going through with dating my best friend, which I know could hurt my ex, plus it doesn’t help that my current bf can be kinda petty and occasionally rude to others that he “thinks” did them wrong, which I try to smooth things over between them, but I realize that in both of these relationships, I kinda was helping them get through problems and grow, and while I’m not scared of them, I realized it’s not my job either because I make them codependent on me like I have with numerous other friends and crushes.  Therefore, I don’t even know if this is gonna work out with my bf because I’ve been having some doubts in the past three weeks (the length of this relationship) and after this I honestly rather end it and try to keep them both as friends than just pick one, but honestly it’s kinda hard, but I also don’t want people to see me as the bad guy, which won’t help if I break up with my current bf, so I’m kinda stuck and pretty stressed and honestly would rather be kinda alone than with someone, so in summary, that’s that, so there’s not a whole lot people can recommend, but I’m curious to hear some thoughts on this all.",gay
first kiss,"so i met this guy on instagram and we went to a first date which we both agreed was very enjoyable. we haven't stopped talking since by texting and we literally talked all day every day but had no chance to meet up again until today.

so there's this party he invited me to go with him tonight and i kinda can't stop thinking about kissing him. i never kissed before in my life so i'm super nervous. i don't know what will happen and if it'll happen and if it will so what will it feel like.

should i initialize the kiss? or should i just wait for him to make the first move? how do i find the right moment to do it at a party?

thanks in advance!",gay
The color gradient of this pepper.,,gay
Where is everyone?,"I'm recently out, living in the suburbs of Northern Virginia. I can't find the gays. No support groups, no casual or interest-based groups, nothing. There's one social group, but it led to me getting a 30-minute lecture from an Elder Gay about home yogurt making. So, r/gay, where do the newly-out go to find community in the burbs?

Edit: I’m 35",gay
Trying to communicate about what I’m looking for,"So...essentially I’m looking for a f-buddy, thing is, I don’t really know how to say that to someone I like, without feeling kinda disgusting. So, does anyone know of of any terms I can use that don’t feel/sound as grimy as f-buddy?

~I’m not trying to slut shame or anything. I’m just tying to find some terms I can use until I get used to talking about stuff like that with guys. 

Also, what’s the difference between friends with benefits and an f-buddy?

Thanks in advance",gay
Another question which is also an Overshare...,"Thanks to the responses I received from my first response, I feel more comfortable asking this (embarrassing) question. This is another Overshare, so if you don't want your eyes to bleed, stop reading now. 

Last warning...turn away now! 







Okay. You asked for it! 








Since discovering the joys of anal sex, a problem I've merely considered annoying is interfering with my desired lifestyle. Quite simply, getting fucked exacerbates my hemorrhoids. Is there anything that can be done about this? 


",gay
Building our first house!,,gay
Dumbass question from a dumbass (trying to be better) guy.,"I'm a guy with a family that lives in Utah County Ut.  My whole upbringing all I have ever seen or been taught about gay people or any ideals remotely similar, is that it's bad.. My parents were actually very neutral and would never say anything about it one way or another, but being in the 'Mormon culture' meant being tought that the it was all bad and sinfull.  Well thankfully I had the internet and a few alternative views from friends, lucky for me I started thinking for myself.  So here I am almost 40 and am wanting to redeem myself a bit for my younger ignorance. Recently ditched and resigned from the Mormon church, can I get a hallelujah!  Like I said, I'm in the middle of anti gay central, I own a 4 door diesel truck, very manly right?, and I want nothing more than to show my love for the lgbtq community around here. Maybe once a month I'll see an Lgbtq sticker on a vehicle and I just don't think that's enough. A couple weeks ago I bought a rainbow triangle sticker with the words ""ally"" on it, planning to put it on the back window.   My worry is that I may be over looking something and just wanted to double check with this community to see if this is a good way to support yalls?   Since leaving this silly religion, I  have found that I really just want to love all people no matter what.  If I'm being ignorant in some other way I want to know, just trying to be the best me I can be.   I know this could be such a stupid post to some people, like I need permission to put a sticker in my window, but fuck that, I ask what I ask and am going straight to the source haha.  Peace! ",gay
"A friendly LGBTQA discord server for anime, gaming, and other hobbies!", [https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY](https://discord.gg/NhbJqDY) This is a new server I just created for everyone in the LGBTQA+ community! We have channels for all your interests even though we are anime and gaming focused. We also have trans specific channels and support/venting channels. We're growing steadily now! ,gay
I love being gay!!,,gay
Tinder or nah?,"I’m sure this has been asked multiple times, but looking for a fresh answers of what people in the gay community feel of tinder?

I have somewhat thought as a necessary thing just because of visibility of seeing people, rather then the near impossibility in the real world, that dating apps bring to the table. But at the same time I would love to not have it, and meet someone in person...

Sometimes I feel it may distract me a bit much, but in general I think of this subject more than enough being 20 and not have really experienced anything.",gay
Low self esteem 🙄,"So I’m trying to do the whole ‘let’s meet guys’ thing 🤢🤮....🙄😅😂. Thing is, there’s moments when low self esteem starts knocking on the door, which is annoying, and basically turns me off the whole idea of it all and basically run away from it all (metaphorically). I know it has in part something to do with low self esteem. 

Thing is though, I know it’s me just being a bit insecure cause I haven’t done any of that stuff before. As well as me thinking that the other guy is probably going to try and find someone ‘better’ after they’ve got what they want. Thing is, I know after I’ve gotten past the initial stage of it all, I’ll probably be fine. 

But I’ve gotten to the point where I’ve gotten so used to not having ever done that stuff, that I’ve become ‘comfortable’ with the though that I won’t ever really experience that stuff. I dunno...

So in essence, how do you guys get over all that stuff?  Also, being in a relationship or ‘friends’ is not something that’s really on the table either at this point. ",gay
Question about generalised homosexual male behaviour.,"This is like a half joke half serious question.

&amp;#x200B;

IF you had to pick one would you rather say that gay men are like heterosexual women in male bodies, or rather they are like lormal men that just like other men. I'm thinking about stereotypical behaviour patterns when you think about male vs female. Which side would you say they generally lean towards.",gay
Big Gay ramble,"For the past two days or so I've been hit with the Big Gay and have been listening to gay songs without end and feeling much more intense about the guy I have a crush on. Though because of the big gay I've also been thinking a lot about my ex and how I'm actually still fucking in love with him and it confuses the hell outta me because how can you love someone, but be romantically interested in someone else (aside from polyamory) bc I'm a very monogamous guy so why would I feel that way? It's weird. Feelings are weird. I just want someone to be in love with me again and to live the rest of my life with. I miss being in a relationship. I miss being loved and I especially miss being loved by my ex. I want to spoil someone and I want someone to lay my head on when I'm tired and someone to fall asleep next to or someone's hand to hold and face to touch. I want someone to love me and for me to love them. I want them to run their hands through my hair and tell me how much they love me and I want to do the same to them. I want to help take care of someone and for them to help take care of me. I miss being in a loving relationship. ",gay
Drôle de Félix (2000) aka The Adventures of Felix,,gay
Is it normal to never date even I have been out for 10 years?,"As titled, I was out since I was 10.  (And now I am 20), but I never able to date a single man.  I honestly do not know what to do to find someone   I like/love.  Any suggestions pls?",gay
Responding to Grindr messages,"There was a post a few days ago about how rude it was to ignore grindr messages and that people should just say they aren't interested. I never respond to messages and was skeptical, to me flat out rejection seemed harsher than nothing. I assumed I'd get a lot of ""you're not that cute/ you are making a mistake"". To my surprise nearly everyone responded with ""thank you"" or ""no worries"". Thanks gay community for being pleasant people!",gay
"I need help finding my friend a boyfriend in texas. He's a real nice guy, but is having a hard time finding love.",,gay
Question...,I am a 41 year old who is recently out (kind of...its a long story) and have a question about anal. Is this an appropriate place to ask? I'm also new to Reddit so I'm being cautious. ,gay
People who add everyone from tinder on Facebook?,"What do you all think of this? I always run across people on tinder that have so many tinder people added in their Facebook; and it just seems so weird to me. It sort of turns me off as it seems like they are just being with everyone. 

I mean I have very few gay friends personally, and maybe I’m just jealous or have problems trusting people after seeing stuff; but should that be a red flag, or turn off of some sort?",gay
Winnie the Ho,,gay
First time with a guy and it felt great!,"I'm 19 I came out like 2 years ago, but haven't had sex with a guy yet, I went on grindr ""Shocker"". At the time I found a nice guy, cute and was funny, got a date with him and it went great, went home to his appartment, and we had sex.
And waow it felt amazing first time with a guy, felt like being on a cloud, it might be weird that I type this, just wanted to tell someone 
xoxo",gay
Question on Dallas or any bath house experience,"Hello, just wondering if any Dallas guys here ever been to club Dallas or just any bath house. Really curious about suggesting to my partners we go but don't really know what to expect. So my question is what's it like, if you've been what was your experience?

Also nervous because I'm not exactly a muscle stud and would feel uncomfortable if that's all there is in there. ",gay
*Me when my friend start bragging about his dick*,,gay
Question to those who prefer to be single,"Met this guy off grindr awhile back and he's a really awesome dude, he's an older larger guy and probably isn't most peoples type but I was attracted to him mostly off of his personality. He let me know he wasn't looking to date when I first met him but I thought that would change as we continued to mess around and get to know each other; but when I told him I was interested in dating, I got rejected. He told me he still doesn't want to commit to anyone and it surprised me cause I know we were both enjoying each other. Why are some people so against wanting to be in a relationship? I wasn't hurt since he told me from day one what he wanted now I'm just curious on why tbh",gay
"Be who you are and say how you feel, those who mind, don’t matter,&amp; those who matter don’t mind ♥️🧡💛💚💙💜",,gay
Forreal tho.,,gay
[Self] Am I a Diglett or a Dicklett ?,,gay
This prophylactic method might quicken the end of AIDS.,,gay
Seeking new gay friends in the gym,Hi darlings :) I just got a new gym membership here in Mexico City where I live and I wanted to ask you If I have a good chance there to make new gay friends? yeah first time I get into a gym. ,gay
Add my snap for a good time at theboys037,,gay
Torrent invites,"Does anybody have a r/https://gay-torrents.org or  r/https://www.gaytorrent.ru  invite they could send my way, would really appreciate it :-)",gay
Just Came Out And It Went Well!,That's all. Thanks!,gay
Under one Roof,,gay
"seriously, homophobic people should hate theirselves till they leave this earth","i really hope all homophobic guys can fall in a rainy day and get their balls hurt so they would be sterile.

and homophobic bitches will marry the worst kind of husbands who will beat their heads everynight.

homophobic people deserve worse and worse than that. honestly they can choke!!!

hope homophobic bullys at school will get more than 10 STDs at age 20s. xoxo!

i am not triggered. i am just so chilled right now popping Zoloft",gay
TIL I'm still gay,,gay
Best theory.,,gay
"Is this love or desire? Because I want him, and I want him bad.","I’m falling for my coworker and it’s bad! He’s so cute, he’s quiet and mysterious I just want to know everything about him. His cute little shy boy smile drives me crazy and I can’t help but stare at him while at work. It’s incredible how his presence makes my day that much better. I last saw him 2 days ago and I cannot keep my mind off of him. I don’t know why, this has never happened to me. The thing is I don’t even know him that well. But it’s impossible to not picture him all the time, while anxiously waiting to go to work, just to see him. There’s no real words to describe exactly what I’m feeling but I’m going mad thinking about him day and night, I don’t mind it, but my heart can’t take it anymore. 
I’ll definitely talk to him next time I see him, and show my interest, let him know and figure out if this will ever go anywhere. In the meantime I’ll have to find other ways to cope with this intense but unknown feeling.",gay
Rise in reported LGBT+ hate crime in UK a 'wake-up call',,gay
Does anyone have a gay-torrents.org invite?,"I'm looking for an invite to the site [https://gay-torrents.org/](https://gay-torrents.org/), if anyone can help me out that would awesome!",gay
"Anti-LGBT+ teachings 'mainstream' in Australian churches, report finds",,gay
Got my nipples pierced:),"Finally did it! :) Keen for more piercings. I'm thinking about a PA, Guiche, Naval and Tongue. What do you guys think? What do you recommend? Experiences? ",gay
I’m planning to come out for the first time tomorrow. I’m nervous.,"So tomorrow I am planning to come out to one of my close friends and I’m really nervous. I have never come out to anyone ever. Quick background info: I am 19 and in college and have suspected I was gay for a while but I’m pretty sure everyone thinks I’m asexual because I have been hiding any feelings for years. My friend is in the same age as me and is a strait female. Tomorrow night there is a LGBTQ+ allyship night on campus and we are going together which isn’t particularly a giveaway because we are both on student council so we go to campus events all the time. I decided I want to come out to her when I see her for some reason (I guess the theme of the event got me thinking) and suddenly this secret I have kept for years is crushing me. I already texted her that I have something important to talk to her about in person so that I can’t loose my nerve and back out. I’m not sure were or how I want to do it and it is making me anxious so I would apriciate any advice. I don’t want to do it on the bus to or in the event because it’s not really something I want people to overhear. Given the nature of the event it could be beneficial to do it before I go in so she knows but I’m also worried I will be emotionally a wreck right before I go in if I do it before. I’m not worried about how she’ll take it because she is the most liberal person I know and I know she has several LGBTQ+ friends already, it’s more the where/how that is giving me anxiety.",gay
Rainbow Arcade - Queer Video Game History,,gay
FYI- You can also text the crisis hotline,,gay
Monogamy is a religious and social construct.,"I don’t like that fact, but I accept it.  There are ~1000 subs on here that talk about infidelity, but I want to hear from couples that have never experienced infidelity.   

",gay
Are there any gay dads out there?,I am a single gay dad with two tween boys. Looking to meet other gaay dads or gay men who would like to be dads. Not many of us out there,gay
My friend thinks gay people can turn straight... is that true?,"I personally disagree, but do any of you all know of any cases where this has happened?",gay
Stuck in Straight World,"Hi everyone,

I moved to a new city recently and didn't disclose to the people I've been meeting that I'm bisexual.  I'm not ashamed, I just didn't feel that was anyone's business.  (And to be honest, I also wanted a taste of that hetero-normative privilege that's been rejecting me since I was 13).

Well, my new group of white-collar, post-college friends all assume I'm straight: somewhat lonely feeling.  On top of that, I've fallen in love with a woman who I've been with the last few months.  I'm quite honestly deeply in love with her, but that does not change my interest in men.  She thinks I'm straight, too.  She's a totally awesome person who I'm sure wouldn't discriminate in some other scenario, but I'm not sure how she'll react to dating a non-straight man.  Will she even be attracted to a man who wants other men?

I feel like I've really fucked up now, like i've got to come out of the closet all over again, like i've got to lose friends and relationships all over again, like i've got to sit at lunch alone all over again (this time at my hedge fund instead of a high school cafeteria).

Does anyone have any encouraging words or advice?  I want so bad to live honestly, but I'm afraid of losing someone I've really fallen in love with, and of losing all my new companionship at work.  

peace and love to you all for reading :)",gay
I am a mess,"So let me start off by saying that I, as a woman, find women very attractive and always have since I was a child. They had me feeling a type of way I didn't know was okay until about 2 years ago. I grew up in a conservative family, although their heart is in the right place they are still pretty traditional. 

Anyways, I understand that sexuality is a spectrum and there are a number of ways how love can be given or taken yet even understanding that I still feel like an enigma. 
I'm sexually attracted to women but emotionally attracted to men? 

I had a weird year of being in love with my gay male best friend, and he had some sort of bond with me as well... However as I am recently realizing is more of a toxic bond between a narcissist and someone who didn't have enough self-esteem or love with herself to realize this treatment was not ok. It really fucked me up and messed with my head. I am currently breaking apart from this attachment but it's pretty hard when you live and share a bed with this person. 

I'm trying to open myself up to more people, however I still feel as though I am not connecting to women as whole. Well more so of specific types of woman, but I think it's just me not trying hard enough or being so close minded I don't break free of a certain degree of thinking. I'm not so femme myself however I'm not so much of a 'bro' either so I'm not sure where I fall into in this world.... I don't know I guess I'm just figuring myself out still, it just feels so very discouraging still... like I will never find my fit.

EDIT BIG BIG EDIT: SOOOOOOO I'M IN THE WRONG SUB !!! After further investigation I have come to realize that there are separate sub reddits  for lesbian and gay community ???? yep. I'm fully embarrassed, it's like sending a text to the wrong person.... But then again I don't see why I can't post this on here too? Unless if I am overstepping then I will delete this post and make my apologies for the intrusion. ",gay
Opinions?,"So me \[18M\] and this cute hungarian guy \[32M\], Max, hooked up in his car and had some chemistry so we keeped meeting about 4 times now. He went back to Hungary for vacation and I met this other hungarian guy \[33M\], Milian, who is argueably cuter, not knowing that they know eachother. Turns out this is Max's boss. I feel like I'm playing them and I fear running into Max as me and Milian go to their business' stockroom/office to fuck. When me and Milian fuck he has my stamina that goes on for hours and he has a special ability in sucking dick (Gawk Gawk hwak Combo) and being a great bottom and top. I have chemistry with both of them but I wouldn't want to commit also because the age difference.

(P.S. Milian is also the best person I've had sex with 20+ people male and female)

**How would you all feel in Max's or my position?**

**Do you think I'm playing them?**

**I'd love to hear your opinions.**",gay
When you can't handle &gt;7 inch dicks,,gay
Any San Diego gays here? I need new friends smh,,gay
"Why does r/gay not have a chatroom? If it does, why cant I find it?",,gay
Kind of afraid / not sure how to move forward,"So I fooled around with my bf (best friend not boy friend) a long time ago when we were like 14. Its been over a decade since I shut myself down.

I just came out in may and I promised myself when I lost a couple pounds I'd try and find someone (which was basically an excuse to postpone more). Well I hit my 1st goal a couple weeks ago and don't know what to do next.

I actually haven't really exercised since then and I was up to at least 3 days a week.

I'm not sure how to move forward...",gay
Trump’s Latest Federal Court Nominee is Conservative and Gay. Log Cabin Republicans delighted... other right wingers not so much!,,gay
A Confession,"So, to begin, I am a straight male. At school, I have many good friends, but one of my best friends is a girl. I have developed a very strong relationship with her. However, people can't wrap their heads around platonic relationships between differing genders, so, as a result, students constantly annoy us about being in love and dating. Today, I decided that I had enough, so I began to tell people casually that I am gay, just so they would get off my back.   
  
So, my question to you is: Can I be forgiven?",gay
Does anyone else like spanking?,"I'm not really into BDSM type of stuff or even rough sex, but somehow one of my biggest turn ons is being with a guy who is bigger than me, (not too hard, I'm 5'7 and kind of skinny) having my pants pulled down and being spanked moderately hard over his knee. I love having my legs and wrists pinned down when I'm squirming too much, being scolded/forced to answer questions while being punished, or being given commands like ""Move your hand"" or ""Spread your legs apart. Wider.""


I guess what I'm into is the complete physical exertion of power by a stronger man. Having no say over anything, just being told what's going to happen and forced to submit to humiliation.",gay
Need To Vent,"Ok so I love to longboread it is so fun I live in Brighton Melbourne and go to the city and mback but along the beach I get kinda sad because there are only default sex couples every where and the one time I saw a gay couple the heteros came in like f off it made so annoyed idk it's just so annoying

Where the gays near me",gay
My Girl,"Basic title buttttt....
Myself [19F] &amp; my girlfriend [19F] (We may call her “A”) met in high school. I made up a joke just to start conversation with her as I saw her from across the way &amp; thought she was beautiful. Turns out it was her girlfriend next to her. Luckily, this meant that A was gay, but she was in a relationship. I was closeted at the time so it did not matter anyways. I was happy that my new friend, A, was happy! We became best friends very quickly. We hung out every night as A’s gf of the time had to be home early every night. As soon as she left, I would pick A up &amp; take her on all sorts of adventures. We grew so close, I was falling in love with her. Learning all these new things about her, made me like her even more. But of course, A was with her girl (who HATED me). A never cheated on her girlfriend, she never flirted with me, never was unfaithful in anyway. A year of of friendship &amp; she was very unhappy in her relationship. These things A had help true to in her relationship, her sig. other did not. Shortly after, they broke up. I took A out that night, it was different already. I knew she was getting feelings for me as well but it was too soon. We later confessed to feelings for each other. I was in the closet for the first couple months of our relationship. A made me confident with being myself. She helped me gain the courage it took to be so vulnerable to come out to everyone. Not to mention, I wanted to show her off, I was proud to be with such a beautiful woman. A year &amp; a half later, we are still growing, supporting &amp; loving each other. This is the woman I will marry. Thanks for letting me share!",gay
Mmm this guys hot,,gay
HOW DO U DATE SOMEONE ON FACEBOOK U DONT KNOW??,"Hey yall,

I would like to know how I can approach a hot lad on facebook? I dont know his sexual orientation, he writes that he is interested in men and women on facebook, but maybe that means that he is ready to befriend men and women. I dont know him in real life. 

Any tips will be appreciated 

Thanks 
-L S ",gay
Condom broke [Panicking],"I had sex yesterday with a guy who claimed he was HIV negative, but I still had a condom on and to my surprise after I pulled out I found that the condom was broken and I actually came inside. I'm currently panicking, and I won't be able to get tested before 2 weeks at least (I'm currently travelling on a very tight schedule) and I don't know what to do.  ",gay
Rostam (Vampire Weekend) on how any love song is inherently political,,gay
Desire to be a Man-Wife to a Masc Top Husband," I have the desire to be a wife to a masculine top husband. I am in my late 30s and I like being with older men, although that is not entirely necessary. In my ideal world, we would cease to be two gay men but behave like a straight married couple where I am the wife and he is the husband. Essentially that would mean I cook, clean, pick out his clothes (and iron them) and I am somewhat submissive. By the same token, this means he would do the fixing around the house, drive the car, be chivalrous and make me feel protected etc. And no, I'm **NOT** looking to be financially supported. I'm very successful in my career and quite independent financially. So, if anything, I'd be open to being with a man that doesn't make as much money as I do. Thoughts? ",gay
Can anyone know what is the name of this movie?,,gay
Trump nominates openly gay conservative to federal appeals court,,gay
Do gay guys like the same kind of men that women do?,"Me and this girl I’ve been talking to were chatting about how a lot of my friends joke that I’m gay, so I made the joke that, ”any gay guy would be lucky to have me,” and it got me thinking; do gay men like the same kind of guys that women do? And I figured this sub would be the best place to find the answer

Edit: please ignore this, for some reason I forgot that different women have different tastes",gay
Gay people who wear make-up: Does it make the person to female? I don’t think so and wear it with love.,,gay
When there’s not enough lube,,gay
I need help getting this guy. I'm Bisexual. Please help me.,"I can't believe I'm posting on here. Most of this is going to be rambling but I just really need some advice right now. I've been in the closet all my life. I'm bisexual. 19. Male. Freshman at college. I've been with a few girls during high school but none of them were special.

About a few months ago I got into Grindr/Tindr. I met this guy. He lives on campus. Literally a two-minute walk from my dorm hall. He's an RA, Senior upperclassman. We met through Grindr. He hit me up first. We talked for over a week before meeting up. It took us so long to meet up because of me. I was afraid to meet him because I thought he wouldn't like me or some shit. I was nervous. Anyways, finally I grow a pair and I go to his place. The first time I see him I felt like I was gonna pass out. I was nervous as shit. My hands were shaking. My legs were weak. It was hard to speak and breathe in front of him.

Anyways when I finally get there, he shows me around his apartment. Then we started watching TV on his couch. We talked and watched TV for a good two hours. I revealed to him more things than I've ever revealed to anyone else. I have a trust issues and I rarely talk to people about my personal life. After about two hours of talking he tells me his roommate is gone for the night. And I could spend the night at his place if I wanted. I don't say anything. I'm kinda shocked. Nervous as hell. He then asks it’s up to me and we can do whatever I want tonight. I take a moment before I answer. I tell him I'm fine doing whatever he wants. He responds immediately with, ""Well I want to kiss you."" I stammer for words. My hands shaking. I tell him that would be great. I can't even look him in the eye I'm so nervous. He can tell. He tells me not to worry. And to relax while grabbing my hand. He leans and gives me my first kiss ever with a guy. I loved it. We begin making out. After a few minutes of making out. He takes me back into his room. And we have the best sex I've ever had. (I'm a top btw).

We had sex until about 5 am. I had class in the morning, so we couldn't go all night. We lay together in his bed. Talk about life. What we want in life. What we believe. Politics, life, love, etc. He falls asleep first. I lay there for a good 10 mins just watching him sleep. The smell of his hair...his lips....his voice. I've never felt this about anyone before.

I get up a few hours later. He's fast sleep. I get dressed and give a kiss on his neck before leaving. Two days goes by with us not talking. Those two days were absolute hell. I missed him. A shit ton. I wanted to talk with him. To be with him. But I didn't want to come off as needy. I wanted it to be more than a hookup. I grow a pair and text him ""hey."" We text back for a bit and he invites me over. It's a Saturday night so I chill at his place til like 3 am. We made out. He sucked my dick,etc. We didn't have sex cause his roommate was in. We watched the entire second season of stranger things together on Netflix and cuddled for a good remainder of the night.

After that I hit up about a week later. It was a Friday night and I was drunk as fuck. I came back to campus and I asked if I could see him. He knew I was drunk and let me sleep it off on his couch. We weren't intimate that night. He watched tv next to me while I was passed out. I finally left his place around 4 am.

About two weeks later he's back into town from a Vegas trip he went on and hits me up. I'm so happy. Every time I'm not with one. I'm somewhat sad. Because I feel like it’s just like a onetime hookup and I'll never see him again. It's one of the reasons why I drink heavily on the weekends especially when he doesn't text me. Anyways he hits me up and we get some fast food together and then head back to his place. We watch some Netflix and just chill with each other. No sex, no physical intimacy that night. I left his place feeling depressed. I thought maybe he didn't like anymore or something.

About another two weeks passes and he hits me up again. He asks me how I've been and invites me over to his place to chill and do homework since we both had some work to do. I show up to his place and we chill and do homework for about an hour. After we finish our work we sit on his couch and talk about random stuff. Finally after the conversation ends I say, ""Can I um.....Can I um...uh.... I was wondering if I could um...... If I could...."" I do that for about 30 seconds. I wanted to kiss him. But I was so afraid to ask. I was terrified. He smiles. Crosses his legs together and moves in towards me. ""What do you want to do?"" he whispers with a smirk. I finally say I want to kiss him. He answers yes. And we immediately start making out. I was revealed. I missed him. I was terrified he didn't like me anymore and was just hanging out with me outta pitty. We make out for a while and then we have sex in shower because his roommate was in again. After we finished having sex I go back to my place.

 I haven't seen him since that night. That was over two weeks ago. I hit up last Thursday and asked if he wanted to hangout, but he was busy. He had meetings to go for classes. Which makes sense since he is a senior and he is doing a lot of academic shit. Then on Sunday I hit up again and we talked over text for a little bit. We talked about midterms, our weekend, and what we've been up to. The last thing I say to him in our text convo is to hit me up if he wants to hangout later this week. He responded with a smile and said of course and wished me a goodnight. 

 I want to date this guy. I've never felt an attachment to someone after having sex with them. I love his voice, his eyes, the smell of his hair, everything. He's the nicest guy. But when I'm not around him I think that he views me as just a hookup. I really want to be in a relationship with him. How do I let him know this? How do I get in a relationship with this guy? If he doesn't ask me to hangout by Friday night should I text him and ask him if he wants to hangout? If I'm going to ask him to be in a relationship or that I want to eventually have a relationship with him, I prefer to do it in person. What should I do? This eating me up inside and I need advice. ",gay
Should homophobia be illegal??,Try to answer this not from an emotional level but from one of reason.,gay
Kim Kardashian and Kanye West Meet with Anti-Gay Ugandan President,,gay
A bottom,,gay
Pardon the poor quality but after a year of dating a childhood friend we are now engaged and planning our perfect wedding!,,gay
Research on gay couple arrested in 1950- help?,"Summary of what's going on: My class is doing a history project where we each pick a Virginia court case from the 1900s and tell a narrative story of its contents. The one I found involved two young men arrested in 1950 because of ""homogentiality- fellatio"". One was court-ordered to an asylum (Lynchburg State Colony) and then forcibly sterilized.

The other one escaped punishment-- not sure why. But he went on to marry and divorce 5 times until his death, each time to a different woman. Almost every time the cause was listed as ""desertion.""

To me, what that looks like is that he was gay but felt pressured to remain in straight marriages. If that's true, I'd like to back it up with more research.

Does anyone here have thoughts on the case, or any idea of what sources to look at? Any LGBTQ historians?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
It’s Complicated,"My boyfriend is depressed. And tends to isolate himself.. 

We’re both 13, and both of us are depressed (I’m diagnosed).  And so whenever we talk (VIA DM) he says very unhealthy things. He doesn’t want help. 

The major problem for me is. we’ve been dating for about a week, but we’ve been talking (VIA DM) for months. His depression makes it a very strange area,  it’s hard to communicate with him.
He doesn’t want to be public, so we don’t talk face to face. 

I want our relationship to be better, with actual communication. 

",gay
Cant find me a man,"I'm in highschool right now and ive realised how hard it is to find someone who's attractive, also gay, and interested in you. I need some help my fellow bretheren.",gay
"First ""anal""","So i had this first anal sex just now with a high school friend (straight) whom i talk to regularly. he just broke up with his girlfriend and always wanted to be blown by her or fuck her in the ass but she doesn't do or allow those. It was his first time with gay sex, first blow job and first anal sex. He said it was great. he came twice in less than 30minutes. Now, since he had never done penetration, we both did it ""bare"". We are both virgins. Should i worry about something? ",gay
Hell yeag,,gay
If I made a group on groupme for lgbt people to chat if they need someone to talk to would anyone be interested in joining,,gay
Just had my dad spray my butt with some body spray lol,,gay
"Maybe it's just me, but...","porn has become something actually bad for me and my libido levels. i cum way too quickly when presented with pornograohic media that i fear it will affect my actual performance with my future hubby. i try to cut away from it, but some nights, i just really have the urge to bust a fat one, even without the pure feeling of pleasure. sometimes i even feel like im just doing myself a favor by wanking it. anybody else in the crowd feel like this? ",gay
"Ok, so there’s concrete evidence that the Saudis have done this and they have already proven capable of human rights abuses (anti-gay and Sharia Law overall) and yet we don’t believe they did this? Come on Trump..",,gay
so like does anyone feel like they’re TOO gay?,"i mean don’t get me wrong; it’s not like i’m actively trying to hide it or anything (i’ve been out of the closet for almost two years now), but there are times where i catch myself doing certain things that make me look...too gay? of course, i don’t have a problem with others like that, but i don’t usually act that way, and i think some of my friends are getting annoyed with it. maybe this is just my insecurities talking, but i always feel the need to tone it down a bit ",gay
How to bottom?,"So I’m a total top, always have been but I’m curious on the process of bottoming and cleaning out and how good it feels and all that? If anyone can fill me in (no pun intended) on how to do it, please let me know because I’m curious but i want to know how to do it from someone with experience? ",gay
Drown into Gay Audiobooks (Drifting Away from the Real World),"Hi. I'm new here. Recently I felt lonely so I got some FIRST-PERSON (very important, must be FIRST-PERSON) gay audiobooks. I expected horrible voice-acting and probably not finishing listening to any books but no, I've discovered a whole new world: sexy male voices telling romantic gay stories (very loooooong ones with tear-squeezing plot) when I'm sleeping alone at night. at first I just listen to 30-60 mins and it helps me falling asleep.


But, I feel a bit addicted since few days ago, as the real world is full of problems and challenges, I fee so tired and don't want to wake up, one day I just laid in bed and listened to the gay audiobook about a boxer and a journalist...


I dunno... My ex (first love) cheated on me long time ago and I haven't dated anyone since. I've been focusing on violin and haven't downloaded any dating apps, because they mostly have sexual-based relationship (no offence, just my experience), and I am on Gap year so I basically just stay home and practice the violin, study music stuffs. I haven't even seen a gay man for a long time, let alone touch a gay man. The audiobooks seem to make me feel less lonely, but I feel I'm seeking salvage for the accompany of an imaginary man I love in my life...


I don't know what I'm talking about",gay
How’d/when you know you were gay?,I’m 18. I think I’m very confused. It’s been in the back of my head that I could be gay for many years. I think I’ve been Ignoring it. How did you know???,gay
Meanwhile in the Soul Stone...,,gay
Me,,gay
Being Black and Gay sucks,"At face value the Queer Community isn't anymore racist than any other community, but growing up dealing with bullshit homophobia that fucked me up as a teen only to come face to face with racism and antagonism from the so called diverse and inclusive LGBT Community... really fucks with me on an emotional level.

Like I turned to them for support and friendship, but I get treated like I don't belong and seen as automatically uglier cuz I'm Black (I'm well aware nobody is obligated to fuck nor love me, but they could stand to be a LOT less antagonistic about it).

It feels shitty dealing with racism and homophobia from communities that are supposed to accept you.",gay
A discord for gaming,,gay
What should I do??,"This dude and I were talking and I was starting to like him and was going to say yes to dating him soon when I got comfortable with the idea of dating (it would’ve been my first time) then I discovered that he was texting his ex trying to get back together with her literally begging. My source says that he was still doing It while he was talking to me, but he says it was before. Annnnd he said he started liking me back in early September, but he was still texting her trying to get back together during that time period. He’s literally begging me to give him a chance, but I feel like he’s betrayed my trust and I can’t trust him anymore.",gay
Advice,"Ive been fighting with my bisexuality for years now and im finally coming to term and accepting it. ive been experimenting with myself more and more, talking to guys in more flirtatious waya, watching more gay porn, practicing penetrating myself, and that last part is where i need the help. I was practicing with smaller items at first, no bigger than 2 inches in diameter and 4 in length, but i just recently bought a 7 inch dildo and i was wondering if yall can help me with some ""does and donts"" when it comes to anal masturbation. This is a serious request, please be nice.",gay
I (Still) Remember Matthew,,gay
I’ve been stuck at this point for a while and want to move on! Please help?,"I am 19 years old, I’ve known I was gay since a very young age. Around 13-14 I didn’t want to except it, I thought it was a bad thing abd forced myself to date girls. Spoiler it didn’t work lol. Age 15-16 I was depressed about it scared etc. but started to accept myself. By age 16 I accepted myself but still felt really weird about it. (I don’t know how to explain it.) I started to explore and see what I liked in a guy and shit like that. Age 17 I was totally ok with myself and knew I was who i was and there is nothing wrong with me, I started looking for guys to be friends with/experiment with. And by 18 I had found who what i like, who my types were etc. ok now I’m 19.. Whats the problem? Well.. I am not all the way out yet.. my parents, my aunt, and like 3-5 friends I really trust know. But Im starting to realise if i stay somewhat closeted like this it will be incredibly hard to find a relationship because well.. it is lol grindr just aint it chief😂 ok well bottom line is im ok with whoever knows but im so scared to tell my older brother because I dont want him to talk to me even less then what he does now or be weirded out etc. I totally think I am overthinking this but I just want this big weight lifted up off of me, because Like i said im 19 almost 20 and I would like to starting building my life and I want to hopefully find someone and be in hopefully my first and last relationship! So if anyone has any tips on how to go about this please let me know. Also a mentor would be awesome! Lmfao TIA!! P.S. sorry if this is long and poorly written I have been up all night thinking about this I’m extremely tired!! ",gay
Guys butts. Am I right?,"Sorry but yinz need to know that a male ass is one of the most beautiful, sexy, driving physical attractions that I have for guys. Liking butts it's the gayest thing about me. A shapely, round, big ass that connects beautifuly with a pair of strong thick legs drives me absolutely insane. There's actually research connected to males liking butts. It's said to be a primal attraction that sends a chemical signal in the brain that tells us the person will provide healthy offspring. Well it translates to guys asses too not just woman. Anyways that's just a strong physical attraction I have. DM ME YO I'M BORED. 😂😂😂",gay
hot and horny teens in your area,"you’ve been baited haha i’m sad and desperate please date me

perks of dating me:
1. i’m not that cute, so you’ll look better by comparison
2. i will send you good memes
3. that’s it lol











",gay
"A picture of the brightly lit Mosque in the Chechen City of Argun, said to be host to a Concentration camp that tortures &amp; kills gay men.",,gay
My coworker is flirting with me?!,"It’s been a couple of weeks and I think my coworker is flirting with me, here’s why. He shows lots of interest in me he calls me Nate instead of Nathan he recently just asked me about my hobbies, how old I was and what school I graduated from. He’s always asking me if I need anything of course because he’s my coworker he should do that, but I feel he’s very attentive with me. I’m a very intuitive person and I know when there’s something going on. As of right now I’m not sure what’s going on exactly but I definitely feel something, would he just like to be my friend or is there really something more to it? I was very reserved and quiet whenever he would talk to me because I would just focus on analyzing his body language and his ways around me, so I didn’t really interact with him. 
I noticed he’s definitely more close and kind to the guys at work. I also think sometimes he does things to impress me, but what does this mean. Is he gay? Is he cocky? Is he just a really nice guy? Does he only want to be my friend? How do I know if he’s flirting? ",gay
I probably contracted herpes from my first.,"I'm a 22y/o gay male. I never have been in a relationship; and I contracted it from my first. I'm really upset.

What really sucks is that I finally met someone I'm interested in; luckily, we haven't had any physical contact.

I really just wanted to experience dating at least just one time.

The bright side is that I don't have to worry about the gym, or looking good anymore.

I'm at school and I can't focus. I'm so tired. I just want to go home.

*For anyone reading, I have a question. Would you date someone with HSV if you were negative for it?",gay
How us gays are made.,,gay
Think I’m gay,"I’ve only dated girls but have been single for awhile now. I had a really big crush on this girl for about a year and when I finally asked her out she said no and immediately started dating someone else. I was a little upset and for some reason I decided to download Grindr. I talked with a few guys, but eventually just deleted it. A few days later I was bored and downloaded it again. This time I exchanged pics with a few guys. It’s been almost a month now and pretty much every day I’m downloading Grindr and flirting with men. I can feel a shift in my attractions and I’m starting to get hard when talking to these guys. I’m pretty sure at this point I’m more in to men and haven’t even tried to date a girl in months. Anyone else experience this?",gay
Desperately need relationship advice,"Hey guys. I’m sorry if this is the wrong place to post this, but I’ve had this weigh on my mind so much this past month, and I feel like I’m just going to explode if I don’t talk to someone about it.  I really just want someone to give me advice about my current relationship. 

So...where do I start. Some background. I’ve been working and living in Japan for the past six years. I started right out of college, and was living in a small town, about 90 minutes by train from the closest big city.  During my first year there, I met a guy on Grindr during a visit to said big city, and it was explosive chemistry.  We started dating after meeting each other, and the first year was like a movie. Full of romance, trips together, cooking for each other. It felt perfect. I went to visit him every weekend in the city....

The second year, things cooled down about, but the passion was still there. A few fights occurred, mostly over cultural differences, but nothing major.

During the third year, things started to change in that we both lost sexual interest in each other. I don’t know what happened or why it changed, but it just did. We both recognized though and changed to an open relationship. This changed things a bit, and I became active with other guys  again.  Still though, I didn’t really find myself interested in dating other guys.  That is until the fourth year.

In the fourth year, during a trip to Tokyo, I met a guy who I also had explosive passion with. For the first time, I felt like I wanted more.  I wanted that spark back. But I came to the conclusion that what I had with my boyfriend then was so deep, something deeper than just romantic love and I didn’t want to lose it. So I chose to stay with my current boyfriend. And during our fifth year, we decided to move in together. I thought this would be a good chance to see if we were truly compatible as living partners.

Living together has been overall a positive experience, but nothing like I envisioned living with a boyfriend would be like. We sleep in separate rooms. He cooks while I clean. We are still sexless. And now after all this time and coming so far, I’m starting to realize that maybe all this time this isn’t what I want. I want a boyfriend, a husband, a romance. But what I have is a more like a family member.  I had decided that after our one year anniversary of living together I’d probably end things, as painful as that would be for me as much as it is for him.

This whole plan got flipped on it’s head when I met another guy, who also has a boyfriend. There was just this incredible chemistry that we both felt, and even though he and his boyfriend didn’t seem to have many problems, he invited me to his house multiple times and we had a couple of dates as well. However, his boyfriend has picked up on it, and noticed he was texting me often during their trip to Tokyo together. He also noticed me nearby on Grindr when I went to visit this new guy, and it seems they are at a breaking point very soon. 

I’ve only been seeing this guy for a month, and I wanted to continue to get to know him more before making any kind of move, but it’s all so complicated with my own situation and his own as well. And I keep questioning if it’s really worth giving up the type of relationship I have, where even though there’s no sex there’s such a depth of understanding. Like he knows me so well, and can read my mind sometimes it feels like. I wonder if I’ll ever find something like that again.

Just everything is so messy, and I don’t know what to do and I’m so scared about regretting anything. What if my feelings for this new guy are temporary? What if his are temporary? What if I throw this all away for nothing?

Any advice is appreciated, But even just being able to ask for help with this makes me feel better. ",gay
My Straight Crush / Coming Out,"I've had a crush on this guy since fourth grade and now I'm almost a senior (I'm gay but deep in the closet). I'm 16 and he's 17 (I'm going to call him A), I like him a lot and I don't know what to do. He is a really good guy, he's kind and a good person in general, also he is very hot. He is a really good friend and I feel that maybe if I come out it will ruin our friendship. He is straight but there are sometimes were I've had my doubts, in my school in general guys are very touchy with each other but in a straight way. Like there have been time were I seat next to him and he would put his leg over mine, or he would open his legs, I sit in between and he would hug me from behind, I would put my head in his shoulder, I play with his hair and when school ends we always hug, it's like our goodbye thing. There was one time we had a sleepover in a friends house and we started playing truth or punishment (like truth or dare but without the dares), when it was my turn this guy asked my if i would ever make-out with another guy, A said he was going to asked me the same thing, I looked at him and said that it would be my first kiss and that I would doit with the right guy, at night when everyone was looking for a place to sleep (there was like 15 people in a small space) I got a spot on the couch, A came to me and asked me if he could sleep with me, obviously I told him he could and he laid down over me, there was little space for the two of us but i didn't say anything, I touched his hair and just enjoyed the moment. I've asked him if he could be in a relationship with another guy and he always says that it would be impossible. One day I told him what would happen if i stole a kiss from him, he answered that it wouldn't matter but that he was very careful and I could never do it, so I dare him, I've tried but he dodges me very easily I told him that why wouldn't he kiss me normally but he says he wants the kiss to be difficult to accomplished. As I said we have a good friendship and he trust me a lot things, one day we were doing a school project together, we started talking and he said he has a crush on this girl on our class, but he doesn't want his friendship with her to be damaged if he tells her, He told me how it hurts to want someone and to never be able to have them, I just looked at him and told him I knew the feeling very well, we just laughed it off. I think I have been a little more obvious with my feeling towards him, because there have been times were my friend have said thing, for example one day we were on a cafeteria table A was next to me we were playing cards and when we finished I tried to kiss him and that has been the closest I have ever been, our friends just laughed and were shocked (he wasn't uncomfortable or anything he just laughed too) a friend said that she believe we would make out some day, he didn't say anything and I just said that hopefully it happens as a joke, and she responded saying that things that start as a joke may end up in love. There was another time were we weren't doing anything in class, I was with 5 friends (including A's ex-girlfriend) just talking, one of them started reading her horoscope and everyone started reading theirs including me and out of curiosity I wanted to read A's horoscope so I asked for her phone saying I wanted to check someone else's my friends jokingly said that if it were A's one I wanted, I just laughed and lied to them. Yesterday we went to the cinema with a group of friends and I was hoping he would seat next to me, surprisingly he did but at the middle of the movie he passed next to this friend who always makes out with him, when she gets a chance. This kind of things he does are the ones that make believe we will never be more than friends.

I think I'm very obvious with my feelings towards him and he just chooses to not acknowledge them or he's just blind on he mater and sees me as a really good friend. I think that if I come out It will change a lot of things, I know that my family would accept me but I don't want to make things weird between A and me.

What should I do? Do you think he is straight? Any ideas on how I could steal a kiss from him?

Pd: Sorry for bad English, it's my second language",gay
Sooo you ever dream-fucked a friend?,"I was about to spend a full day with my best friend which I hadn't seen for a long time. Just before his girlfriend broke up with him.

Well the night before I was going down on him as if there was no tomorrow.

Jeez he's str8 brain!!

Made every time I touched him a rollercoaster of emotions like I'm 13 and had my first crush again",gay
Police officer in London proposing to his boyfriend who is also an officer at Pride Parade,,gay
Help?,"I am 19 years old, I’ve known I was gay since a very young age. Around 13-14 I didn’t want to except it, I thought it was a bad thing abd forced myself to date girls. Spoiler it didn’t work lol. Age 15-16 I was depressed about it scared etc. but started to accept myself. By age 16 I accepted myself but still felt really weird about it. (I don’t know how to explain it.) I started to explore and see what I liked in a guy and shit like that. Age 17 I was totally ok with myself and knew I was who i was and there is nothing wrong with me, I started looking for guys to be friends with/experiment with. And by 18 I had found who what i like, who my types were etc. ok now I’m 19.. Whats the problem? Well.. I am not all the way out yet.. my parents, my aunt, and like 3-5 friends I really trust know. But Im starting to realise if i stay somewhat closeted like this it will be incredibly hard to find a relationship because well.. it is lol grindr just aint it chief😂 ok well bottom line is im ok with whoever knows but im so scared to tell my older brother because I dont want him to talk to me even less then what he does now or be weirded out etc. I totally think I am overthinking this but I just want this big weight lifted up off of me, because Like i said im 19 almost 20 and I would like to starting building my life and I want to hopefully find someone and be in hopefully my first and last relationship! So if anyone has any tips on how to go about this please let me know. Also a mentor would be awesome! Lmfao TIA!! P.S. sorry if this is long and poorly written I have been up all night thinking about this I’m extremely tired!! ",gay
just to vent,"Never liked someone this much before and I feel like the feeling might not be as mutual as I thought. We're still just ""friends"" (it feels like we're almost dating) and he's way too sweet to me but I have my doubts of him wanting to be in a relationship with me if I asked. I'm starting to feel like I'm becoming clingy while that's exactly what I hate other people to be. I haven't known them for too long yet but we've spent a decent amount of time together in a short time. Is it normal to be this attached to someone already?

Maybe I'm just overreacting but it's triggering my anxiety so I thought I'd write about it. &gt;&gt;&lt;&lt;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
I want more gay," So basically I'm sick of seeing heteros everywhere that even when I listen to some good tunes by a dude singer singing to a ""her"" I'm turned off. Like honestly, I have nothing against straight people, but I just want to be blinded by gay at every turn, not just on Tumblr, you feel? 

Where my gays at??

It's too bad bc I wanted to go to dude's concert (I very rarely do this tbh) but I'd rather spend my gay money on gays.

Where my gays at???",gay
Made a grindr account as the statue of David...,"Never used grindr, so to test the waters, I made an account as the statue of David. I've gotten three dick picks in less than a day. Is that normal? 😂",gay
How easy is it to have straight male friends when you are gay?,"Nearly 17 years old, and to me, it comes across as if many straight men wouldn't want any gay friends. Straight masc bros seem very opposed to it,

I want to have friends from all across the spectrum, but are there any straight guys who don't mind if they have a gay male friend? Can gay men and straight men be great friends? Maybe I've just not found the right people yet.",gay
Just got home from school? Chat? Any problems? Need advice? Just want to hear something funny? Let’s talk 😆 I want to get to know you guys!,,gay
This literally actually 60% of the time always happens if gay people get married [OC],,gay
Jamaica’s Anti-Gay Laws Face Large Legal Hurdle,,gay
If I made a group on groupme for LGBT+ people who might be needing someone to talk to would anyone be interested in joining?,,gay
Former Highschool Classmate Says He and Aaron Hernandez Had A Sexual Relationship,,gay
"My hair maybe straight, but I sure as hell ain't.","I'm a 19 y/o dude hoping to be hitched to another he someday. I can't help but be jealous of others people's relationships with their boyfriends on this sub and start wishing the same for me. If you happen to stumble upon this pathetic call for attention of mine, hit me up with a PM and maybe we can chat it up and start something beautiful. 😛",gay
Wanting more,"I always felt like I am gay (at least bi) and over the summer I used some dating apps to explore. I met up with a couple guys and sucked one guys dick and LOVED it during but admittedly felt pretty gross after. A few weeks later I met up with the second guy and he wanted to suck my dick but for some reason I couldn’t get hard. I almost asked him if I could crossdress for our encounter as that’s my favorite fetish and I felt like that would help, but I was too scared/embarrassed. He gave me a massage and tried to get me to relax but I couldn’t get into it. After this one I thought maybe I just wasn’t gay or even bi for that matter so I deleted all the apps and tried to forget these times even happened. Recently though I have felt the desire to try again but this time I really just wanna have sex with a guy. I’d like to try top and bottom but I’m also afraid I won’t be able to get into again. Any advice would be helpful! And sorry if this isn’t the right place for something like this ",gay
Yep.,,gay
How can I tell if I'm gay not BI? Sorry if posted in wrong place.,"I was married for all of my twentys and only had sex with one woman until my divorce and I loved it. Then immediately after my divorce I had sex with a lot of random woman and I started to not like it, it felt gross and I wasn't as turned on but I kept doing it. Then I went to a drag show at a gay bar with a lesbian girl who I was having sex with and I had sex with a gorgeous transwoman and it was better then sex with my wife. Then I had sex with a few men and loved that also but I got scared and now I've been celibate for four years until recently I had sex with a woman and it was pretty gross, I made her orgasm but I didn't. Now my labito is back and I'm confused as hell. I think woman are beautiful and they arouse me, I think transwoman are beautiful and they really arouse me and I think FEM men are hot and they arouse me but out of all three I could easily never have sex with a woman again. I'm also not into bros unless it's anonymous but I'm a bro. TLDR: into men, woman and transwoman but could see myself never sleeping with a woman again. Am I gay or just fluid? 
***Also I've been tested and I'm clean and neg.",gay
I need advice about asking another guy out,there's a guy I work with and I think he's hot but I'd like to get to know him better. I'm kinda shy and bad at making plans. I also don't know if he's gay or bi. how do I go about trying to get to know him or find out if he's gay without directly asking him if he's gay. I'm also not out in the company I work for. only 1 other person knows. ,gay
"Conchita ""unstoppable"" 🥇","""Unstoppable""
 Conchita 🎼💐 https://www.shazam.com/track/236111789/you-are-unstoppable",gay
Can't decide who's cuter...,,gay
My boyfriend told I lack of feelings.,"Hi, I am dating with my BF for almost 5 months now. We are happy to have each other. Then one evening, we met each other again and we spoke to each other like always but this time he told me that ""I love you I don't know that you still love me or not"" that's like a punch on my face. He told me that I rarely show any feelings to him. It's true that I lack of feelings to anything. He said he is OK with that but I fear it will affect on our relationship. ",gay
Confused and crushing on my friend,"So I have this friend of mine I've known since middle school. At this point we are in the later stages of high school and are best friends. Recently he came out as gay to me. After that he started to jokingly call me ""daddy"" and he started to hug and even cuddle me. I don't really do anything when he does that stuff but I think I might like it. I've considered myself to be straight all my life so this is new. I think he likes me and I might like him back. He's really sweet and I always fell really nice when he's around. I'm still figuering it out. If you guys have any thoughts that would be nice",gay
Cuddling?,"I never considered up until recently how important I think cuddling is for a relationship, especially for someone like me. I think I’m pretty masculine, though I am a little spoon with a deep longing to be held by someone I love while I sleep because I gives me a sense of security.. does anyone else feel this way? I’ve actually never cuddled before but I get so jealous and even kinda sad when I see men so comfortable in their lovers embrace ",gay
Jewel - Serve the Ego /Gabriel &amp; Dresden Remix\ [Progressive House],,gay
Is this desperate?,Would it come across desperate if I ask a guy ‘what are we to you?’ after 3 dates? We’ve got on well but haven’t met up in a few weeks. We talk every other day or so but not really that much.  I just want to know where we stand but I don’t want to across as too needy or whatever. Tips? ,gay
Just starting to be comfortable in my own skin,"I finally came out late last night and honestly it’s pretty freeing. I’m sure I lost friends as a result but that doesn’t bother me because I’m at a very peaceful stage in my life, where as long as I have my peace, I’m good and so is life. I guess the only person I’m not out to is my mom but I don’t know how she will handle that news and I’m just not ready for that conversation yet.. how’s everyone?",gay
Let’s just say he was popular at Court,,gay
Tom Hardy looks hella thicc,,gay
Just gonna leave it here for a while...,,gay
should I come out?,"I'm a freshman and highschool and I need advice. My family has never really shown that much homophobia, but they haven't shown any support either. Most of the time they just aren't there for me, and I wouldn't be comfortable talking to them about this. I feel like they'd deal with it if they came out, but they'd probably have trouble accepting it. I'm comfortable with my sexuality, but I'm not exactly comfortable with what could happen. I've always been ""accepted"" at school, but never really included in anything. I don't have any deep frienships and it's damn near impossible for me to make any with how awkward I am around guys, and really everyone honestly. I have some surface level friendships but I doubt they'd want to have a conversation like that with me. I can't just accept when someone is just a friend, and I usually get a crush on them and it fucking sucks. I feel like there's a part of me socially that just doesn't flow socially, like my brain has some sort of delay whenever I say something, and I usually don't say anything at all because I feel like I'll say the wrong things. 

&amp;#x200B;

I wish things could be simpler, I wish I didn't have to fight a mental war over this shit. I feel like there's no reason for me to come out, even though I want a relationship so badly. I really want a boyfriend, but I feel like im too awkward for that to even happen. I also really hate myself. I'm a little chubby, which fucks up any confidence I might have had. So I feel like even if I did come out or ask anyone out I'd just fuck it up, or no one would be attracted to me. I really just want to experience what it's like to be in a relationship, or even just to have someone to talk to about the same stuff I've went through.

&amp;#x200B;

I came here looking for people who've gone through the same shit to tell me what I should do. I don't want to throw away whatever potential relationships I could've had in high school because I'm afraid and just wanted to stay closeted through the 4 years, but I feel like coming out might just make things worse. Any ideas?",gay
Must watch binge-worthy show: Netflix's 'Elite',"This show hasn't received nearly amount the attention it should be getting. 30 minutes in and I was hooked. It surprisingly has plenty of good and refreshing LGBT+ respresentation. Just about every main character is sexually fluid and it doesn't define them. It even talks about HIV and racism and brings it into the light and how one should react to it. 

What I really love about this show is that because it's set in Spain, sex and nudity is very open and not as conservative like it is in the States. It just seems healthy.. granted- some characters make very irresponsible decisions when it comes to sex but you get to see them learn to deal with it. 

I loved every single character except for one and you'll know who I'm talking about when you watch it. The acting is good and the story has enough flair to keep you intrigued. And boy- I've never watched a show where I wanted to sleep with every single character that graced the screen. They're all so beautiful. You also got to love it when you hate a character in the beginning only to fall in love with them later on.

Give this show a chance! It's highly enjoyable. It's already been renewed for a second season. You won't regret it. Especially if you like HTGAWM, Riverdale (season 1), Gossip Girl, and/or 13 Reasons Why.

Also, do yourself a favor and watch it in subtitles. You should always watch shows in their original audio/language. You always get more emotional depth the way the scene should be relayed.",gay
How do you determine if you have toxic qualities?,"Ok maybe not toxic per-say, but some trait that drives people away.  In my particular case I don't know if its a string of bad luck and I'm dealing with guys who are dealing with their own issues and subsequently internalizing those issues as my own; or, I'm the one with the problem.

&amp;#x200B;

Im not going to go into major detail about the context surrounding the incidents as it would take another couple of paragraphs, but it can all be summarized by asking, how do you determine what the problem is if no one is ever willing to be upfront but would ghost instead?",gay
"This is why the gays can't have nice things. A few gays create so much bad press and it becomes labeled as ""gay agenda"".",,gay
Advice needed,"Hey folks! I ran into an interesting  dilemma recently and I'm not sure how to proceed: 

I recently met a friend recently and we got along instantly. This past weekend we decided to trip (shrooms) and just chill. We also got some alcohol and decided to drink at the same time. It was his first time tripping and he drank a lot more than I did because I knew drinking and tripping wouldn't be fun for me. We had a great time, but as the night progressed their was an increasing sexual undertone to what he was saying to me. He never outright said it, but, he suggested multiple times through the night that we could mess around... I never tried to do anything because I didn't feel like it was moral for me to go through with something like that while he was drunk and still tripping and up until this point, besides a few weird comments I just passed over, he said he is straight. At one point in the night, he did say that he had  experimented with other guys before and liked it. The next morning I woke up and he was cuddling with me, but I am pretty sure he doesn't remember a lot of what he said...

My questions are this: should I bring it up to him and talk about what happened, how? Should I start flirting with him even though up until now he's said he's straight ( yes he's cute )?

Any general advice how to deal with a situation like this, as I have never encountered anything similar?


I should also add that I'm going to be meeting his family soon which includes his gay parents...    And we'll be driving to his home town which is about a 4 hour drive ",gay
Guys and thongs,,gay
Truth,,gay
Guys I’m not gay s,"Hey guys I'm not gay, I play football. I accidentally clicked this thread because I thought my mouse was hovered over the hot girls thread. Well, since I'm here I had a question let's say hypothetically I had gay thoughts (lol yea right) and I found my close friend attractive (ew gross) and one day we had sex in the back of my car after football practice (I would puke...the only thing I bang is chicks with big tits you know what I'm saying lol) but we didn't kiss. Would that be gay? We were wasted and while we were banging we kept calling each other fags. It's almost like a parody of when we bang chicks (remember this didn't happen). So that wouldn't make me gay right? Just a jokester? 



(/s)",gay
do lesbians date transexuals?,"do lesbians date transexuals?,as a lesbian would you date or have sex with a trannsexual male to female??? since the guy looks like a female but yet still has a penis.is it not getting your cake and eating it too?",gay
Be gay is lonely 😔,I feel like being gay and wherever you are maybe you can relate to the fact there are no none feminine guys around. I’m tried of the same shit everyday with all the girly gays trying to get with me and nobody that acts like a normal guy is around. I’m on an island alone with no one else. And when I see straight couples holding hands it makes me wanna cry.,gay
Why do gays talk about gay sex in online video games constantly?,"When I play PUBG or Blackout sometimes there's one or more gays in a 4 man squad and they start saying all kinds of gay sex talk to a bunch of random straight guys and they won't stop. Why do you guys do this? Why do you need to shove your homosexual sexuality in our faces and talk about dicks, butts, sucking dicks, and so on? If you did this to women it would be called sexual harassment. Do you guys talk about gay sex 24/7 to straight guys in public in every kind of situation? Is this some kind of hostile passive-aggressive thing? Are you trying to force your sexuality on people? This behavior is obnoxious, disgusting, inconsiderate, and disrespectful. ",gay
"When you think about it, war is oddly gay from a certain point of view. Any thoughts?","1. Male only activity (on the whole)
2. Men get very close to men
3. No women, no sex with women - that is clear.
4. Goal is to penetrate fellow men

The only caveat is the phenomenon of war rape, a terrible occurrence that can happen in conquered lands by a low-disciplined conquering army.
",gay
PREP EFFECTIVENESS WITHOUT A CONDOM,"Hey guys. I got on prep a month ago and i've been wild after taking it. Before I would never do anal without a condom, and since then I have more than once. This weekend alone I brought 2 different guys over and I was the receptive partner both times without a condom, i just made sure the came outside me.

I got gonnherea earlier this month from making stupid decisions like this. and i just keep having this uneasy fear of HIV. How effective is prep without a condom? I always take it every day, sometimes I'm off by a couple hours but I've never missed a day. I read online its \~90% effective, is that with a condom or without?

Also has anyone else been having this issue of wearing a condom less on prep? I really do want to cry. I used to judge people who had condomless sex so hard, thinking they're sluts, and now I'm one of them. I honestly just feel disgusting and I feel like I can easily contract HIV. Why am I doing this?

I also literally feel addicted to grindr which isnt helpful at all. I'm not kidding I'm going to have my housemate put a parental control password on my phone to stop me from downloading 18+ apps. I got tested a week ago and I was STD (-) but I have hooked up with 3 guys since then so who's to say I am now.

I feel so mad at myself.",gay
Can't remember first sexual experience,"I have been thinking a lot lately about the first person I had a sexual experience with. 
This was around 12 years ago and I can't seem to remember the details of it. 
I just remember who it was, where it was and very few details. 
Anybody else with this problem? Is this normal? ",gay
A social anxietal trans gay,Help. I like a guy but am afraid to talk to him. I think he might be bi based on things he's said in class but also hangs out with the homophobes of the school (occasionally if not more). I feel lonely and sad because I'm too much of a pussy to make a conversation with him 🙃🔫,gay
Cliche maybe think my friends cute,"So he's actually my old roommate from like 5 or 6 years ago. I was super in the closet and didn't know how I felt about him. We each had our own rooms in a 2 room house so not like roommates roommates.

I wasn't going to go to a troye sivan concert in detroit tonight that I really want to, which is 3.5 hrs away. Then he said he's down bc there are casinos and he loves poker. I don't know what to do.

I kind of buried the lead there might be some gay people and he kindve acted like hed be uncomfortable. No clue what to do.",gay
I wake up Gay everyday :),,gay
A sort of vent (?),"I don't know why I'm writing this but somehow I need to. It's 3 am where I am and naturally there isn't anyone around to say this to. This isn't a question, it's just me saying stuff I want to. 

I'm a 19 year old bi/pansexual non-binary person. 
I haven't been able to do much about my appearance because of the people around me and the dangers I face from being out in the place I'm forced to live in. Thus I still look like a teenage boy, which I hate. Now maybe this isn't the topic that's discussed here but I'm just putting that out there.

I have a very strong feeling of not being good enough for the LGBTQ community. I'm not the sort of person one thinks of when you hear ""gay"". I'm very quiet, very reserved. I don't make friends easily but I try my best. I just takes me a long time to get comfortable with anyone and even then I seem to somehow always be quiet. I'll sit in silence with people, just looking at the wind making trees sway and... I hope that's not too cliche.



Recently I've joined this LGBTQ group nearby and I was very happy to see how people had been living how they wanted to and dressing the way they wanted to and just being happy. I somehow don't feel included in that happiness. I'm never able talk to people freely enough for me to be a significant person in the group. And then there's that thing of me looking like a male, which sorta lowers my self esteem. I don't know why this is. I just wanted to get to know people... probably make a few friends...I don't know, is that too much to ask for?

I understand why people wouldn't care, as much as I hope they would, about me. You have to be significant enough for them to care and that's fine. I just wish people would be more patient.

I've lost all interest in all the things I used to do and I can't feel happy or sad or anything about it. It's just an empty nothingness and I don't understand what I should do about it. I hate nagging people with problems so I just keep it to myself. Why trouble others for something that's my fault?

Anyway that's... probably it.",gay
Is this denial?,"I'll tell you my story. Few times during my Life, i had fear of possibly being gay, But thoughts left and started dating girls. Now, back in May my best friend which was a girl and I, parted ways, I loved her very much and always tried to make Her fall in love with me. I was sad, destroy, cried for a whole month,But Then finally moved on. Dated a few girls and got engaged. Great right? Well, One night that Little doubt popped in my head again when a friend asked ""have you ever questioned your sexuality?""
That same day, like moments before, I was looking around and thought a guy was good looking. I mean, there's nothing wrong thinking that, I always noticed good looking guys, especially when had nice chicks by their side. But that thought brought back all the fear I had. I said""well, It is Just a fear, not necessarily reality"", and told myself ""if you notice a good looking dude, simply aknowledge It"". I dif like that for a while and things went great, dating my girlfriend was very nice, But One day when cuddling Her and kissing her, the face of a dude I know, popped before my eyes. I was like""mmm...weird"". Things got somehow worse and started being anxious about what that meant. I tried not to think about It, But that face wouldn't leave me... I was haunted and I still am as they somehow multiplied and now i see them all the time. I avoided masturbating as I couldn't properly hold my fantasies long enough as they would somehow warp. I asked myself""oh god...do i like them? Do I want them?"" And began telling myself""oh no, I don't want them, I don't want to be with dudes"" and so on. Things got worse when i read about Pure O and started having sexual images in my head. I pushed myself to watch gay porn and have gay fantasies and got hard. Ironically, whenever I have fantasies, whether gay or straight, It constantly switches between the Two of them. One moment I see a girl, the other I see a guy. I was like""how the fuck is this even possibile?"" I never had gay fantasies before, But I tested myself in the past when I questioned my sexuality and never got an erection, I somehow always Lost It and never got aroused. What I'm dealing with right now is with the constant questioning as I know I get hard thinking of girls, But also with guys and unfortunately... Little girls. I'M anxious and I ask myself if i'm attracted to almost any guy I see. I'm struggling and obsessing, cause the sexual thoughts multiplied and I had images of Dead relatives and people having sex. I'M terrified by all' this randomly happening. I feel overwhelming guilt over those thoughts...",gay
"""Straight"" friends grab my butt","So I have, not one, but two very cute straight friends who consistently grab my butt. I was wondering if this is a regular occurrence for others? What their experience has been with the guys who have grabbed their butt, in terms of it meaning anything more that just playing around or if they're flirting/curious? As cute as they are, I really only thought of them as friends until they started doing this, it has confused me a little. 

I know straight guys are always grabbing each other guys butts playfully, but they both clearly know that I'm gay. ",gay
idk,Hahahahahahahahahahahahahahagagahagahagahahagaga ihavedeppresion hahahahahahahahahahahjustlaughitoffahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahistarvemyselfhahahahahahahahahahahahahahahjkiloveramennoodlestomuchbitchhahahah,gay
Can't tell if my friend is bi / into me. Please help :(," 

So i met this guy 2 weeks ago. The first day we met we both took 3 tabs of acid and went on a walk in the woods. The entire time he was very very touchy and all over me so i kind of felt that he liked me. Then told me he was bisexual, that he has had sex with a guy before, that he will suck my dick if i want and that we can be butt buddies. He told me that he is more sexually attracted to women and emotionally to men. I just giggled in response to all this and nodded me head staring him in the eyes (I'm extremely shy/social anxiety). When when we got back to his dorm he ""changed"" in front of me and stood there naked for a while and told me he was sooooso horny. I was too, but I didn't want to do anything with him because he was tripping so hard and i didn't wanna take advantage of him. I didn't know if he was serious or if it was just the acid. Then after a while he said ""So we're just friends, right?"" and i said ""If that's what you want."" and i cant really remember what was said after but it wasn't very significant.

Anyways, so we have been chilling basically all day (and night) every day since the trip. I definitely feel that he likes me - the way he looks at me, talks to me, smiles at me....i know i've only known him a couple weeks but i seriously have never met someone who makes me feel so happy.

We were in the woods again the other day just talking about stuff and he told me that he feels like we were meant to meet each other and that i've helped him find purpose in life by introducing him to psychedelics . And he said that he's never met anyone who understands him the way i do and that he sees me being a big part of his life, even after college. he said ""not on any homo shit or anything, but if you asked me to drop out of college and run away with you right now i would do it."" We kept talking and somehow the conversation came ton him saying ""It's okay if you're gay. all of my friends are gay and i've fucked a guy before. *But i mean,* ***i'm straight.****.....*.and i don't wanna lead your bi side on""

Then later that night we were chilling at his dorm and basically nonstop for hours he kept ""adjusting"" his dick to the point where i felt like he was showing it off to me or something (he would stare me directly in the eye and talk to me while doing it, and kept glancing at me every time he would reach in his pajama pants). At one point, i said i was going to the vending machine. He asked if i could get him some sour patch kids, and i said yes. Then he told me ""Thanks. I'll have to suck your dick"" I couldn't believe my ears so i asked him what he said, and he said it again. ""I said thanks, i'll have to suck your dick."" Again, i fucked up by not pursuing this - and just giggled then went to the vending machine then when i came back it felt awkward and neither of us brought it up. But then the next morning he said that he had a dream that i asked him to have sex.

Do you guys think he likes me? I am so distraught because i want to ask him but i'm just so scared. Any advice will be greatly appreciated. We are going to trip again this week - should i divulge my feelings to him during the trip so that i can play it off easier if im rejected, or should i just be honest?

?",gay
Does He Like Me Back or Not?,"So I'm a bisexual boy and have been decent friends with this straight-esque guy for about two years now. We're in the same grade in high school. Thing is, he's so charismatic on the surface to the point where you wouldn't even begin to think he was an introvert at heart. He was eccentric, witty, smart, stable and even soft-hearted at some points. Everybody in our class loved him as the class clown; like as if he was some entertaining gadget to fiddle with. 

Our friendship sparked out of his attraction for my articulation in English and our shared interest in music. Apparently I came across off as different from most high-schoolers at time, so he was stimulated whenever I was in his presence. At first, it was all a gimmick for the both of us; poking fun at how we were obsessed with each other like some bro-magnet of sort. Before I knew it, it started to gradually get more serious. Our online convos would take place during the latest/dead hours at night about the most confidential and intimate topics; things such our dreams, fears, passion, family and even who we liked. One time he asked me to analyze his favorite song, in regards to how it resonated with his feelings. The lyrics suggested that he was heartstruck with someone and it felt so bittersweet knowing that he was probably directing it towards a girl but confided in me to share the sensitive side of himself. Whenever our intimate moments took place he'd always go along the lines of, ""Btw this chat is only between us"" or ""This will always be a safe place for the both of us"". Wasn't until then that my heart was stimulated at the fact that I had a guy friend that I could be personal with, which was genuinely new to me at the time. I felt so secure and safe with him. For each time that I was facing an adversity, he'd be there to message and comfort me through virtual hugs and reminding me why I was amazing to him. I had officially become a puppy attached to my new owner. 

Suddenly there had been a downward shift in our bond. He'd leave my messages on read and barely acknowledge my presence in person. Our convos began to feel ingenuine and rushed. Classwork was all that we were limited to talking about. I got the vibe that I was irking him with every text that I spammed, hoping to get a mere response out of him. I'd be so downbeat at the sight of watching him interacting with everybody and winning their heart while his indifference broke mine. Perhaps he lost the spark with me and wanted to seek seemingly more interesting friendships. I was so confused, for it felt like I had lost a special companionship within the blink of an eye. I became a ghost to him. A sad, yet non-existent ghost. 

However that wasn't the end of my magical friendship gone incomplete. My crush would occasionally still message and talk to me, but supposedly only on his terms. Whenever I laid in bed with my lifeless heart thinking about him, he'd send an article or video of his favorite movie/song for us to have a short-lived discussion about it, only for him to leave me on read and return back to the abyss. At this point, I felt like I was gasping for air. As if I was receiving CPR after drowning in water, just for me to be thrown back in again. Rinse. Repeat. 

As much as there was strangeness in the new way he communicated with me, he showcased it in his actions as well. I'd passed by him and he'd walk in the opposite direction or seem overly busy or preoccupied when I tried to talking to him. Then he'd corner me for what felt like slightly scripted conversation whenever it was just the two of us alone. There'd be times during class where he'd make a goofball out of himself and I'd be only person he'd look at for a reaction, as he'd gaze into my eyes with his mischievous, seductive smile. He would also make light jokes at my expense, which would soon be followed by him apologizing to me in private. If he caught someone giving me a hard time or opposing my ideas, he'd show up out of nowhere to my rescue like a knight in shining armor. Overall, it was like as if he was making up for the times he wasn't there for me, yet he'd go back to simultaneously ignoring me when there were groups of people around us. My mind began to dismiss it as him just looking out for me like a little brother but my heart truly wanted him to desire more than a friendship. I had officially become a hopeless romantic; waiting for my prince charming to show some limerence. 

Wasn't until after our school musical (that I acted in and he played guitar in the pit orchestra for), he casually asked me, ""who did you like this whole school year?"". It around the time I had given out a few hints to my friends on whom I liked so I played it off by saying I knew the person for a few years and really wanted to confess to them. He wanted to know for the sake of 'hearing entertainment to use up his energy' and that 'his heart was aching for me' out of sympathy. Part of me still despises myself to this day for not telling him the truth. Even if it meant scaring him off. 

So I wonder...could he like me back? Or is he still wanting to stay intimate friends with me? Also could there be a chance that he's a closeted bisexual? He has seemed so unsure of himself for the past few months. Like as if his future comprises of a blank canvas. I know that guys like his personality type are usually susceptible to staying on the down low about these kinds of stuff. I've seen him act flamboyant and sarcastically flirt with other guys, but it's typical for a straight male to do that kind of stuff in high school. However he's been really ambivalent and gentle with me lately. Should I confess to him? And how so? I wanna know if there could be a chance for me. For 'us'. 

ALSO keep in mind that I don't wanna confess to him to subject to do anything uncomfortable or fabricate a relationship. That's just selfish and out of character for me to do. I, like everybody else, can't change somebody's sexuality and nor should I want to. I've been bottling this up for so long and I don't think it's fair for him to be unaware of how I really see him. ",gay
I need some help,What’s a great way just too have some gay fun (on reddit or anywhere else),gay
"this is me discussing the LGTBQ dynamic in China and this video hit 500,000 views on Chinese social media (I am a Chinese-American blogger who blogs in China)",,gay
"As a gay man, I hate the LGBTQ acronym. It sounds like a corporation. Do I HAVE to use it?","Recently I had lunch with some people and one of them was a young pre-trans woman. Whenever I said the word gay she would correct me....""not gay, LGBTQ"".

&amp;#x200B;

Fine. I'm not against people feeling included. But I have as much scorn for LGBTQ as I have for homosexual. It doesn't sound right. Why can't we all be gay, in a  general sense?",gay
Advice on dating in college,"Hey all, I’ve been in college for about a month and a half now and I’m really interested in starting to date. I’m kind of concerned that a lot of the other guys are mainly interested in hookups, which I’m not really looking for. I’d be fine with a sexual relationship but I really want a relationship in which we can trust each other and we care for and love each other. 

I just have no idea how to start. Either my university is completely gay-free or my gaydar is broken (I’m assuming the latter). I have no idea how to approach someone and ask them if they’d want to date, I’m petrified of asking someone and them turning out to be straight.

Does anyone have any advice? I’m kinda lost",gay
Cute rabbit,"|‾‾‾‾‾‾‾‾‾‾‾‾|
| I’M GAY :) |
|____________|
(__/) || 
(•ㅅ•) || 
/ 　 づ",gay
(Rant) Coming Out Regrets?,"A year ago this past week, I did one of the most cringe-inducing things of my life and came out to a few of my friends as well as my parents. It doesn't matter the specifics of what I came out as (because I *really* do not like talking or thinking about it), just that I didn't come out as gay. It felt right at the time, but it was  never really brought up at all after that by anyone. Now, I've been questioning my sexuality since 5th grade, and this past summer I came out as gay to my parents and my friends. I've tried every way possible to rationalize that I'm not gay, but none of them could change the obvious. And it is just that: pretty fuckin obvious that I'm gay. 

When I came out, I could not have got a better response from every person I told -- they accepted it and moved on with their lives. I've made jokes very suggestive of my sexuality to my friends ever since 7th grade, so they're used to it and just believe that that's what I'm like. 

I've heard plenty of amazing and inspiring stories of people coming out, and feeling as if it lifted that burden from their shoulders. But since I've come out, that burden has stayed the same if not gotten more massive. I always feel reserved to talk about my sexuality, especially branding myself as 'a gay man'. It feels as if there's some mental or oratory blockage, like my mouth is filled with cotton balls whenever I say ""I'm gay"" or ""my future boyfriend/husband"" (I'm even hesitant to type it)

Now don't get me wrong, I love gay culture and seeing how loving and accepting the LGBT community. But being closeted, it felt as if I was watching it all through a window, and coming out would remove that window for me to enjoy it all. But coming out seemed to do nothing to that window, and it still feels uncomfortable to ""open"" that window.

It just seems like my outward expression is ""hey! I've got this all figured and I'm proud!"", but I really feel confused and scared inside. I've grown up in a loving community and more than accepting family, do I have no readon to feel uncomfortable. 

It's just so fucking frustrating to struggle with and finally think you understand your sexuality, only for it to feel the same and now you can't take back what you've said to put you in this situation.

I know that this post is extremely long and negative, but I want to get better about this. I'm just looking for advice or any wisdom from people who know anything about or have experienced this. Any and all is appreciated.

I love y'all and what y'all do :^) 

&lt;3",gay
I still don't have things clear after 3 years of relationship. Should I be worried?,"I'd like to start by saying that I'm not a very ""emotional"" guy... After the crushes era that ended at 17 for me, I never wanted a relationship even if i was single until I was 22(ish). I was completely fine by myself and happy to take care of my desires by my own means.

I started experimenting sex as result of a series of actions motivated by curiosity at 22, and yeah it was nice, then after 4 random guys (2 months into) I met the guy who is now my bf. I made it clear I only wanted sex; he said he was not used to do that, but after talking for a while we did it for the first time. Over the next months we hung out for sex and some walks afterwards and now (almost 3 years after) he is my absolute best friend... but... I'm not sure I love him. 

I've never been in love, I guess I could not tell, I had never been in a relationship before, I feel like I don't know what I'm doing. Maybe love will take longer to grow, but… more than 3 years? I should know by now, shouldn’t I? 

I try to be there for him, help him out when he has problems and he does the same for me. Sex goes amazingly. When I’m with him I feel comfortable, anything we do together I enjoy it. But one thing that gets me thinking is that, even when he seems to like being over me all time, I don’t feel like that. Kissing and touching as a part of sex is a big turn on for me, but outside of it, it feels not as special and I don’t know why. I don’t really feel a need to do it. Maybe it’s just how I am. I have also found myself fantasizing about other guys and wondering what having sex with someone new would be like (but no, I would not cheat).

I can see us staying together, but I don’t want to waste his time if things don’t go as planned, he doesn’t deserve that. And furthermore I’m SCARED of end up hurting him. He has said on occasions that I make him happy, with such a smile on his face, it warms my heart… There’s something he often tells me, “You are overthinking stuff again”. Maybe I am right now. But I’d like to know if what I feel for him is love… 
",gay
I posted the entire text of a lesbian fan-fiction on homophobic facebook pages,Was that wrong?,gay
What was your experience in the military?,"Ive been dicking around in college and have gained no experience outside my degree, so the military is a logical next step for me to build a base and gain some transferable skills.  Im curious what experience others had.  Did you enjoy it?  Was it an overall good experience?  How was the dating pool?",gay
Kissed my best friend,,gay
When the feminine guy is actually the top,,gay
"To other feminine guys, do you ever feel anxious?","As a feminine guy trying to traverse through society and just feeling so disconnected and out of place in pretty much every place I go, i was wondering if other feminine gay guys felt the same or have had these feelings before? ",gay
"Not fancy, but made with love: pride cake for my fiancee's son who came out last week &lt;3",,gay
"Stand Tall, strong and true.",To all my brothers and sisters.  Happy pride!  Be safe out there and have fun!,gay
I long to be a warrior and pleaser..,,gay
Happy Pride,May everyone have fun and be safe.  Ignore the haters!!!,gay
Crna Gora?,,gay
"Broadway legend and gay icon Patti LuPone says that the Christian right are ""no different from Al-Qaida"" and that ""someone needs to say it out loud!""",,gay
Am I gay or bi or what?,"Hi,
So I am married to a man. I used to love having sex with them. I only ever look at girls and think they're cute I never really ever look at guys and think that they're cute. I have a really low sex drive. I believe it is due to medication I am on painkillers and antidepressants. Sometimes I look at lesbian relationships and I feel jealous even though I am not a Jealous person. 

When I was younger I used to hook up with girls and have sex with girls and make out with girls and make out with guys and have sex with guys but I feel like the girls were more fun and I'm missing that.

I guess I like sex with both of them but I also have a super low sex drive.

I am 43 and severely confused can someone help?",gay
Someone is tying naked men to lamp poles.,"Yes, it is odd that [someone is tying naked men to lamp posts.](https://www.lgbtqnation.com/2018/10/someone-tying-naked-men-lamp-poles-police-no-idea/) And yes, it is odd that someone shaved the letter R on the back of their heads. But what I find really odd is that the police put up crime scene tape before they untie the men.",gay
What is my sexuality?,"Ok so until recently i *thought* i was straight, but then i realised i was most certainly not. But i don't know exactly what i am. I like girls and boys both equally, but not really sexually except for a few. I thought i was an asexual, but i thought ""nah"" and as of right now im bi, but that still doesn't feel right. can someone help?",gay
That one time I blew my best friend's boyfriend,"Story time.

My best friend is gay, so am I.

When the story took place he was engaged and I was dating a guy.

One afternoon my best friend invited me to their house to spend some time together, play videogames and shit.

I agree, we meet, talk, start play videogames. After a couple hours I was the only left at the computer, they were on the bed doing things (we are very open about it so I don't mind if they fuck in front of me, it happened a fuck ton of times).

After 15 min they call me and ask me to sit beside them (weird I think), I agree and sit.

My best friend proceed to suck a bit of his bf dick, then asks me to blow him.

I was in shock. Why the hell are they asking me to join?
My best friend explained to me that I'm the best blower he knows and he was having a rough time figuring out how his boyfriend likes to be sucked and wanted to watch while I was doing it to learn.

They pressured a lot to make me blow him, and after a good 45 min of 'fucking nope' I did.

The weirdest blowjob I've ever done meeen.

His boyfriend loved it though..

We never talked about it after the fact, but sometimes we throw a little joke like 'yup, but your boyfriend loved it' and shit like this. Still no one beside the three of us (and my - at the time- boyfriend) know this story, we still have a great relationship and I've never fucked my best friend or his boyfriend again. 

There's no point, just a little secret I wanted to share 😅",gay
"Brian Kemp, who supports the “religious liberty,” had advertisements on Grindr.","From the larger post:


&gt;File this under “Politics, strange bedfellows, etc.” 

&gt;A tipster notified us that Republican candidate for governor Brian Kemp - who supports the “religious liberty” proposal reviled by LGBT advocates - had advertisements on the gay dating app Grindr. 

&gt;Specifically, it was a banner ad attacking Democratic rival Stacey Abrams’ stance on sex offender legislation.

&gt;While Kemp’s campaign had no comment, an adviser noted that the ad may have popped up because the Grindr user also visited his website. 

&gt;We also reached out to the Democratic Party of Georgia which commended his “innovative advertising efforts” during Pride Week. 

&gt;“But we don’t expect him to find much support,” added party spokesman Seth Bringman. “He has made clear that he would sign discrimination into law if he is elected governor, even though 400+ major Georgia employers have said that doing so would harm the state’s economy.”

&gt;You can consider the Kemp foray into an LGBT zone as yet another example of a surfeit of cash flowing into this gubernatorial contest.

https://politics.myajc.com/blog/politics/the-georgia-trail-trump-and-herschel-another-close-poll-and-grindr/bZsuMeuo6tnNILPDQ0oPnJ/",gay
"I mean, he’s not wrong.",,gay
This ONE bot has a hatred for Garfield,,gay
Romanians didn’t show up to an anti-LGBT referendum. But the battle for equality continues,,gay
We fucking remember 🤲😢💔🏳️‍🌈,,gay
Adam and Madeleine have religious conservative families but love conquered. Everyone was there for the wedding last weekend.,,gay
Anyone else going to Atlanta Pride this weekend?,I'm going on Sunday and I'm super pumped!,gay
LEZ BOMB Official TRAILER (2018) - Can't wait for this movie!,,gay
Why am I treated like a princess/delicate flower?,"I am a 26 year old man, married for about 7 with an older man. We have a lovely life together and I really have nothing to complain about it. Since we married, He asked not to work as he could take care of me financially and use my time to do things I like instead. Since I married I have been living a life where I spend my time doing what I love and trying new things like weightlifting, Swimming, Painting and most recently gardening. 

One of the things I noticed the most is that my husband does things for me in a way that I have never imagined someone would, not even my parents, he will call an uber for me to go back home if it is raining even though I can walk home or take the bus/train, or drive 200 miles to take me to an art exhibition just because I mentioned that a certain artist I like will exhibit, etc. 

But lately I have been noticing that other people treat me like that too! I have recently talked to a few friends of mine about applying for a job as a train driver (yes, I like trains) and they said that the job is not for me as its shifts are quite inconsistent and the work is really 'hard', they also suggested that I should do something a bit more delicate if I really want to work, one of them even suggested I start a massage business (why though?). In many occasions, some of my friends who live abroad have also offered to send me money to travel to their countries and they would take care of the acccomodation, etc. Another thing that happens a lot is that people expect me to act a certain way, but when they see me acting differently from their expectations, they become really surprised. The other day I swore in front of my neighbour and she even gasped and said she would never imagine in her life she would hear me swearing!

I don't know, but I think people have the wrong impression about me or I have the wrong impression about myself as I really don't see myself as a.... delicate person or a damsel in distress! Why do people think that I need to be 'taken care of', I know a lot of people won't relate to this, but it makes me feel a bit.... emasculated (?) that others don't take me seriously as an actual man, but instead some kind of fragile crystal! ",gay
I want to get a guiche piercing what's the best ring for it and how long do it take to heal? What's the best way to clean it?,,gay
Watch New Trailer for Nicole Kidman’s Gay Conversion Therapy Film ‘Boy Erased’,,gay
Ok so this guy likes me but...,I don’t like him back and I think it’s because of his physical appearance. He doesn’t really have what I look for in a guy but he’s very sweet and he likes me A LOT. What do I do??,gay
does anyone else not like sucking dick?,I wish I did but its just kinda boring/gross to me. I dont like getting sucked either. id rather just suck some toes tbh,gay
"""Well don't tell me your gay until you have sucked a dick” - a friends coming out story (shared with permission)","Happy Coming Out Day! **Here is a small bit of my coming out story** At first, like so many I thought I was bisexual because I had no problems being sexual with women (guess a lubed hole is a lubed hole, LOL). When I was 17 I started to have the strong feelings and attraction towards men, and tried to kill myself. I took 24 bottles of random pills that I had been stealing and collecting from multiple people. My best friend/brother Morris found me and took me to the hospital. I was then locked up in a mental hospital for 2 months until they felt I wouldn't do it again. My family HATED gay people and it was considered an abomination and sickness. I was married and had a child so that made it even harder to deal with. 

But when I was 19 I finally owned my truth and told EVERYONE I could,  within a 1 week time frame. Half of my family disowned me. But I said the same thing to them all - ""I love you, but I can't do this anymore, I'm gay."" My mother (which I thought would disown me). Said ""have you sucked a dick?"", I said ""no"", she then said ""Well don't tell me your gay until you have sucked a dick"". 2 weeks later I walked by her and said ""mommmmm, I'm Gay"". She smiled and said ""congrats, I love you, just be safe"". 

Not everyone has a mother like mine, but I am so glad she was the coolest mom ever.",gay
A musical theater gay finds his true calling...,,gay
How the fuck did I suppose to find a bf ?,I don't even know one gay personne what am I supposed to do ?,gay
"Every student in Australia comes out as gay, after learning it will get them out of school",,gay
What should I do?,"I've recently met this dude and became fwbs, I'm interested to asking him out eventually as he said he would be open to be in a relationship with the right person, don't know if that's me but I can dream right? But the problem is I haven't been able to get him off the last couple times we've been together and he says he feels like I'm not putting enough effort in. I don't necessarily agree but after he does eventually get me off and he puts in a lot of effort to do so, I'm usually to tired to think of doing much to help him if he hasn't and he doesn't say anything after. That's why I think he's upset; I'm totally down to help him more even after he does get me off, just wish he said what he prefers and how he likes it more so it isn't so hard getting him off. Other then improving and making sure he gets off preferably before me, what can I do to make it up to him and show him I care? He seems a little mad or disappointed with me atm",gay
"""See the stone set in your eyes...""","""..See the thorn twist in your side.
I wait... for you.
Sleight of hand and twist of fate,
On a bed of nails she makes me wait,
And I wait...""",gay
Today is National Coming Out Day. Share your coming out stories.,,gay
Out and proud for 27 years!,,gay
Is there a term for...,Is there a pithy or clever word for one's last hetero partner before coming out? There's got to be one but my search is coming up empty. Thanks! ,gay
I did it!,"Long time lurker, first time posting

I am 22 years old from the UK and I’m pleased to announce I finally came out as bi today, and it feel exhilarating. Somebody pinch me I’m dreaming!",gay
When you realize you're not attracted to teens,Pheww. Reassuring to know you're not a pedophile. ,gay
LGBT Live streamer's brain surgery journey,,gay
Is a time coming when the international gay community becomes militant?,The killing of this 14 yearold kid in the middle east because he looks fem makes my blood boil and I'm sick if this type of treatment. Unlucky for me I look like a trump voter so I don't deal with anything like this but I also don't get to date attractive people.  I feel like terrorism against LBGT needs to be met with force. Sorry I feel this way and I wish love could conquer more often but it doesn't and something needs to change.,gay
Justin DeWitt is the first openly LGBTQ person to run for Congress in Louisiana. Check him out!,,gay
Sensitivity Rant,"Hello fellow Redditors!

I want to go on a bit of a rant on an experience I've had on here today in order to create a conversation on the topic of sensitivity.

Today I commented on a photo of an artist by the name of Jono Dry. It was him posing with his striking artwork. I'm an artist myself so I felt no need to comment on the artwork itself as most people in the comments had already covered it. 

I could help it but to find the artist very attractive.

I commented ""There are two pieces of art on that picture. 😌"" Pretty harmless, right?

People blew my comment out of proportion and began crying that I had harassed the artist and that if it were a woman I'd be getting a lot more hate. 

Here's the thing, I did not harass, offend, or disturb anyone with my comment as it is was a straight compliment. I did not use lewd language of any sort not did I objectify him. 

So I want to understand, how did we get to this point where a harmless comment of appreciation can turn into a sea of hate and accusation in a blink of an eye? 

It is unnecessary and unfair.

What are your thoughts on this?
",gay
I am gay and proud.,Just wanted to say that.,gay
I saved my boyfriend’s life this morning,"My boyfriend has a huge fear of mice and rats. He’s lived in Chicago his whole life but says he has a phobia and cant be around them. While he was getting the kids lunches ready this morning he heard a squeaking in the kitchen. I woke up to investigate and figured it was a rat outside since it was still dark out. I went back to bed and he yelled for me again.  Behind the fridge was a mouse in one of our traps we have just in case. 

I have never seen a man so scared of a little, tiny mouse. So, I took him out to the alley and released him. Once again, I’ve saved the day. 

",gay
Matthew Shepard to be Interred in Washington National Cathedral. This will likely ruffle a few right wing feathers.,,gay
🅃🅄🅁🄽 🅈🄾🅄🅁 🄼🄰🄶🄸🄲 🄾🄽!,,gay
From Russia with love,"Found this artwork on a school in Nikel, northern Russia

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/eena7jthnir11.jpg",gay
Would you say calling people (not because their gay) fags is homophobic?,I would but I want to hear other peoples opinions.,gay
Is it possible for someone to be gay by choice?,Or is that bullshit with uterior motives?,gay
Netflix’s Elite is on fire,Go watch it guys it’s so GREAT.,gay
Gay Weekend,"Well kinda just wanna get this out because it gonna be a stressful but hopefully amazing weekend. It starts on Saturday when I take the pictures that I will use in my coming out post on Facebook. Next, My family is coming down and I'll tell them. Wish me luck! Saturday night, this boy I've been seeing is coming over! Sunday, I'm going to see Troye Sivan preform and get my gay on. I will come out publically on Sunday night to all my friends. I'll update on monday about how everything goes. I hope people will support me",gay
I love my best friend,"Once I had told him that I loved him, but he turned me down. It was only just yesterday while we were at theatre clwyd with the school watching lord of the flies that he had told me why. He told me 'I said no because I didn't want to end up ruining our friendship, you are my best friend and I dont want to lose you.' I told him that it wouldn't affect our friendship and that we would still be best friends even if we ended up breaking up.

So what should I do, should I leave him, or should I ask him out again and address his issues?",gay
Would I just be ruining a good friendship,"So long story short, I have a good friend that I've known since high school, about as long as I've known him I've had a crush on him. Fast forward 6 years and we still hang out every now and again, and up until a few months ago I thought he was straight, but while we were out drinking one night he told me that he considers himself straight but he said he was possibly curious, but he's never acted on it. I really want to talk to him about that but he denies saying that now, and after years of ignoring my feelings for him those feelings have bubbled to the surface again. I don't want to ruin our friendship, but I can't stop thinking about him now. Should I talk to him about how I feel about him, I don't know what to do...",gay
My first vacation with the BF,"Totally stoked. My BF gave me the idea of going away for my birthday (I would have never considered this a year ago as I was rebuilding my life). We toyed with traveling abroad, but realized the expense is a little much right now. Taking a 3 night trip to Ft Lauderdale in mid November. Booked a cheap $140 flight. Need to find a decent beachfront hotel and we’re set.

Fortunately this was preceded by a trip with my kids in August and him to stave-off the jealousy/selfish claim my ex likes to boil-up with sometimes. Not to mention she has taken two trips with just her BF and none as the 4 of them so far. Ugh. 

So happy to be sharing my life and my family with this man. To top it all off, the 4 of us will be going to Florida for a day in Disney and visiting family in December. Going to surprise the kids as we are driving through the property gates. They’re gonna flip! :-))))",gay
"The Lasting Relevance of ""Get On The Bus"" Seriously Spike Lee is dope.",,gay
I really messed up,,gay
Did I make the right choice?,"Long story short, I got a free period during 9th and decided to go to my debate class to work on some stuff for my next tournament. The class was empty because it was testing for the PSAT but one of our captains was in there chilling and I talked to him for a bit(apparently he had a headache and asked someone for a painkiller). He started randomly asking me if I’ve ever done stuff with a guy and if it felt good etc. but he seemed really...Woozy per say.(Keep in mind he’s straight and even asked us to help him ask a girl to homecoming) I’m openly gay so I was like yeah then suddenly he asked me to show him and he pulled me in for a kiss. He asked to see my dick just to see what it looked like and I said no because I respect him too much to do that. He started saying that if he showed me his I had to show him mine and he grabbed my hand and made me rub him. He got hard and eventually he told me to reach under his pants and he pulled out his dick. I went with it and he started the whole “Keep going it feels good” spiel. Then he tried to pull my pants down but I was like no because if someone walks in we’re screwed and throughout the whole thing I took note of how he seemed to be acting weird, almost like he was drunk. It was at this point I realized “Oh fuck he’s high” and immediately told him no because you have a girlfriend and you can’t consent(no matter how many times he told me he was sober) and to be honest I wanted to keep going really bad. I’ve always had a mini crush on him and a part of me kept telling me to go for it because he probably won’t even remember. He kept begging and started getting a little aggressive(Not to the point of assault) and I just firmly told him “No”. He stopped and called me a lame ass and I just stood there saying “What the fuck is going on, is this fucking real” over and over again. Eventually the bell rang and he left but he told me never to tell anyone and that this was our little secret. About an hour later after school I asked him where he was during 9th period and he didn’t remember anything. I thought he was just keeping the secret but he genuinely forgot because all he remembered was waking up with the nurse. I realized I could have kept going and he wouldn’t have remembered but I felt gross while thinking about that. I made the right choice by saying no even though he kept saying he was sober and could consent, right?",gay
butt plugs and condoms,do you slip a condom on your personal butt plug? ,gay
Gaybro’s with GoPro’s. My channels will give you a sense of who I am. Hope you enjoy! 😊,,gay
Racist Gay Lyft Rider Caught On Video Calling Driver A N*gger After He Couldn't Play His Music,,gay
Gay long distance,"Hey so there is a possibility that I may have to make a huge move for my career and live away from my boyfriend for about 6 months. We have been dating just under a year, but I am head over heels for this man. 

We have talked about it and he is super supportive. We agree that it will make us both sad to be so far apart from each other but will benefit us in the long run. We also have had a long discussion on the communication strategies that we would implement while I was away, and it makes me optimistic. 

I guess my question really is 1) am I deluded to step into a long distance relationship with a guy I’ve only been dating for 10 months? And 2) what are some strategies my fellow queer brothers and sisters used in similisât situations? ",gay
Here to deliver your weekly tea,,gay
Happy community that excludes non-whites. Happy community that excludes the disabled. Happy community that excludes the impoverished. Welcome to the community. Happy national coming out day!,,gay
I am needing some word of wisdom.,"I have been trying to get the website name out there and get going with it.  I have a passion of building alot of things.  Right now I am working on yet a 3rd batch of wooden pendants and looking to sell them.  I posted early this morning to invite people to look at the site.  Not all that many are looking at the site right now.  But I hope to have more people to enjoy my wooden pendants soon.  Now, don't get me wrong.  I am not complaining.  I am just looking for good guidance on how to get my website [Lformations.com](https://Lformations.com)  Any word of wisdom?",gay
"Todrick Hall Drags Ex Boyfriend On Instagram ""You Cheated While I Was Burying A Relative""",,gay
"Obsessed ""ex""","Hey
So I've been dealing with this issue for over a year now and I seem to not be able to come to terms with it.
To explain everything (I think this'll be quite long and unclear, hope you'll understand me), there is this guy that I met on Grindr in the beginning of September 2017, as we both had classes on the same campus, we decided to meet there one day. I first thought that it would only be the two of us as a sort of ""date"" on campus before class. When I arrived, I saw him with one of his male friends and I was just like ""nevermind it won't be a date, just the three of us talking"". So we did and agreed (with the guy that I'll call R.) to go to a park one day, as a more real date.

Before the date, we had exchanged our numbers and talked by text, not a lot though. On the day of the date, we went to this park and talked for like 2 hours before he had to go. Few minutes before he left we kissed (this was my first kiss with another man) and agreed on seeing each other during the evening. He came to my flat and we talked, and kissed, and cuddled until 11 when his friend (that was with him the first time, let's call him L.) called him to eat dinner out. We decided to go eat and then go back to my place. While we were out with L. I learned that they were actually exes and had already dated each other before moving to this campus. I was quite surprised but decided to move on as I thought that there was nothing more between them. After that, R. and I went back to my place and kissed a bit more before he left.

The day after, we decided to see each other again as everything was feeling good. The same thing happened up to the point when we masturbated each other. After that he told me that he ""had a real crush on me and fell in love"". I was shook. I could not say anything. How, on the second date only, could he say that he loved me? Since we were at my place, I did not really say anything before he left.

On the week-end I went back to my parents and through text I explained to him that things were going a bit fast for me and that I did not want to continue this relationship, making it very explicit.

Unfortunately, a week after, I went to a party with a good friend of mine and she had also invited R. and L. (not knowing that I knew them and all that had happened). Decided not to ruin a chance at having fun, I decided to go and ignore them, which I did the whole night. R. on the contrary was decided to make every innuendo possible as to what had happened. L. was also very pushing as he litteraly asked me in front of everybody that he ""would like to suck me off right there"". 

After that night, I completely ghosted the two lf them as I thought they might be kind of dangerous. R. texted me soon after to say that I was a ""bastard"" because I had no right to leave him like I did. L. also did text me saying that I was a ""slut"". 

R. re-texted me one night, saying that he was ""very disappointed by me acting like a whore"" (as if he had a right to be) and even that I was destroying his reputation by saying to everybody that it was him who made me a whore. He carried on just trying to insult me up to the point that I started to ask myself if I was not responsible (I was not).

After this night (November 2017), I did not hear from them up to a month ago when they started messaging me again. I had blocked them from every social media and everything as I did not want to have anything to do with them anymore. 

I went to eat with a friend in town on a Sunday night just casually when I saw them (R. and L.) accross the street. I obviously ignored them. R. sent me a message on Grindr (with another account than his previous one) on the morning after saying that he had seen me in town. I completely ignored it, thinking that he would understand. He sent me another one the day after: ""I heard that you wanted to fuck a friend of mine but he refused"". I did not understand as I did not know any of his friends nor asked for a hook-up with anybody on Grindr. I ignored those messages again.

On Monday night, I was with a friend when I received a message from L. on Grindr asking for help in one course that we both followed. His intention was clearly to annoy me and not really ask for help (it would have been weird as we did not talk for over a year).

I just want to understand why they are so obsessed with me, if any of you has the answer I'd be glad to know and also how I can make them understand that they better stop messaging me.
Thank you if you read it all, writing this whole thing was complicated but it feels like a weight off my shoulders.",gay
How high is your libido?,How does it effect your relationship life?,gay
Is body hair okay for u?,"I like body hair.
However,due to the place I live in,body hair is rare to see,so I've never heard any gay say that he hates body hair.
How do u guys think",gay
Would wearing jockstrap type of underwear be visible with my pants on?,"If I'm wearing tight khaki pants can people tell?

https://imgur.com/a/pKvg7cY",gay
For anyone struggling. Words to live by ❤️,,gay
Got my third tattoo today. Means a lot to me personally for the symbolism and thought I should share,,gay
Christian bakers who refused to make 'Gay' cake did not discriminate High Court rules.,,gay
Anyone else find the show Queereye boring and kind of annoying?,How come a show like that gets more attention than a show like Gaycation?,gay
How do you guys stop itchiness from happening when your pubes are growing back after shaving?,,gay
Yep,"Was just watching a wonderful documentary about Johnny Quinn (guy who was injured in a fire and has 95% of his body covered in burns).

So my man is way talented, smart, funny, charming, and what not. He's talking and I hear a lisp. Im like ""huh, I wonder if he's gay. Na straight guys can lisp."" Then he's way into fashion and has amazing style. Im like ""wow. Thats pretty...I mean with the lisp thats pretty male homosexual like. But plenty of straight guys lisp and like fashion."" Then it cuts to him doing a jump into the splits and Im immediately like: ""He's gay."" And low and behold he is. 


This was, for me as 30 something lesbian, a wonderful funny moment. Because getting to see this wonderful young man who was so self assured and full of life. Totally proud and loving who he is brings me so much hope for so many. Be who you are my dudes. Be like Johnny. Love who you are. ❤️",gay
How Gay Conversion Therapy Got A Foothold In Canada,,gay
Gay stories from Russia #2,"Hello everyone and thank you for your support yesterday

&amp;#x200B;

So let's start with the short story from the time when I was a teenager. I **was raised in a traditional family** in a very small town (like 8 000 citizens). Also my family is quite **religious**, so I listened to many times some stories about the church and the God's law, specially from my mother. Noone never talked to me about sexual life or sexuality in general. The boys should date the girl, the girl should date the boy. That's the rule.

So **when I was 14**, I started thinking about that I'm more attracted to boys, to my classmates. I had much more interest in them comare with my interest in girls. I liked girls to talk with but never thought about any physcial contact with them. I guess it is very common among gays. But issue was my culture. I remember that time, 2008, when our Russian media claimed that there was a gay virus, or some TV programms showed that gays are the biggest sinners in our lives and if you meet such person you should pray later and visit the church, or better to bring that person to priest...Moreover, I live in a very religious city in my country, like, I would say the most religious one, so you can imagine, so mostly everyone follows spiritual rules. (I say nothing bad about religion, I respect. I complain about people who blindly judge people).

With all that said, I couldn't imagine any relationships with the boys. After I realised that I was gay and had no feelings towards girls, I was very scared. The most horrifying was that I had noone to talk about it. I wwas very curious about how people thought about gays that time, all my friends and family said things like

&gt;Woow, such people should go to asylum.

Or

&gt;Gays must be isolated. The prison is their place

After that I got an idea that I would never have any relationships and it is better for me to go to monastery, where I could stay alone. You know, it worked...I had **no experience until my 22**. No hugs. No cuddlings. No kisses. Nothing. I missed that. It simply passed by me. I got zero skills in dating during that age. It had a great effect on my life later when I got a feeling that ""I want to try. I want to experience that"" but I had no idea how to do that. It took me time to enter the community and understand how things work there.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Unable to Have Crushes Anymore...,"When I first attempted getting into gay dating, I used to be hopeful about finding someone special; in fact, I used to be able to have crushes on eligible guys.

After 5 or so years with nothing to show for it, other than rejection and signs of being ghosted, I've become so cynical and psychologically broken that I think I've lost all ability to have crushes on anyone.

Have I therefor lost any ability to love or be loved? If anyone else has lost the ability to have crushes, how do you live with it or get past it?",gay
How did you guys do it?,I am a closeted 20 year old guy in college trying to work up the courage to come out. I think my parents will hate me if they find out I'm gay. How did you guys end up working up the courage to come out??,gay
i have a crush on my (maybe) straight friend,hi im 15 years old and i found out that im bisexual (and still questioning) around two years ago. i have a friend that i have three classes with and i sit next to her for all of those classes. i started getting feelings for her in the middle of the year and i do not know what to do. only my close close friends know that im gay because i trust them and i dont want to be judged based on my sexuality. i really want to ask her out but i dont know if she likes girls. what if i somehow get the courage to ask her and she rejects me because she doesnt like girls. i really like her but im afraid she'll treat me differently and not be as close to me as before. im afraid that she'll be disgusted and stop talking to me because i tried to get with her. What should i do? should i let this crush go? should i ask her? how?,gay
Minister condemns plans for Uganda’s first LGBT centre as ‘criminal act’,,gay
Something weird just happened,This dude followed me into the gym restroom to ask if I was gay when I got finished using the restroom and it looked like he was fundling with his belt buckle and I could see his dick print (obviously hard). I was all like “...yeah why?” And he said “oh nothing” and he looked like he’d been caught in the middle of something. Btw this is high school. I’m so confused,gay
Now I'm finally happy.,"Sorry this post is SUPER LONG it's just a life story of my unhappiness to happiness which I thought would be nice to share

Currently, I am a college student in California living my best life. It could be better but why settle for more when you can settle for less and still be happy. Although, I am happy now previously I was not.

Middle school and High school were the worst years of my life and it absolutely sucks that it had to go that way. In Middle school, I was careless and carefree until a single individual walked into my life and everything started changing so rapidly, I would be doing gay acts and and I was being questioned by my parents and from there every action I wanted to do had to be thought about and evaluated.

I didn't realize I was gay until my High school years where I started to masturbate. I truly hated myself for it, there is nothing else worse than hating yourself. Every day was a dread and every night was tempting. The reason I self-tortured myself was because I have a very strong bond with my mom. I felt like being gay would disappointment her and our life already is complicated. (I swear she has like the worst luck ever but she's hanging in there.) So I dd what every closeted guy did, I acted straight I made horrible jokes about gay people. I was best friends with a super cool person but hiding my true self to him was another self torture I went through. Then, from Sophomore year to Junior year I was having mental breakdowns every time I entered the shower and I constantly kept distancing myself from him, my mom on the other hand was having problems with my step dad so she left and I had no one from the times I was with her I always came in her room and started crying and she would always ask me what's wrong but I couldn't tell her and when she wasn't here, I always called her crying. Losing my best friend was probably broke me the most. Since, I was not able to talk about my real problems with anyone I valued him as a family person so losing him as a friend was horrible for me. Mental breakdowns happened nonstop I couldn't go to school because I didn't want to see him. I listened to sad songs to cope with it, then, I was able to go to school but always had to listen to music. Those nights feeling alone felt like forever and they tempted the most. I had no one close to me, my mom had left my step dad and I was stuck with my step dad.

Senior year I was absolutely sick of it. I came out to 3 people and it felt refreshing to talk about my real problems, then near the end of high school I was ready to come out to my mom. I had a back-up plan and everything. If she didn't accept me I would live with a friend and have a part time job and see where it goes from there and I could get out of the car immediately since she was dropping me off. I told her right when she dropped me off and she told me something but I forgot but I did get a text message later on saying She would love me no matter what that I was still her son. Now it was only her and my other friends that knew. Next thing is my family, I really wasn't prepared for my family but I could careless about my step dad's family honestly. My mom's family is very supporting no matter what and if they didn't accept me there would be something seriously wrong knowing that my aunt is lesbian LOL. I had lost one of the friends I came out too but I knew she could keep that secret for me.

I had finally graduated high school, all those nights crying to myself were over but in a way it really wasn't. My family still didn't know so I was really thinking about how I wanted to do it, at first I wanted to do a video but eh I can't record myself and i'm a very shy person. I ended the idea with a Instagram post since I have nearly everyone and it could be a two in one. This [post](https://www.instagram.com/p/BlQ6ywkly8Y/?utm_source=ig_web_copy_link) was made up in the middle of the night and I knew I was ready to post it. Granted much love from friends and family. I started to enjoy being me a lot more. 

College starts and now I am so happy and music really helps out with everything and all my friends know but they like to announce it to everyone which I have to fix, but it really doesn't bother me. Everything feels so much better, and for once in my life I want to live.",gay
Old friends blow / new friends,"I've got friends to go to the bar w or come over and play pool with, but to leave the city... Hell no! And i offered to pay 4 everything so money isnt it.

I understand most of them have girls or wives but I don't understand why 1 night away is such a big deal. None of them are gay so i have no1 to ask to go to anything.  And then if it's even remotely related to something gay its a hard pass for them.

I've always been a loner but I never go out without friends. Its kinda a lose lose....
",gay
"Kiddo &amp; I - DIAMONDBACK - Hello Gay Redditor’s, gaybro’s can ride too. Just a video I made to showcase my passion and enthusiasm in motorcycle riding with my ‘73 Honda CB500 Cafe Racer. Hope you enjoy it as much as I did. [13 Hour Edit] Music: Black Wave by K. Flay.",,gay
Good Friend likes me,"Hi Gays,

&amp;#x200B;

I wanted to get your opinion as I don't really know where else to turn.

&amp;#x200B;

I met an older guy earlier this year, at a gay bar. We initially dated for like a hot second but then I realized I wasn't feeling it. The last thing I want to do is take advantage or lead anyone on (as I've been on the sucky end of that road too many times) so I told him this a while back. That I love him for so many things but I just don't feel \*right\* dating him.

&amp;#x200B;

I get how this can be hurtful to someone, so I've tried to be aware of this. Despite any hurt feelings he may have/ has had, we've remained two really great friends. I go over to his house all the time, for drinks, movie nights, talking -- we go out a lot to bars for karaoke and just fun times. We literally spent this whole last weekend together.

&amp;#x200B;

I feel as though we're almost dating but without the sexual aspect to it. We were, at one point, sexual but have cut that off since as I want to avoid any confusion, if possible. 

&amp;#x200B;

He is so kind and caring and still wants to be great friends. But he also confided in me that he still also wants to be my boyfriend... I don't know what to do with this. We get along great, but again, I just don't have \*those\* feelings for him and I don't think it'd be fair to either of us to pretend they are there.

&amp;#x200B;

My question is this: Is it ok to continue our friendship? The last thing I want to do is hurt him, as I care for him very much. He claims he's ok with it, but I can't help from feeling badly about it... What is appropriate? Friends, what would you do in my situation?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR: Once dated an older man. Cut off the sexual aspect because I wasn't fully feeling it. Remained close friends to this day. He claims he's ok being just friends, but I also know he still likes me and would preferably be my boyfriend. I want to continue our friendship but I also don't want any hurt feelings. Help.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you :)",gay
[Please read] Will I ever stop falling for straight guys?,"&amp;#x200B;

Although I have been surfing this website for a few years, I just created an account today. I have a question that I don't feel comfortable discussing with anybody IRL, mainly because everyone who I might feel comfortable enough to confide in is straight. I finally decided to consult one of my biggest sources of LGBT-related advice: this subreddit. Before I get to the big question though, I feel it is necessary to supply you with some background information.

I am a cisgender gay male. I'm 15 years old and a sophomore at a private Christian high school. I do cheerleading there and was the only boy on the squad up until this year. My favorite singers are Selena Gomez, Britney Spears, and Ariana Grande, but I also love learning about older gay icons. I live in Tennessee and I love it here, even if it means that I know few LGBT people. I've never really struggled with being gay up until this year, but that's a story for another post and I don't think it's relevant to the question I'm asking today.

Ever since I can remember, I've only had crushes on straight guys. Mainly my classmates, but my school has a lot of young, attractive male teachers who I've also gotten crushes on before.

The boys at my school are, generally, relatively nice to me. None of them have ever said the f-slur to my face or explicitly made fun of me for being gay. I'm not super close with any of them, but I have a few guy friends who I feel comfortable enough to make small talk with... and these are the guys that I usually find myself falling for.

This is problematic for mainly two reasons. Firstly, I *hate* perpetuating the ""predatory gay"" stereotype. Secondly, crushing on someone who has a 0% chance of liking me back obviously has serious emotional repercussions. I just can't seem to stop myself from getting these feelings.

This is what I've always chalked it up to: It's not necessarily that only like straight boys, it's that I like boys, and straight boys are all that's around me. However, I recently devoted some serious thought to it, and I don't think that's really true.

I'm worried that I will never have this intense of a crush on another gay man. Subconsciously, I think straight men are inherently more masculine and consequently more attractive. I know that's not true and I wish I didn't think that, but the fact of the matter is that I do. I wish I could help it. And, as much as I hate saying this, I think that part of me enjoys the chase.

So, what do you think? Did any of that make sense? Did any of you ever feel this way in high school?

Please help a confused teenager out and answer if you can. Thank you all so much :)",gay
Should I tell my best friend?,"So quick backstory on my situation. I am a 35 year old married (to a woman) male with two younger kids. The problem is that I am completely gay. I have no internal struggles with being gay, I am comfortable with it and rather enjoy it to be honest. I'm not flamboyant at all, and have done a pretty incredible job at hiding it all my life... I am just a regular guy. I'm into things like mountain biking, hunting, backpacking, and I work as an auto mechanic. Trouble is that I was never strong enough to come out when I should have. As I get older I'm kind of realizing just how soul crushing hiding had been. On the other hand, I realize that my cowardice over the years has and will hurt the ones I care about. (Mainly my wife and kids). I am ashamed and full of regret for this. It's because of this that I don't know if I should even come out at all. Just keep pushing it down.

I really wish I had someone who understands what I am struggling with to talk to. I am desperate to come out to someone, but at the same time, that is a cat you can't put back in the bag. If I decide to really do it this time, I need some time to fully understand what I am getting into with divorce and what happens with the kids and all that jazz. I am risking everything, but I think the reward might be worth it.

So down to the real question. If I told someone I know, it would probably be my best friend. We have been best friends since grade school, and we still live just a few miles apart. He is also married with kids, and from everything I can tell, he is straight. I have never wanted to risk our friendship by telling him something like this. I know it would be kind of a bombshell to have your best friend drop that on you. Some may view it as a betrayal. I think he would be understanding, but I can't say for sure. I would have to be completely trusting that he would remain completely silent about it. I know it is screaming ""bad idea"", but I really need to talk to someone. I don't know who to turn to though.

Ideally I could find someone that is gay and in my area (South East Michigan) to go biking with and chat. They obviously wouldn't have all the answers to my questions, but it would feel amazing to just have even one gay friend I could be myself around.... Not feel like I am hiding... Ironically, I would have to be very discreet at this stage. Not looking to cheat on my wife, just looking for a friend.",gay
Why can they not be honest?,"just wish christian ronaldo and tom cruise would be honest and admit they are gay, its the worst kept secret there is. no matter how many women they are photoed with does not hide the real fact they are gay. It gives honest open gay men a bad name.",gay
Any anal sex advice?,"So in a few days I'm going to be in my boyfriend's place for the first time, since he's going to be alone. We don't have the intention of having sex, but of course, it could happen. Talking about that, he just told me that he's been planning on going to buy condoms. We've talked about anal sex more than once at this point, and even if we don't know when we'll be ready (we're virgins), both of us want it to happen.

The thing is, I tried it a few times with my ex, and we never managed to do it because it just wouldn't enter and it was too painful (even though we used lubricant). Of course, I've used my fingers before, but just once or twice in the past, and never more than two fingers. So even if I really want it to happen, I'm a bit afraid of it.",gay
"“Dirty paws” aka “werewolf boyfriend” , I’m sure lots of you have seen this, but it’s so adorable it needs a reviewing 😃",,gay
DJ Hooligan - Hear You Now (Electronic/Chill),,gay
"Philadelphia unveils ""Edie Windsor Way"" sign to honor gay rights campaigner",,gay
Gay Stories from Russia #1,"Hello everyone!
My name is Boxy_Fox and here my first post coming. I'm a young gay from Russia, 24 y.o. super interested in social connections and compares. I know that in media, specially European, Russian gay law presented in a terrible way and I was asked many times how we can live here. I would be glad to share some stories from my life if I see some interests about this topic. So thumbs up if you like it 👍🏻",gay
Taiwan to Hold Vote on Gay and Lesbian Marriage. LBGT activists worry that a vote could threaten the future of gay and lesbian marriage in the country while also being a waste of money.,,gay
D&amp;A’s Cottage - Labour Day Weekend - DIAMONDBACK - Not your average gaybro at the cottage for a weekend.,,gay
The Gym: Welcome to our Church,,gay
"The benefits of being the gay older sibling, your younger brother’s remarks are ineffective.","Me: *nagging about his manners (as an older sibling does)*

Him: “Okay, I get it! Stop taking things up the ass all the time!”

Me: “Sorry, can’t help it. I do anal, so it’s natural to me”",gay
I think I prefer cuddling more than sex,,gay
Straight guy needing your advice.,"Hey, I know I'm not gay but have much respect for gay people. Im assuming you're all happy to help given the issue.

Basically I masturbate anally and bought myself a new dildo (rather larger than I thought). I've used it twice, but the second time it was harder to get in and a few days after I had a really bad itch around my butt hole.

I went to the doc and she said I had thrush. I didn't tell her what I had been doing but I shave my ass and I'm (possibly wrongly) assuming she thought I was gay as she suggested sexual health tests.

Im just wondering how I could have gotten it if it's transmitted, and if it could be something else. I use tea tree oil after shaving and may have put too much on, or maybe my two rides of my toy were too close together?

The prescription has helped so she was probably right. Its just new to me and wondered if it was normal?

Any advice is much appreciated.

Thanks for reading :) ",gay
Major Victory for LGBT Community in Romania,,gay
The relationship seems to be too good to be true after I caught him playing games,"So if you’ve read my previous posts, I’ve been dating this guy for about two months and 1 month a half later I offered him to either stay in an open relationship/fwb or date monogamously which he agreed to the latter but I came to find out that he was speaking to other guys on Grindr and was talking to someone and sleeping with them. So I confronted him and basically walked out of whatever we were doing. He apologized and saying that he was being selfish and didn’t realize what he had. Since it was still very knew I thought why not give it another try but I told him this time no excuses. Before that whole me leaving thing happened, he was being more and more distant and we were not even sleeping together anymore. Also he used to act really irritated around me. Now, he always “misses me”, we actually talk and have fun now, and he’s been really into this to the point where it freaks me out a little bit. I don’t want it to not be genuine, but I am taking it with a lot of caution this time around and there won’t be any other chances. I usually never go back but I really like this guy. ",gay
Oof me up my bois. 🤘,,gay
How does an old queen find someone to just hang out with?,"I'm a 45 year old drag queen that has a lot of fun on the weekends but I am dreadfully lonely during my ""straight act"" job all week. I have people asking me why I'm not married, etc. Dating apps usually have nothing but creepy old men within my age range and the younger guys think I'm too old. Where can I meet a decent guy other than at the one gay bar I do my shows at on the weekends?  ",gay
A series of confessions...,"People Know....

Have they always known?

Shooting Patron

All Alone

Talking On the Phone

Shall I stay or Shall I begone?

What Is it worth?

Should I fly to Perth?

Who Knows... I could be in the back of a hearse 

Use the rope?

Call the Pope?

No... I have no Hope...

Hard to stay happy, when its really a forced smile

Ive been thinking awhile

Is it worth killing myself as a child?

Its almost wild

That something so big could spark denial,

Years of waiting,

Hoping for a saving...

So I don't start hanging.

At least Im in a better point

where those thoughts no longer fill.

where I no longer smoke a joint

Now im in a new life,

Experiencing love at first sight.

But with all my might,

I hope I can too pull him out of the fight...

&amp;#x200B;

Love isn't a Choice...

&amp;#x200B;",gay
The L word.,"Hello everyone! I have been in a few relationships and have expressed the L word to a couple of them.

For the first time after 5 months ofl dating I said the L word and he changed the topic.

I talked to him a bit later that night and he cares deeply for me but isnt there yet. I've been taking a second to get over it but this is a first for me.  I'm not sure if he will get there. 

So how does everyone else deal with not receiving the L word back?
What's your opinion on my situation?
Or do you have a good first L word story to share?",gay
Is this normal in the lgbt+ community?,"Is it normal for me to doubt my sexuality after I've thought I was a lesbian for years? I feel like its normal, but I keep doubting myself more and more. I think this might be just because of the amount of homophobes at my school, but still. What do I do?",gay
could really use some honest advice here,"hi im 26 btm and have only been active with guys for 3 weeks. I am completely in the closet and have not told a soul about my sexuality.

I met a guy on grindr yesterday night. he is 20 years my senior. I am british-hungarian and he is portugese. it was supposed to just be an nsa hookup.

But when i got to his place and went inside and we clicked straight away. we talked for over an hour about random stupid stuff which never happens on grindr meets.

We ended up having sex which was life altering by the way :) and i ended up sleeping in his bed. for the first time i actually woke up next to a man. we cuddled all night long skin on skin and i have never felt more comfortable in somebody elses presence.

He wants a relationship but i said i was just there for fun. i think i have fallen for him and not just because of the sex, he is a kind, caring, and uplifting man. I have had few sexual encounters with men and am going a little crazy with meets atm (always safe) because i have suppressed my sexuality for so long. Now i have thought about it i really regret saying no to him but on the other hand I feel like i need to act on my slutty impulsive desires.

what the hell do i do? im so confused now:/",gay
I want more from my life,"I've been posting on here a lot lately bc it's honestly just an outlet to let out feelings when I have no one to talk to. I'm pansexual and I really want a relationship at the moment with another woman but I don't know where to look. I know what I want but I'm not good at putting myself out there. I'm 18 so I can use dating apps but I've never used one before. I know relationships aren't everything at this age but I've only had bad ones so far and I want to see what it's like to feel loved. When I think about a gay relationship rather than a straight one my heart fills with joy. I can see myself being genienly happy, I'm just scared. ",gay
Is there a step by step guide to how to become Felix Mallard?,"He is driving me nuts, I want to look exactly like him",gay
Need relationship advice,"So im gay (bottem) and i just got into a relationship with a top, and im nervous cuase this is my first relationship, i don't want to screw this up, any advice?",gay
Riiiiiiiiight...,,gay
What gay website is this,,gay
"What are your favourite features/qualities in men, GO!",I love hearing about things that guys like about other guys and I'd love to hear from you. I'm a gay guy but I often like to bother the lesbians if you know what I mean. LOVE YOU!,gay
Crossposting from r/Grindr,,gay
Whenever I see a cute boy from Idaho.,,gay
Have you ever felt jealous of straight people?,"I have for several reasons:

&amp;#x200B;

1- Much wider pool. They are everywhere. You don't need to go to gay places to find them. Gays are a small minority. We don't have many options. Additionally if you're exclusively looking for a top (or bottom) that's the amount of gay men divided by half. 

2. They are more likely to seek long term relationships. It is not a priority for the majority. And those who are interested are not necessarily my type. 

3. It is much easier to show off your gf/bf. You can readily tell your family/colleagues about them. 

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Florida's most famous gaybourhood invests in homes for gay seniors,,gay
I was very disappointed.,,gay
"Photos from the 45th Annual Castro Street Fair in San Francisco, California",,gay
what it feels like to live in 2018,,gay
Ain't no gay in my cum!,,gay
I need dating advice,"So I’ve been talking to this guy for just over a month now. I really like him, but he sends mixed signals. We texted quite a bit at the start but now it’s only really a few texts a day. We’ve met up three times, and I feel like we got on well and we both say we’ll see each other again. But then between dates he doesn’t reply much and he works 60+ hours a week so it’s hard to find a time that’s he’s free. I’ve asked him out on a few dates and he’s said no all the times except one because he’s busy. So how do I text him more and spend more time with him without being clingy and always texting him asking to meet (and being rejected)? :) ",gay
"With books and jewels, drag queens teach children tolerance",,gay
The rainbow prevails! Romania's anti-gay marriage vote fails,"I dunno if anyone here remembers, but the past few weeks have been awful for Romanian gays as Social Democrat Party, the leading party of Romania, the Romanian Orthodox Church and quite a lot of public figures spread propaganda for this weekend's referendum. [Here's another post about it](https://www.reddit.com/r/gay/comments/9j13fz/help_to_stop_romanias_antigay_referendum/).

The aim of the vote was to change the definition of a family in the Constitution of Romania as follows:

""A family is established through the marriage of two spouses"" -----&gt; ""A family is established through the marriage of a man and a woman""

Basically they wanted to preemptively ban gay marriage before any gay couple tried to claim the Constitution allowed them to marry each other(except we weren't allowed to marry anyway, so it was entirely pointless).

""Coalitia pentru Familie"" (Coalition for Family - the main organization that proposed the vote) argued that gay marriage ruins the concept of family and that Romanians and all Christians should defend the values of a ""traditional family"". They spread propaganda around the country that gay marriage ""allows homosexuals to take poor/orphan kids and claim them as their own"", ""will change the educational system in such a way that homosexuality isn't condemned anymore, and encouraged or obligatory"" and that ""it will doom Romania as homosexuals will take action to push their own agenda to completion"". Basically a load of bullshit, and coupled with religious arguments and beliefs it led to an entire online and offline shitstorm.

However it seems like their attempts have severely failed. Even though the vote was held for two days instead of the usual one, [only 20.41% of Romania's population](https://www.romania-insider.com/referendum-against-same-sex-marriages-in-romania-records-very-low-turnout/) voted, with 9% less than the required amount of votes for the referendum to pass to the next stage (tallying the yes and no votes), which was 30%. Unless some incredible acts of manipulation and corruption take place tomorrow, the referendum is considered failed, and Romania's Constitution remains unchanged.

So, fellow queers, the big gay won, as it should. I think we should celebrate a bit, and I'm gonna go ahead of all of you and enjoy a few glasses of rum!

By the way, did I mention the government plans to allow same-sex civil unions? So basically we both thwarted an anti-gay vote, we also are managing to (sorta) legalize gay marriage - I'll add another glass of rum for this.",gay
Generic coming out post,"I’m gay. Sorry to clog your timelines. Just a 26 year old guy finally figuring it out and needed to tell someone. Make it a great day, everyone. ",gay
being gay is rad 😎😎😎👌👌👌,,gay
The gay community in my area is not very welcoming. Is thos common in other places.,"I went to a bear event today.. it wasn't planned. I was visiting with a friend and he wanted to go. It's not usually my thing, but that's only because any time I've attempted to join similar festivitues I've had the same cold welcome. 

I saw a guy I had been set up on a blind date with a few months ago.. We weren't a good match, but we were friendly.. and he still works with my best friend (who set us up). I smiled at him when he walked past. He looked right at me and then kept walking. I saw an older couple I'd befriended a while back.. used to chat online all the time, and they'd invited me to their house a bunch of times. It's been about a year since I'd seen them. Again, I smiled and said hi.. they both walked right past. There were four other guys there that I'd previously chatted with online.. All of them looked at me,  I smiled.. they turned away. My friend introduced me to someone he knew who has the same name as I do. He said, ""Hello, I'm such and such."" I said, ""I'm such and such too.."" .. he turned away saying, ""I'm such and such ALSO...."" with a condescending tone. Two different guys came up to my friend to say hello.. I was standing right next to him and they acted like I wasn't there. I ended up leaving the venue and standing by the street until my friend came out. 

Over the summer I joined an lgbt hiking group. The first hike was great.. The second hike was ok.. The pictures I tried to post to the group album weren't accepted by the admin.. Then I stopped receiving notifications about upcoming hikes. I have no idea why. 

This is the kind reception I get every time I try to include myself in the lgbt community here. It's like everyone has their clique, and no outsiders are allowed. It makes me feel like I'm back im high school... and it's really fucking depressing. 

I'm not a bad looking guy. I'm quiet, bit not standoffish. I think I'm pretty nice. I just really don't understand. 

Is this what the gay community is like everywhere? Elitist, cliquey snobs?",gay
Honestly the only pussy I will ever need,,gay
Thicc Men,"Anyone else interested in fatter, chubbier, huskier men? ",gay
"Please help me , my life in danger","My name is Ahmad from Syria, I'm 17 years old and I live in Egypt with my mother and siblings as my father has been killed by Da'esh
I've been living in egypt for 6 months now. And I  applied for resettlement to UNHCR  on 31st of My 2018 at the department of protection in Alexandria for sexual asylum because my life is in danger ( my reference is : 740-18C00216 )
Now the situation is very serious and my life is under threat and Direct killing , I have tried to contact UNHCR through Maha and  I called on 2/9/2018 and again on 3/9/2018 and again on 4/9/2018 and again on 20/9/2018 and again on 1/10/2018 and again in 3/10/2018  and I got no answer.
I even called the hotline and I asked to arrange an interview, they refused and told me they will notify department of protection to contact me and they did not.
I contacted CARE  organization a lot and they are not helping at all and they ask me to contact UNHCR and And they refused to provide me with the email address of the employee in charge of my file in the department of protection ، please help me 💔",gay
If I made a group on groupme for LGBT people would anyone be interested in joining,,gay
I love my pussy 💕 hope you do too,,gay
My friend outed me,So half a year ago i came out to this freind. Now i recently came out to a mutual friend and he told me my other freind told him. I was pissed at him and asked him what the hell. Then he lied to me and told me he didnt say it. Afterword he made exuses and told me he was drunk or some shit. I was pretty fucking mad at this point and told him hes an asshole. Then he thretened to tell my other freind and tell me i was nothing without him. I was never more angry in my god damn life then i am now. I decited to cut ties with him. The only problem is that he can still out me to freinds. And i dont really know what to do,gay
"""Too good"" for him","22M and like a lot of posts by guys my age on this sub, this is about dating and how much it fucking sucks. However, I think my situation is a bit different from most. 

&amp;#x200B;

So, essentially, I've been doing pretty well getting first dates but second and third dates are harder to come by. Typical stuff, but it's usually for one of two reasons: 1) the dude just straight up ghosts me (I don't mind or care when this happens) or 2) the guy thinks I'm ""too good"" for him (I mind and care **a lot** when this happens). The former happens more than the latter but the latter annoys the ever living fuck out of me. Now, I'll be the first to admit that I am a very methodical, particular, and controlling person but only when it comes to my *work*. Where personal relationships are concerned, I've learned to chill out, let things go, and let people be people. But no matter what I do or say, guys keep getting the impression they're somehow inadequate and that I should ""date someone who can keep up with you better"" (something a guy said to me once verbatim). 

&amp;#x200B;

I just don't know what to do. I feel like it's just a bullshit excuse these guys are throwing at me to spare my feelings rather than just saying straight up they don't want to keep dating. But it's repeated enough times where I honestly can't dismiss it as a mere coincidence. Four different guys have given me the same stupid reason, for Christ's sake, so there must be something I'm doing wrong, right? My friends say the *guys* are the one with the issue, not me, but I just don't think that's the full picture. However, I'll be honest, while I do my best to keep the controlling and critical parts of my personality strictly to my work, I do relapse into bad habits and let it trickle into my personal life. But *never* when I'm getting to know someone new. Then on top of it all, I feel like a crazy douche and narcissist for complaining about all this. Like I'm showing off or fishing for praise. 

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know what I'm hoping to get out of this, I think I just needed to get this all off my chest because it's been bugging me for awhile now. If any of you guys have any wisdom or advice for me, it'd be greatly appreciated, though. ",gay
Yaaasss,,gay
Me: *does 5 squats*,,gay
Friendship Dilemma,"TLDR: Recently broke up with my fiance, fooled around with one of my best friends. Is this wrong?

OK not sure if this is the correct sub to submit this to but I have a dilemma.

I have a friend and we are going to call him H. We matched on Tinder a few years ago and have been really good friends. My fiance and I recently split and I've been on my own as he moved out and across the country. 

Fast forward to today. I went over H's house and was hanging out. We had lunch and ran some errands as we usually would. When we got back to his place we laid down in his bed to nap. I forgot to mention I think H is actually very hot and although I had a fiance, I was always attracted to him. (I met H before I met my fiance). As we are laying he starts to cuddle me which was pretty normal for us. We joke around about each other and make sexual jokes which again is completely normal. At one point I made a joke about cutting his D**k off and he unbuttoned his pants, I grabbed his stuff and we just continued to cuddle. We eventually took our pants off and cuddled in our underwear. I awkwardly got a boner and he felt it and then I told him I was embarrassed. So in return I fluffed his up so he was also hard. We started to rub each other over our underwear and he stopped because he said it was weird. We stopped and continued to just cuddle. We eventually started watching porn and both took our underwear off and started to jerk each other off. He said he felt weird again so I tried to kiss him to make it less awk... IDK? We eventually stopped everything and just watched a movie. 

This is a weird situation because its not awkward between us, but I'm still attracted to him. My ex will probably be so upset when he finds out. I want to continue to fool with H but I don't want to make him feel awkward.

Anybody been in a similar situation and have any advice?

Thanks.",gay
Relationship Advice Please !!!!,"Hello,

Me and my partner have been together for 2 years and I’ve seemed to have this consistent problem but maybe it’s just me .

This year so far I have mentioned that I wanted to go to Mexico , Vegas, Oregon and/or Seattle together  several times .

It seems like once I mention I want to go to one of those locations with him, his friends beat me to the punch and ask him to go on a trip with them and it just so happens to be every location that I had previously said I wanted to explore with him . Each time he told me that one of his friends mentioned about wanting to go I asked if I can go to and then he tells me “It’s Just A Friends Trip” which means that boyfriends I guess aren’t allowed . He’s now been to Mexico, Oregon and Seattle with his friends and without me .

Two weeks ago I mentioned that I’m getting the itch to go to Vegas and want to go in December we looked at dates then chose when we wanted to go . His friend texted him yesterday and asked if he wanted to go to Vegas which he agreed to but I can’t come because it’s only a friends “trip “ so this is again another place that I said I wanted to explore with him that he went with his friends , in which I couldn’t come on any of them because he told me it’s a friends trip and no one else is bringing they’re significant other , which all of them have been with there bf/gf for less than 6 months .

Am I overreacting about this because it’s really starting to bother me .

Sorry it’s so much , thanks guys . ",gay
I am 26 I am lonely I have never kissed :(,,gay
I can see who I want to be,"I go to college in a part of the country where being gay is not easy. Accepting that I am gay has not been easy, but I have, and I'm not ashamed. Being honest with myself was a good first step, being honest with everyone else is a whole different thing.

My roommates are homophobic. Many of my friends are homophobic. My parents will be accepting, but the rest of my family is a toss up. 

I've made up my mind to leave this university. I am going to a place where I feel I will be accepted, back to my home state. I've started the application, looking for a place to live, and have met with advisors to make this easy. I can see that person I want to be, and the life I want to live. Why is it so hard for me to embrace this change? I feel like I'm living two lives, and one is so rooted in putting up this facade, that it might prevent me from doing what I want/need to do. 

How can I push myself to keep moving forward? I'm so utterly exhausted from putting up a front, but I know that putting myself through such a big change will be even more exhausting. I want to be me, not a shell of me.",gay
"Roommates new boyfriend left some product in the bathroom. Not sure you should use vinegar in your butt??? I use a few drops of castille soap for that minty fresh feeling, myself. (Don’t take this wrong—I love my roommate like a nephew.)",,gay
My First Gay Artist Music Video,,gay
Casual sex,"I've literally ruined my mentality when it comes to anything consistent. Everytime I start hooking up with someone consistently, I start to lose my ability to perform. It's quite possibly the most annoying thing ever. This guy I've been hanging out with got pissed at me for not wanting sex last night, but In all fairness, Everytime we hang out, we start but I don't want to finish. A little more context, I've never had a bf before, and he made a comment (we're just fuck buddies) that me talking about my feeling after coitus is what boy friends do, and that we both agreed that we weren't actively pursuing each other like that. I'm genuinely pissed. I'm pissed at him for trivializing my fear of commitment, and I'm pissed at me for not being able to have anything consistent in my life. Anyone have advice? Also, don't know if this is considered nsfw, and I don't know how to tag things anyways so",gay
Gay relationships in games or tv series,"Me: aww cute
Other gay persons: jshsjdjwbxjdbsbd",gay
"Just wondering if any of you fellas have any ""nice guy/nice girl"" stories of people coming onto you?",,gay
Tribes are just gay subclasses,Anyone have any ideas which tribes are which classes? ,gay
Smite,"Hieeee 😊
Anyone playing Smite?

Or just willing to marry me, I got fired.",gay
Seiyuu Danshi: 18+ BL/Yaoi Visual Novel / Dating Sim Game by Meyaoi Games,,gay
Questioning my sexuality,"I identify as a gay male, I’m out, all that. I feel really at home with that label. I don’t feel any romantic attraction towards women, and I feel romantic and sexual attraction towards men. However, I’ve noticed that every once in a while I experience a sexual attraction toward a woman. What am I?",gay
Thank you,"Hi. I'm gay. I'm really not into flamboyance and being outspoken about being gay. I tend to avoid people like that because it tires me. I'm also transgender. I never speak about transidentity or my sexuality with other people. I'm not really keen on pride parades, too much noise, people and stuff in general. 

But that doesn't mean that if you're """"""that kind of gay"""""" I don't respect you. Thank you for triggering change in the world, thank you for making up for what people like me don't say, dont complain about. Thanks to you, I could get married to the love of my life. Thanks to you, I can have hormone replacement therapy without being treated as a mentally ill person. Thank you for being unapologetically you. And thank you for keeping your head up high.",gay
Need some advice,"Hi everyone! 

My boyfriend is my favourite human being and we are very much in sync with one another. We've never fought and have always valued being honest with anything we may be feeling (open communication is our policy.) However he brought me the request to grow out his hair. Now it is his body, so I told him that isn't my call; however, I did state that I don't know if I will find that attractive (he wants to grow it out long.) He was incredibly saddened by this and hindsight I shouldn't have said anything. We're both twinks, but he is verrrry twinky and feminine and I am more muscular and kinda neutral on the feminine/masculinity scale. I love him to the moon and back though regardless.

I do not want him to change at all and want him to achieve anything and everything he sets his mind to. I am internally worried that it may be too feminine for me on a sexual attraction basis. I do not want this to be the case. Anyone with experience in more feminine gay guys know how I can be a better boyfriend and really overcome my own obstacles? Maybe hormones or something that I could take to offset it. Should I watch feminine porn or something to get used to it? What are my options, how do I settle myself?",gay
"Rainbow symbology evokes a sense of futility, amusement, and diffidence.",,gay
Going for my STI/HIV checkup - could use some support,"I’m super nervous. It’s not my first test, but it’s been a few years since I’ve had one because I get scared of what may or may not come from a test. Positive thoughts and vibes sent my way would be amazing. ",gay
Dubai hotels spa with action,Where is men’s hotels spas with action in Dubai ,gay
How to remove clothing association with gender?,"I’m a femme gay boi, and recently I tried on a skirt just out of curiosity. I actually really liked it: it’s comfortable, pretty, and great for running. I’ve started wearing shirts casually around my house now, but there’s a psychological problem with it: whenever I wear a skirt, I feel emasculated after a bit, which is not a very nice feeling. How do I stop this?",gay
I was taking a walk alone as normal kill me plz am going to be alone forever.,,gay
my school is planning on starting a group for LGBT students.,"we've started a group chat on google hangouts and have talked to our principal, six people have said they will definitely join and four others have said they possibly will. we'll meet in our schools library and talk about issues we're facing and maybe watch some movies. I'm so excited!!!!",gay
The white man is the standard of beauty in the gay community,"I'm not white, but I admit it even though it's not right to say.

By white I don't mean caucasian (which can include North African and Hispanics).

I'm talking about those of European origins.

&amp;#x200B;

Of course not all white men are pretty. I'm saying that the prettiest of the white men are the standard of beauty to which we tend to compare ourselves.

Those who are light skinned and not matte, who have straight hair, a small but pointy nose, who are tall, etc

&amp;#x200B;

Do you agree with this?

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/ecorvshjiqq11.jpg

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/ohjbk2teoqq11.jpg",gay
No idea what to do.,"I recently started going to a new college just to finish my last year and get my degree a little closer to home. At first I was excited and all for both school and the oppurtunity to meet new people. 

School is going fine, but the people just suck. Everyone just ghosts me and such. This just adds to the fact that none of my ""friends"" go out of their way to ask how I am doing or anything concerning my wellbeing. So not only are my dating prospects basically zero, I am left with friends that just don't care.

Too top all those issues off, one of my ex's new boyfriends messaged me on Facebook only to put me down and show off them together. While its good that they are together, this obviously doesn't make me feel great. Infact it makes everything so much worse. 

So I am left here writing this wondering what is wrong with me. Why I am I worth so little to everyone I have ever talked to? Will it ever change?",gay
"When did the word ""gay"" gain it's current meaning?","In regular culture, when did gay transition from happy to same sex oriented? I was born in 1980 and it's always meant what it currently means to me.",gay
Help! The guy I like is getting to know someone else and... What would you do?,"Guys, I sincerely ask for your opinions and will be grateful if you kindly send me yours (opinions).
The thing is: I like a guy from work and I thought he was enjoying myself too (cause he was approaching very often, making me smile, giving me chocolates, and all those little things that matters a lot).
I'm so I'm love with him but I'm also very shy and I'm not an open person (I mean, I don't know how to interact w/ people). Also, I always had a low self esteem, so I think that he is much for me, and all  that.
This week I felt that he was strange at work. And yesterday I found out that he is talking to someone who's a friend of one of my personal friends. He is getting to know that guy and my friend (who didn't know I love him) told me that occasionally yesterday. Now I'm so broken. My heart is broken and I can't stop crying. I was planning to tell him what I feel, and then I found this out...
I don't know what I should do now. Should I avoid  him, don't respond to him there anymore, or should I try to get closer even though I'm mad? What do you all think?
I keep on thinking about him and that guy. I imagine he's giving love to him and I go crazy just  thinking about it.

Thanks guys for reading this. Help me out. What would you do if in this position? ",gay
When was the last time you changed your hairstyle?,"I've been rocking a form of the ""undercut"" for years now and I don't think I'm willing to change. 

I don't have straight hair so this haircut is really the only viable option I have. I know it's really popular among gays and it's funny seeing everyone look the same. 

How about you? ",gay
"Two-Father Babies Could Soon Be Possible, With No Egg Donor Required",,gay
"Seen listening to an ""interesting"" playlist","Background: Mum doesn't know I'm gay.

Wow ok so my mum just saw me listening to the playlist ""Pretty Gay!"" on Spotify 😂. I think it's ok tho, she's seen me listening to other gay themed playlists before, and said nothing",gay
PRESS INQUIRY // MEL Magazine // Gay Dads,"Hi, 

I'm a writer with MEL Magazine, a men's lifestyle publication in Los Angeles. I'm currently working on a story about gay dads and was hoping to ask any gay men with children a couple questions. If you're up for it, drop me a line and I'll send you the questions and you can decide if you want to participate. If not, no sweat!  

&amp;#x200B;

C. Brian Smith

[www.melmagazine.com](https://www.melmagazine.com)",gay
The reason why some feminine guys can appear mean/bitchy?,"Lately I've been thiini8ng about my life as a feminine guy and how I used to be very positive and happy despite having a rough social life of people being weird out by the fact I'm feminine. I remember running into older feminine guys who seemed bitchy or rude and I never understood why they were like that.

But after a decade of loving this difficult life of a feminine guy with no friends or lover or the fact my family doesn't really accept it in starting to understand why some feminine guys can be mean or butter. Because society dumps on guys like us and sometimes, hurt people just want get back even though it's not really right.

I'm curious if my thinking is accurate though. What do you think? ",gay
Positivity,"So this is probably my 1st really positive post. 

I'm leaving soon to drive 6 hours to meet up with my cousin to see troye sivan concert in philly tonight. I'm super pumped about the concert. 

My cuz has been a massive POS lately and we fought most of yesterday, BUT today is gonna be great!!!

 I'm more of an 80% edm and 20% hip hop / rap fan but I kinda sweat troye. Its the weekend y'all so live it up!!!",gay
Intercourse with undetectable +,"Hello all, I have been using PReP for around two months now and am thinking about getting with an individual that has the status of undetectable positive (+U).  I'm slightly worried I may catch HIV.  
How many of you (positive or negative) have regular intercourse with someone that has the opposite status of you?  

I really would like to get with the one individual, but I am worried I'll be the unlucky outlier to catch it.

Edit: I plan to top with a condom.  To my knowledge, my immune system is not suppressed.  I only know the person claims to be U+.  I was under the impression that as long as someone took their antiretroviral regimens, they'd remain undetected.",gay
Im male. Had a first time with a male and I kinda didn`t like it.,"Hello. I\`m a young guy. I like only girls, femdom, cuckolding and being dominated in general. 

Don\`t know where to post this exactly. But I\`m here to share my story, share tips and hopefully get some back.

So it began with me looking for a girl/couple that i will serve sexually. It didn\`t work out that well. Most of the couples were to old or didn\`t respond. Ones that did - still didn\`t work out. Girls nada. 

So long story, short I agreed to meet with two guys (separately). I met one today and the second one I\`m meeting next week. 

Was a bit nervous. We met, went to his place. While walking I was surprisingly calm as a stone. (I\`m shy, and not so good socially. I\`m sometimes scared to meet people I know. Not to mention people I don\`t know. ) 

In his apartment I got a bit nervous. We got naked. And he started touching me. First few seconds I felt very bad, as if I was raped. Then It was all well, and didn\`t get the same feeling at all. 

Now, I like being submissive and dominated. I like girls only and I like domination from guys, but I don\`t like guys for like romantic or touchy things. 

Continuing my story. He started stroking and then sucking me. It felt weird. Got hard mostly for the stroking part, but It wasn\`t ""hot"". Was imagining in my mind of being a cuck, and getting ordered my a girl to get used by a guy. Which helped me relax and get hard. 

Then I got to suck his dick, kneeling. I deep throat-ed him a bit, and he face fucked me. Which was the most pleasing part and I felt dominated. 

Then he started kissing/ french kissing me. I didn\`t like it, and then anal . It hurt a bit then got easier, but I ddin\`t feel the domination and he was kinda hugging me + pain, and I got flacid. Then he came in me. I thought I\`m going to finish him with my mouth. And then he just stroked me off. 

The end.

So all in all, the tip is make sure what you want and communicate with the person, so he knows also, no matter the gender....

I\`m meeting with the other guy in a week. And will make sure he knows what I want. And vise versa. + it cold outside, and Ill have my chastity bought at that time, so no way we do anything other that me giving oral. 

But here where my question  comes in: Do I tell him I don\`t like guys, being romantic with them, kissing yada yada? Cause I feel its a big turn of for them, makes it really weird, uncomfortable. Do I tell him I\`m there just for the domination, or just say I don\`t feel like kissing, want to be dominated, suck his dick? Since theres no way he can get mine, and cold we won\`t have anything else that oral, except he will maybe want kissing.

Any other tips are welcomed here. Also ask questions if you want.

**tl;dr**  : Was with a guy first time. I like domination but I don\`t like guys. Tip: make sure the other person knows what you want and vise versa. Question: I\`m meeting up with another guy, do I tell him I\`m not gay/bi, that I\`m there for domination. Or just tell him I don\`t feel like kissing.....?",gay
Boy Erased - Week Four • r/gaybrosbookclub,,gay
Is it wrong to cheat my wife with a guy?,"I am 22 and I've been married with my School sweetheart for 1 year now. I have a decent job that sent me to trips around the country. I love my wife, but always have been curious. In fact, some months of the year the only kind of porn I watch is gay/bi/trans. I do feel attracted to ripped/muscle men, but NEVER in my life have I ever been with a guy sexually. Sometimes I wonder if is wrong to cheat my wife with a prostitute men. I do feel attracted to call girls, but could go by them anytime. But with guys... Is just like I have to have.

Is it wrong to explore my sexuality AND corrupt my marriage?",gay
Gay Couples Stunning Paris Wedding Photos Go Viral,,gay
So like do my parents know?,"When I was going through my bi phase 3 years ago my parents found my convos with my friends and me being open with all of them. My dad took away my phone and literally didn’t say a word to me for a week, and my mom tried convincing me that kids who found out at my age are just “confused children” (I was 14 at the time) ever since then they’ve been acting like that entire week just never happened. So I’m acting straight whenever I’m around them and they seem like they think I’m straight. So I think they know and they just don’t want to admit it or they want me to come out, but that experience is just reminding me how unsupportive they’ll be if I do come out. Thoughts? I honestly just don’t want to tell them and I’ll like text them after I move out.",gay
Genuine attraction vs toxic masculinity,"I’m just going to copy and paste this part of a comment I wrote in response to another post from a couple days ago:

&gt; I looked a lot at some cute guys and even had a crush on someone in high school, but didn't realize I was actually gay until my sister asked me about my sexuality when I was 20. Until then, I had chalked my feelings up to the culture of masculinity where you want to pick out certain traits (younger/androgynous appearance, feminine/flamboyant behavior, etc.) in other guys that make them feel less manly and somehow ""inferior"" to you in order to feel better about yourself. (I never bullied anyone, but I was constantly thinking - and admittedly still think - these thoughts in my head since I've never been that popular or in the ""in-crowd"" in social settings.)

Perhaps instead of “culture of masculinity” I should have just said “toxic masculinity.”  But the point is that my feelings of attraction towards guys have always felt partly predatory.  Like I may genuinely think a guy has a nice smile, but then I’ll simultaneously think “smiling = showing emotion = vulnerability”, which leads me to conclude said guy is cute* (*: having the negative connotation of a “lack of manliness”).  And then I’ll use the thought of him being cute* to reaffirm my belief that I am, in a way, more manly or “dominant” than him.  Like the whole reason I’m attracted to twinks is because of the fantasy that I could physically dominate them, and in turn be able to actually exert some power over someone.  These thoughts could even extend to minors/children.

Obviously, I never outright tell anybody (in person) these feelings, nor do I ever really act upon them because it would become bullying at best, and sexual abuse (even pedophilia) at worst.  But I notice how males typically behave among their friends and peers, like they’re trying to one-up each other or assert dominance (if playfully), and I can’t help but think we’re all creeps deep down…it’s just that the *real* creeps are unashamedly blatant in their objectification of other guys (with malicious physical/verbal harassment).

So yeah, I’m pretty sure I’m incapable of having relationships that are 100% healthy.  There’s always at least one piece of someone’s (who I’m attracted to) personality, appearance, behavior, etc. that I fantasize about taking advantage of, despite knowing full well how wrong doing so actually is.  Can anyone relate to what I’m talking about?",gay
Why yes I am ...,,gay
Maybe a little rant and a question at once idk...,,gay
Why is he like this?,"So I have this friend. He’s the type of guy who hugs everyone and says I love you to everyone. Personally I’ve been going through a hard time in my life lately because things have just been getting impossible as Junior year takes its course. My love life is so barren, he’s the only guy who shows me any kind of affection, and I hate to admit but I need that from him.

Now I’m not writing this post because my feelings are unrequited because nah I’ve been there too many times before. No, the other day I went through a little depressive episode and he was there and he resolved to start flirting with me to try and cheer me up. We have this kind of relationship where it’s normal for us to hold hands, ruffle through each other’s hair and just be touchy in general, but this was the first time he went out of his way to call me cute and be that way.

On one hand I understand that this is just one of those things that guys do to be funny, it honestly doesn’t mean anything. But on the other hand he knows me, and I don’t know why he chose to flirt with me in that way. But I get it, he was just trying to help me out, but it kinda made me uncomfortable because his teasing was too much and I don’t like to see him like that because he’s my friend.

Maybe it I’m being too sensitive. But it made me very uncomfortable because it was in front of his girlfriend. Honestly I really don’t want to like him, but sometimes it’s hard to deny that he’s the only guy in my life who makes me feel good about myself. Little things. I need help.",gay
Yaaay its my cake day 😁,No real context here. It's just my cake day. Woohoo 😂,gay
send greetz worldwide,,gay
That feeling when you're an older gay man in a sauna...,,gay
It’s over guys,,gay
Dealing with other people's comments about adoption,"So because it's Friday, and because someone asked me a very, very stupid question about adoption - again - I thought I'd share this with you guys just in case you've been putting up with the same ridiculous nonsense from your colleagues, friends, family, etc. People mean well, but oh wow. Some of the things they come out with. Good prep for being a parent I guess. [Enjoy! And kudos if you've dealt with these in an awesome, riposte-ninja manner.](https://adoptioncocktail.blogspot.com/2018/10/dealing-with-other-people.html)

https://i.redd.it/nxx8190w6eq11.jpg",gay
Indian LGBT community won against the law,,gay
"Stay healthy, eat...",,gay
LGBTQ Conference in Lebanon Threatened by Security Forces,,gay
Discrimination in the educational field?,"Does anyone have any experience getting a job as a teacher (secondary school, more specifically) while being a member of the lgbt community? 

I’m still pretty young (16), but plan to seek this as a possible career in the future. I am a gay female and dress pretty masculine (plus a short hair cut, not dyed). I know my dressing style may change as I get older, which I am doubtful about, but for this scenario I’ll say it doesn’t. 
I guess my question is, specifically with a job in high school teaching, could my way of dress or sexuality affect my chances or become an obstacle? My home state is Ohio, if that helps with perspective. 

Any info or advice is appreciated. &lt;3 
",gay
My life,"Hey guys. I just want to tell you what my life is like. I am gay in a homophobic country and it really sucks. I am 23. I came out to my parents and friends which resulted in me losing almost all of my friends. My mom and dad dicorced since he refused to support my ""disgusting"" life. He and my brother don't want to see me ever again. I am very depressed and envious. I am really mad because I have missed on every aspect of being a teenager- I never dated, never had a relationship, never hit on someone at a party, nothing. And now I am 23 and still haven't done any of these things while my peers some of them are getting married and having kids. It's so unfair. I want to have a family and kids but under the laws here that is absolutely impossible. There are no ways of meeting other gay people, there are no gay bars, clubs, people on apps look for random hookups only( tried that 3 times and they were the worst experiences in my life) and I am stuck. I can't move away from here too. This is my pathetic life. Almost no family and friends and absolutely no way of ever finding love. And I am just insanely envious of guys that live in the West and USA, Canada and so on. It's not fair! Some people get to be in accepting countries where they can find love and support even if their families reject them and here I am in this shithole with no way of doing anything. I HATE MY LIFE!",gay
Have you ever confessed to a straight guy? How did it turn out? Do you regret it?,,gay
Gay words to describe other [gay] men,"I'm writing a research project at university and need words that you use to describe another gay man's type. Words like bear, silver fox, chaser etc",gay
Good Song,When you feel down and sad about your sexuality and listen to Christina Agellerias Beautiful song. Im into hard rock n Metal and even i like it. And ok yes i admit to liking Pet Shop Boys and a few others but you will never see me dance. Hate it.,gay
When a grindr guy with a blank profile and no picture messages you and you ask for his photo and he finally sends one.,,gay
Wtf is wrong with me?,"I need help to figure out what I'm going through which is probably obvious to people who aren't as conceited as me, but maybe not... apologies in advance for the SOC...

I'm mid 20s, student in the UK. Gay and out to family, friends an coworkers (everyone was fine about it blah blah) and have a bf who I really care about - we've been going out for almost 2 years and share a flat. All fine and dandy except I'm often all cut up inside about being gay and what I want! To the point I contemplate really awful things. 

&gt;!I want to say that I feel bad complaining about my problems after just reading posts from people who live in countries where being gay is illegal/ punishable but I need other people's perspectives, because I have difficulty knowing what I'm feeling (I intellectualise). !&lt;

I don't feel I can bring these things up with my friends, because I keep everyone at a distance (thinking rather than feeling) and I have recently come to realise that I am a massive people-pleaser, AND YET I couldn't care less about a lot of the people in my life, I just pretend to for appearance's sake. WTF is up with that, fellow gays?

My MAJOR gripe is that I'm only attracted to (forgive me) straight acting guys. I wrote this a *long* while ago:

&gt;!""For attraction, I need to be able to see them as a guy first and a gay second. If a straight woman isn't attracted to him then neither am I."" !&lt;

I stand by that, all these years later. Now, before everyone starts saying ""omg gays are guys"", let me explain what I mean. I will warn you, this is probably super problematic...

&gt;!Having a penis does not make you a man. !&lt;

That's literally it. That's it, explained. There are cis gay guys that have the same effect on me as women (which is, to say, none). There are trans guys that I have/ had major crushes on, and the fact that they possess or possessed female genitalia does not subtract from that attraction. What's he pattern then?

I just watched a few trailers for gay movies, because they soothe me. I then obviously stalked all the actors. What I found was that the fault line of my attraction ran right between actors that were straight and actors that were gay - just like in real life! Why am I non attracted to gay guys? WTF is this vestige of internalised homophobia doing here? The idea of having sex with a feminine gay guy arouses me as much as the thought of having sex with a woman. I hate this idea that I just need to work on my shame then suddenly I'll want to be with feminine guys. That's teh same logic as ""you just need to work on your relationship with your father and this gay phase will resolve"", or ""you've just not found the right girl, son"". I do not recognise attraction to anything other than cis gendered masculinity anywhere in my experience. 

Please don't hit me with ""oh there's no such thing as masculinity"" armchair sociology BS - you know of what I speak! Its that unmistakable X-factor that gay guys seem to me to be missing and that you, contrarian, probably get/ have plenty of to go around. 

It's not internalised misogyny either, that idea that I just think women are weak. I don't - I practically idolise some women, and the most important people in my life are women. I literally get anxiety around men. But I'm not attracted to women romantically or sexually. This idea that my attraction to masculine men springs from misogyny is ridiculous. You might as well argue that my homosexuality itself comes from misogyny, and that if I dealt with it I'd be straight - ridiculous!

Maybe I do have misogyny - but I assure you that it came *after* the advent of my romantic feelings towards men, it did not give rise to them. Moreover, it would have come after the envious realisation that the men I was attracted to only liked women, and the once that I could get *acted like them*. It's like they're trying to solicit the attention that straight women get, and that makes me feel really broken/ hopeless. 

The absolute worst thing is I would probably give 10 years of my life to be the recipient of the sexual attention that women get form men. Whenever I hear about harassment I am aware not of sympathy but jealousy! What the actual h\*ll is that?? I know that's disgusting!

So do I want to *be* a woman? I've had OCD since I was 9 and I just spent 2 years dealing with TOCD after an intrusive thought about having a vagina gave me panic attacks for months - it was awful (not the vagina *per se* but the crippling doub and anxiety). After lots of therapy I now know I am not transgender. Yet in some ways that would be easier - I feel like I'm stuck as a gay guy wanting the attention that straight women get (confident, assertive, fun masculine energy to *match* mine - I don't want feminine energy to 'complement' it), but other gay guys don't offer that. I feel like the length of gay relationships is determined by how long the more masculine partner can tread water until he gets sick of being the giver of masculinity. 

Next problematic core belief incoming: all you get from gay guys is coyness, insecurity, submissiveness, and f\*ck-me-daddy-eyes, and an over-willingness to explore ""muh feminine side"". Mate if I was attracted to female gender presentation (which is what campness is if we're objective about it), I'd literally not be gay! If feminine traits aren't present, then the guy is non-committal, an 11/10, unavailable, and/or a general douche. Or, worse, if you show them your masculine energy or they get comfortable enough around you, they ripen into a fruit before your very eyes! Another one bites the dust!

I just want this hang up to go away, but I also don't want to sacrifice genuine sexual attraction in my life. That would be worse than being alone... do you know what I mean?

Yet I also cannot insist that my partners keep internalised shame going as a talisman against the inevitable slope towards  what is, in everything but name, MTF transgender behaviour. I'm not attracted to women!

Recently I'd rather masturbate that bother having sex with my boyfriend, because when he's drunk or stressed he becomes a bit of a queen and I literally cant sustain an erection. He's also emotionally repressed and so vanilla. I feel so guilty and bad because the last thing I want is to hurt him - I would never forgive myself. I love him. 

What is wrong with me? Why am I so acutely aware of these things now?? I feel like a shit for harbouring such noxious beliefs and have no role models or friends to get my bearings from...",gay
When someone tries to harsh my gay vibes.,,gay
Solo adventurers: bars or clubs?,"I don't go out a lot and I'm 26. I also have a bit of social anxiety and I don't drink alcohol except for rare occasions. 
Which place provides the best opportunity to meet new gay men: bars or clubs?

Is it weird to come up to people I don't know in bars? Or should I rather invite he/them to my seating area?

In clubs do people expect to socialize given the loud music? Should I drag the person I'm interested to in a corner?

I'd love some help since I have little experience in those settings. And I'm just done with dating apps. It was fine when I was in my early 20s but I grew out of that phase.

Thank you",gay
Advice on Grindr and sex,"Hi! I feel kind of pathetic asking for this things but I would really appreciate advices from more people. So I recently signed up in Grindr and I have some concerns about it. I’m 19 and the thing is that I wanted to know if there’s a way that some people don’t see my profile, specially older men, not that I have anything against them, it’s just that I’m worried that some people would recognise me on my way to uni or home and since my neighbourhood is not very “pretty” I’m afraid something would happen to me. I know I might sound offensive, but it’s my first time and I just don’t want to feel paranoid all the time. If you have advice on privacy on all of that I would really appreciate it, like what happens when I turn the gps off and all of that. 

Regarding sex, I’m still a virgin and I know for sure I don’t want to have anal sex with a complete stranger yet because I want my first time to be with someone I feel safe. However, I don’t reject the idea of oral sex, in that case, do you have advice on how to do it better, safety and all of that? Thank you very much ",gay
I'm really pissed,"My school was hosting a blood drive. I went to try and donate because I'm 17 and don't need my mom with me. My boyfriend came with me for support since I'm a little bit scared of needles. 

I asked to donate blood and asked if it was ok since I'm gay. The people hosting the blood drive immediately got super weird and I had to go talk to a nurse.

The nurse said, ""I'm sorry but we won't collect your blood unless you refrain from sexual activities for 12 months.""

I told her I've been tested for STDs, including HIV, and all tests came back negative. She said that it didn't matter, I was a MsM - a man who has sex with men.

I'm really pissed off. I'm perfectly eligible to donate blood, my blood type is always in shortage and really good for plasma as well. I don't know what to do.",gay
People be wildin’,,gay
My straight friend sent me a nude.,"I honestly don’t know how it led up to this but we were joking about you know normal teenage stuff and then i say something like “ i bet yours isn’t that big” and he says “ alright I’ll show you” and then he like tells me his size and then sends me a pic and at this point I’m pretty stunned, like he is hot like very attractive, but he’s straight so ik nothing will happen. I just feel like this kinda thing doesn’t happen in real life but if straight guys do this kinda shit. ",gay
How to pick up men?,"So, here where I live, it's pretty hard to pick up men. You can't just walk up to them because if they are straight, you're probably going to get in a lot of trouble. I live in germany, which is usually a verry progressive country but not in my City.
So, any tips would be greatly appreciated

I'm too young for grindr etc. as well

Edit: if you get spotted as gay, you get beaten up",gay
We must adapt this technology for grindr,,gay
Found an old paper I wrote in high school when I was still in the closet.,"Thought this would be the place to share. Brought up feelings I had in high school and hurts to look back at how it felt to grow up in the closet: sad, helpless and alone. I wish I could go back and tell my high school self everything would be okay. It’s been almost a year since I came out in college, and I couldn’t be happier or more content with who I am or the friends that love and treat me the exact same. Here’s the paper I wrote below:


Words Can Hurt.


​Saying “Words can hurt.” Is an understatement.  Words do more than just hurt, they can bring someone’s day up or tear it down within a matter of seconds.  While we may smile and act happy when someone happens to say something hurtful, it looks as if it doesn’t bother us.  But deep within you can hear the words resonate in your bones.  The thing with words, unlike bruises, is that they won’t go away.  Your mind constantly plays those words in your head over and over, never letting you forget.  At least, that’s what happens with me.

​Being in elementary school having hurtful words spit at you daily, you think you would get used to it, but you don’t.  It’s like a wound that stays with you, and everyday it scabs over, and everyday it reopens, and every day it hurts just the same, sometimes worse.  It’s a wound, not a scar.  Scars are healed where as wounds are trying to heal only to be ripped open again and again and again.  As a kid you don’t understand the words “Don’t listen to them” but as a third grader you try to push past everything, you try to ignore them, but you can’t.  

​“You’re gay.” The word pierces my skin, I feel a cut across my chest where underneath my heart lies.

​“Fag.”  The cut feels as if it’s gotten deeper.

​“Queer.”   With each word, I feel pain.  Pain that creeps slowly towards my heart.

As a third grader you sit and ask yourself, “What have I done to deserve this?”  you ask your mom “Why are these kids being mean?”  she doesn’t know how to respond.  How could she know, I’ve done nothing wrong, I’ve done nothing to deserve this.  She knows that, she knows that kids are just mean and people are horrible, but what do you say to your eight year old son who just wants everyone to like him?  What would you do?  What would you do if your son came home and asked you that as tears poured down his face?  You’d pray it was just a one time occurrence and that it would blow over by the next day, because you think you know the damage it could cause.  You think you know.  But it’s not a one day thing, it’s a two day thing, now it’s a three, and a four. Five, six, seven.  It’s been a week now, what do you do? Eight, nine, ten.  It’s happening everyday, and you feel lost as your son comes home bawling, eleven, twelve,  all you can do is comfort him.

It’s at the point now where you’re used to it.  You’re used to it as your son comes home everyday from school and cries.  You’re used to it, but I’m not.  I come everyday knowing when I get home you’ll being waiting for me as I run into your lap, and you rub my back until I cry myself to sleep and run out of tears.  You’re always there, why?  Because you’re my mom.  That’s what moms do.  But you can’t always be there, you try, but you can’t.  I go back to school, you’re not there, but that’s ok.  It’s something  I have to try to handle on my own.  

I get older, I “toughen up” as they say, but nothing changes other than the tears.  The tears are gone now, they left, but the pain is still there every time I hear it.  I get older, it’s middle school, why are the hurtful words diminishing?  I thought middle school was supposed to be horrible, at least that’s what I tried to prepare myself for.  Is it because they are actually understanding the word, the meaning behind it?  The words get less, the guys let me be their friend.  Everything’s getting better, but in a way it’s not.  The words lessened, but they didn’t stop.  I ignored them, but that doesn’t mean it didn’t hurt.

Years came and went, but remember those wounds I talked about? They stayed.  They haven’t scarred.  They reopen every time I hear those words whispered down the hallway.  They reopen every time a friend tells me of people talking.   I don’t show it but it hurts.  At the beginning it was “Words can hurt.”, where did “can” go, why did it leave, because now it’s just words hurt.  That’s it, no “can” between them, no possibility of the words hurting, now it’s definite.  It has changed.

Words hurt.",gay
How long have you been gay?,Just wondering,gay
Why don't we hear more about sexual assault in the gay community?,"[https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2018/mar/07/gay-community-metoo-moment-conversation-consent-sexual-assault](https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2018/mar/07/gay-community-metoo-moment-conversation-consent-sexual-assault) 

&amp;#x200B;

""According a survey by gay men’s health charity GMFA, some [62% of British gay men](https://www.gmfa.org.uk/fs162-consent-and-the-gay-community) have been touched or groped in a bar without consent. In the US [40% of gay and 47% of bisexual men](https://www.hrc.org/resources/sexual-assault-and-the-lgbt-community) have experienced sexual violence other than rape, compared with 21% of heterosexual men.""

&amp;#x200B;

Personally I have been been forced to be penetrated several times. But I let it go because we agreed to meet in the first place. Plus I had rape fantasies if I'm being honest so I don't feel bad about it. 

&amp;#x200B;

What about you? have you even subject to sexual assault? ",gay
His excuse for playing games was that I don’t satisfy his needs,"So this guy I’ve has been playing games for about a week that I know of. We’ve been seeing each other  for about a month. I took my time and patience to follow his patterns and realized that he was basically never in the mood for sex with me while always online on dating apps. So he changed his profile name to horny, and I texted him asking him for sex to see his response. He said he wasn’t in the mood. When he stayed online looking for someone to have sex with most likely. So I went to sleep and today I had a very calm and collected talk with him about what we are the the rules we set, which were honesty, monogamy and respect. I made sure he said them because I know he broke all of them. So then I confronted him about it, and he basically said he didn’t sleep with anyone but was looking to because I don’t satisfy his needs because my penis is too small. So I told him that he could have just let me know instead of playing these games, and he started getting really agitated most likely because he got caught. His shallowness will catch up to him because I’ve done a lot for him. 
P.S what bothers me the most is that when I asked him why he didn’t tell me, he told me he didn’t want to hurt my feelings like what he was doing was not hurting my feelings. And he has the nerve to say he “likes” me so I told him no he likes the perks that comes with me and he is selfish and self centered for keeping me around while he was doing that. 
",gay
When a grindr guy with a blank bio and no pic asks if I have more pics than my display profile,,gay
Chronically Ill Gay Dating,"Hi All

My relationship status has recently changed and it led me to wonder what percentage of gay men would date a chronically ill guy. So:

Would you date a chronically ill gay guy?

Let me know your thoughts below.

Thanks in advance.",gay
Planning to buy this for the next pride parade🌈🌈🌈🌈,,gay
"Gay Halloween, London?",I'll be in London for Halloween this year. Anyone know of any gay/queer clubs/events/parties going on?,gay
'Taught to hate myself': How gay conversion therapy in SC is thriving,,gay
Don't know where to post this.,I have a question. I have a massive crush on one of my friends and I don't know what to do. I don't think he's gay or even know but I don't want to make the friendship awkward or ruin it as he's really nice. I just don't know where else to ask. ,gay
"This whole ""black guys are ignored and undesireable"" is bullshit","Black dudes complain about being undesireable and calling white guys racist because they see ""no blacks"" on dating app profiles, yet they're doing the same thing to white guys, I don't wanna hear the ""white guys are racist because they ignore and block us"" anymore when they're doing the same thing to white guys and Asians. why do the same thing white guys do if they don't like it?

explain, you won't because you know I'm right. I feel bad for those who like interracial sex.

IDGAF about downvotes because you're literally agreeing with my point",gay
Biawanna,"&amp;#x200B;

[When you're queer pop artist and this is your cover art. Submitting to blogs and playlists made me realize the creation of a landscape for queer pop musicians is still growing. As a qpoc it's been strange going from pop punk to rock and to r&amp;b then pop. No matter the genre I still feel like a punk.](https://i.redd.it/cy48c371f7q11.jpg)

[https://open.spotify.com/track/2nA1YOAGd3M1BOmP7fKexY?si=eHqQppbrQKyGyYA0pRXATg](https://open.spotify.com/track/2nA1YOAGd3M1BOmP7fKexY?si=eHqQppbrQKyGyYA0pRXATg)",gay
TV Show Host,Wil Willis of Forgeb in Fire is fit and cute,gay
Kind of confused...,"Okay. So I'm basically a 17 year old high school student in Switzerland. 

&amp;#x200B;

Before coming to Switzerland, I spent my whole life in the Philippines and I was out in school since I was like in 4th grade (it was a pretty open catholic private school in the city center so there was little discrimination). Since I was friends with a lot of other gay people in school and since we acted quite feminine at school, most students and teachers knew I was gay and 'not coming out' to other students/teachers was the norm, since they already knew based on my history (I was in the same school until Grade 10 - 16 years old). There were no biased teachers and as long as you followed the rules (assignments, deadlines) like every other student, you'll have the chance to receive the same grade. So it was actually a good 'normalized' life for me, and since both of my parents are non-religious and open, they also accepted me. Also had a lot of straight friends who treated me like every other. Granted, I never had the chance to actually date someone because I'm quite shy and to an extent conservative (by some standards) when it comes to relationships. I also focused more on school and going out with friends, so yeah...it didn't bothered me so much. I did have some crushes at high school, but my hormones didn't explode at that time yet (exploded a year later).

&amp;#x200B;

And then, after Grade 10, I moved to Switzerland just to experience a new country/culture and to make my self more open. Also, I thought of it as a good chance to know more people outside of the Philippines. I have to also say that I'm half-Swiss with a Swiss father, so the culture shock wasn't so big (probably the punctuality and all the hot people around, and how super multicultural Switzerland is compared to the Philippines). So basically, I'm 17 now and in a new school in a city (but not the city center) in a pretty liberal canton. I was kind of shocked tbh, because I have to come out all over again (or not...I haven't done it yet tbh, since the Swiss are pretty private people and I just really don't know how). Granted, I know some people know already (probably my teacher and most of the girls; considering I wore full blown baby pink and a sweater with a rainbow color once).  Then one day, a guy classmate of mine asked me if I had a girlfriend already and I was kind of 'no' and it was soo awkward and surprising. I didn't tell him I was gay tho. Then there was a discussion with a teacher (pretty liberal one) about gay people, and the same guy said there was a chance he would move out if a gay guy was his neighbor, with the teacher looking pretty shocked. I didn't say anything in this conversation because I was just so annoyed at how ignorant the guy was. 

&amp;#x200B;

Granted there were a lot of people who were open (I think), like a girl from Thailand who I made friends with. She was like ""I don't understand why some people hate on gays/lesbians, I myself have many friends who are gay/lesbian,"" so I was pretty comforted that she said that. We talk about guys, a lot, so I think she already knows I'm gay (again, didn't really officially came out to her). One particular guy (a hot guy from Serbia) caught both of our eyes. He lives in the same village as me and I had bisexual/gay vibes from him(but he looked so straight) from him because we had \*\*strong eye contact\*\* during the first few weeks of class whenever we met (not from the same class). I'm not sure exactly why. He then said hi to me in the train station and I said hi back, but that was it. I then followed him on instagram, and after that he started talking to me using my first name saying ""how are you"", ""have a nice day"", and ""you're a great guy"", granted I don't know if he does it because we have the same political views (according to his instagram profile, he's left wing and I'm left wing, too). The girl from Thailand then said that the guy has a girlfriend since 3 years (so basically since he was 13?) information which she got from her friend, because her friend is actually close friends with the girlfriend of the guy. I obviously haven't asked him directly and he doesn't seem gay (sorry for stereotypes) to me, granted he may be pansexual/bisexual. So yeah, I had my first indirect heartbreak. :(

&amp;#x200B;

So yeah, it is (until now) a fun experience. I'm just annoyed by the extra little heteronormativity that I get. My question is, should I actually officially come out (not like announcing it to the whole class, but when they ask indirectly (nobody ever asked directly if I was gay) like if I have a girlfriend, answer with ""no, i'm gay"" instead of ""no"" only. Or should I just give no fucks at all and just be myself? Thanks in advance for the answers! :D",gay
Need advice from formerly straight married guys,"I don't know what I expect from this, but I'm a married man for 5 years. Married to an amazing woman and we even have to beautiful children. Our marriage is centered on the idea that I suppress my sexuality. She knew I was gay before our marriage but we were incredibly young and taught by our church that gayness could be overcome by faith and prayer like a disease. 

It has taken years for me to begin to admit to myself that me being gay isn't bad and maybe happiness could be out there for me. How have other married men in hetero relationships made life work? ",gay
Sooooo want a bf,"Def kinda coming out of my shell I guess... Its been like 4-5ish months since coming out and I think I'm finally ready.

I've never ever had a bf so I'm super anxious about all of this. Any suggestions???

I also have no clue how to meet dudes so any advice on that either?

",gay
Tired of the games - *this may be a roller coaster* - and quite lengthy.,"24 year old gay male here who has never been in a relationship. I've never posted anything like this on Reddit but tonight I hit a breaking point and don't really care if anyone replies or not I just want to possibly get it off my chest. I've admittedly had a few drinks as well haha.

I've had an interesting and strange dating life to say the least. I've had three significant men come through my life since high school:

1. **Guy 1**: For some reason I tend to attract closeted straight/bicurious men. The first was a guy I grew up with my whole life from Kindergarten. \*disclaimer; I went to a very small school my entire life. there were 88 people in my graduating class. so yes everybody knew everything about everybody\* He went on to be the quarterback of our high school football team. I wasn't out in high school but it wasn't necessarily a secret. I wasn't super flamboyant but my interests and people I hung out with made things a little more obvious. I was just comfortable with myself and was liked by most everyone. This guy had ALWAYS been super nice to me. The night we graduated (May 2013), he came up to me after graduation and told me he was going over to my best friend's party that I was also going to. This got me excited. I smoked weed for the first time with him that night and had my first bit of alcohol. We went on to hang out a lot that summer and became close and awkwardly hung out alone a few times. It was much different than a friendship than I'd ever had with another male before. It was a very tender, intimate type of relationship that was very uncharacteristic of the type of person this guy was. After summer was over, we both moved on to college and kept in touch every few weeks. 
   1. Around Thanksgiving, I was forced by my bestfriend to come out to him. Ok, I wasn't forced but it was such an obvious feeling in the air that I just decided to do it. He immediately told me the same thing. We were never attracted to each other and never have been. It's just been nice to grow up with someone and have that in common and not know for such a long time. We started talking about everything we had been through and the topic of who we thought might've been gay from our high school came up. He started telling me about a guy he'd hooked up with on the low since Freshman year.... **GUESS WHO**.
   2. I decided to come out to this guy a few weeks later. After I lengthy text conversation, I asked him a question: **""Have you ever felt something between us?""** After a little shuffle he said no and that he only saw me as a really good supportive friend. He then went on to tell me that he HAD been on both sides of the fence. No shit. But I never brought up the secret between him and my best friend. 
   3. I definitely felt this cause a riff in our friendship for a few years. Around the beginning of 2017 (remember, I came out to him at the end of 2013) he started talking to me a lot more and much more randomly. I felt like we were on a really good track to something even if it was just a closer friendship.
      1. Early in May one night, I saw a post by his mother on FaceBook that he had been in a very serious motorcycle accident. His family was in New York on vacation and he was in Houston. They made it to Houston early the next morning  and he was **pronounced dead** shortly after they got there. I don't know the details of the death. I don't know if they made the decision to pull the plug or if he was just holding out until they got there. I never really had a hard time with this. Neither did my best friend. We went to the funeral together and kept it together very well. Obviously I was very sad when it happened. And still get very emotional when I think about him every so often. I fear that 1.5 years later that it still hasn't quite hit me. I also don't know if I even have the right to feel like something more than a friend was taken away from me.
2. **Guy 2 (admittedly the hardest one to get over; and still not quite over him)**: This guy I met in college marching band (another guy I would consider bi-curious). We both played saxophone. This was both of our second year in marching band but for some reason we never spoke the first year. We became really close the first week of summer band. He was known as a very stoic upright guy. He was respected by everyone and was the president of the music fraternity. But when he was with me, a guard came down that I never saw him reveal to anyone else. He would make sexual comments to me every so often and would ever stand next to me and rub shoulders really cute-like with me which was very uncharacteristic.
   1. My 21st birthday was October 2015. I invited him to my birthday party and ironically he was having a party that same night. He told me to come over once everybody had left my place if things were still going at his place. His party ended up ending before mine so he messaged me on Facebook. I vaguely remember messaging him for a few messages and must've blacked out or fallen asleep (it WAS my 21st birthday party) just before he called me. I didn't see that call until the next morning.
      1. The next week at marching rehearsal in our warm-up arcs (where we would always stand next to each other) he went and stood at the complete opposite end. Being the awkward confronting person I am, I went over and said ""I'm sorry, I was too drunk to come over."" To which he said ""well, you still could've..."" I could tell that he felt some type of way about the situation and that it actually bothered him. I later said something in rehearsal to him which made him laugh and we went on and were back to normal.
   2. There were MANY other instances that made me sure of him; including him wanting to room with me and share a bed with me on our big away game of the season. Him; a person who had many more friends in the band than I and decided to spend the night with me. At the end of the season I decided it was time to talk as the semester would be ending really soon. I took the same approach as with guy #1 and asked **""Have you ever felt something between us?""** To which he replied ""No man, I'm not into guys."" Once again I was duped buy a guy who I was 90% sure was into me. 
   3. We've been in the same place several times over the years and its either very awkward or totally cool. We carried a 10 minute conversation once just catching up one time we saw each other. Other times its an awkward ""Hi"" or something dorky i'll say then he or I will walk away.
3. **Guy 3**: This guy was admittedly gay. We met at a drag show. We had both gone alone. I was standing there waiting for the show to start by myself. He came up to me and asked if he could stand with me. We ended up hitting it off super quick and even had some of the same interests. After it was over he asked me for my phone number (something that had never happened to me before). I then asked if he wanted to go get breakfast with me and we did. The night ended and I was hopeful.
   1. We kept things casual as I didn't want to jump into anything. I told him I found him attractive a few times and he deflected and later came clean and said that he doesn't know how to take a compliment like that as he hadn't had many. I told him I understood. He also told me he appreciated me for continually being around and not flaking like most guys do after a short amount of time of talking to him.
   2. Fast forward to this past weekend (my birthday weekend) **and my ""breaking point;"" hence the reason I created this long ass post tonight.** His college friends were in town and they wanted to take me out for my birthday. We ALL got along super well and they said they would love to hang out with me again.
      1. He and I talked on the phone for about 30 minutes Saturday night just shooting the shit and talking about how much fun we had with each other Friday night. I told him my birthday was on Tuesday (which he already knew) and he said he couldn't wait to call and wish me a happy birthday. I felt as if we left that phone call on a very good note. Tuesday comes and his two best friends were one of the very first people to wish me a happy birthday that morning before I even made it to work. He's a very buys guy and work bogs him down so I didn't really expect to hear from him until that evening after work but it didn't happen. Here I was laying in bed around 11:45 last night thinking maybe he'd do something cute and wait until 11:59 to be the last to wish me a happy birthday. But nope. Today was hard for me as that was all that was on my mind at work. I decided to text him about two hours ago just to say I hope he was having a good week. He replies with ""**yeah its just been busy sorry.**"" This tore me up and I ended up crying for quite a while (something I don't do very often at all.)

&amp;#x200B;

If you've made it this far, you're my hero and I just have a few things to ask:

&amp;#x200B;

1. Overall feelings about the situations
2. Do you think my feelings were too far fetched with ANY of these guys?
3. Do I have a right to be upset that guy #3 didn't wish me a happy birthday and the fact that his response was so short?
4. Also anything I can do going forward with dating would be helpful.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks again for reading this far. I don't expect anyone to read it all but it feels a little better to get everything out there.",gay
Be safe this October,,gay
Expressing feelongs for others in Southern United States,"Living in the southern part of Tennessee I always go to school (highschool senior) and feel a oppressive atmosphere (that homosexuality is just a topic no none talks about openly) I mean yeah there are some homosexuals but everyone seems to just treat us differently, and that if I were to show my feelings for someone it would offend them and or get general embarrassment.

 Does anyone else have a similar problem?",gay
An interesting title,,gay
Just wanted to get a story out of my chest," Hello any reader !   
  First disclaimer : English is not my first language, so I apologise in advance for any grammatical mistakes or horrible construction of sentences in my writing.   
  Second disclaimer : I'm not really sure if this is the right place to post, but like I said in the title, I just wanted to write about something that happened to me, and that I can't seem to forget. So maybe  talking about it will help a little ?   
    
  So, to begin with, I'm currently 24 years old, gay, and a student at college. Unfortunatley, money don't seem to fall of trees, so I'm kinda forced to works to get some. More luckily, I've also managed to found quite a well payed job at the already mentioned college : I'm giving some teachings about informatic. But most of the time, it's basically sitting and reading while the students do some stupid test about privacy on the Internet and other things like that, and make sure that they do no set the room on fire.     
  Two years ago, i had this small , blue-eyed guy with really goofy hairs in one of my group, I'll call him John (there's no way he is ever reading this, but let's change his name anyway). He was quite sympathic, and also part of one of my favorite groups, since they were quite funny and talkative. But I've also got 6 other groups, and my exam to pass, so I didn't think much of him at the time, except he was quite humorous, and also prone to anger if things did'nt works. (Given the wooden computers the college give to their students, they did not worked a lot)   
  Back to the previous year, I get back to the school. Besides my job at the informatic department, I've also submitted to help the new students on the first days. During the job meeting, John get in, and begin to talk to me. He also assigned for the appliement, so we're going to work together. Not a problem at all, and we begin to socialise a little. He cut his hair, wich suits him really well by the way.  But still, for me he's just one of the many students on the school, like myself.   
    
  On this year, I've taken the habit of eating at the school restaurant not only on the noon, but on the evening to (Given the fact that I really don't like to cook, that it's quite cheap, and not to bad, it's a wonder that I've only recently begin to do this.). One of the first evening, John come in and spontaneously sit on my table, where I was eating alone. No problems, he has a good conversation. This repeat itself several times, until he tells me that he go there every evening, and he passed the rest of his time between his lessons and the school library. I'm also quite shocked to learn that he is 34 years old, where I would have given him... well maybe 25  26 years at most....   
  On the course of the year, I've really begin to enjoyed his presence, and I'm going at the restaurant as much as too see him as too eat. And more and more to see him, and less to eat. I really like the fact that we can talk about anything : movies, books ( I'm a sucker for books), jokes... We also discover that we have some common taste : same humor, same favorite book ( A Confederacy of Dunces). I also enjoyed to learn about his life : he does not tell a lot about it, but I learned  that before getting back to studies, he had done quite a lot of shitty jobs. But he's also a workaholic : I only see him on this moment, before he go back to work and revise at the library. 

  
  I have to say that I have no experience at all in love : my only experience was falling in love at 18 years old with a straight friend, and it was not really a pleasure. I've never told him and I just miserably waited two years for this feeling to die. Beside that moment, I've never been attracted by a guy, except for the physical attraction. And so my only « *knowledge* » of other mens is the occasional hook-up, wich is not really that great to know basic stuff like how to date... But even for me it was clear that I was feeling something for John, other than the physical attraction. Even at first, I was more attracted by his personality than by his body : it takes me several months to find him really attractive, and I suspect that this feeling grows as I begin to find him interesting, cultivated, generous, and as I learned to know him. But I was also convinced that he was straight, since he talked several times to me about which girls he find hot, and more. So I take the decision of not thinking about love anymore, and to just enjoyed his company. 

    
  Until the day where we were forced to work again together. I say forced, because in all little prints in our contracts, the staff said that we agree to came to work ( with no payment) a whole day, on week-end, to promote the school to the parents of the new students to come. We were really mad about this, but it's not like we have the choice. So we get to work, a whole day, to say cheap lies about how the school was great. Yeah, right... After this marvelous moment (that the presence of John make a little less horrible) I was less than pleased, and  I was supposed to get back to my home city. But John tell me to have a little drink with him, and that it was to bad that I got to leave. So I decided, yeah, why not have one ?   
  We drink a lot this night : really to much, given the fact that I have several black holes of the whole night. But I remember us going to a pub, and talking about our life. At some moment, I tell him that I'm gay, wich he replied by saying that he's bisexual. Could lead to something...  Until he explained me, in tears, how when he was at my age, he lived with his girlfriend, marginally, in Paris. How she had the habit of painting on the walls the same date, and how, at the due date, she killed herself. How he hates himself for not seing that come, and that he has never managed to date someone after that. The way he loathes himself for allowing such a thing to happen, and being incapable to see past it.   
  After that, my memory is confused, but I remember trying to get him back to his living, and him trying to fight with anyone on the street, while I restrained him. Not a fun night. And the worst his that I was so drunk, that I'm not even sure about his story, or if I imagined the whole thing, even if I tell myself that someting so horrible can't be made up. 

  
  After this moment, I've never asked him about the whole thing : he tells me that he had also no memory of the night, and we've stayed this way. But I just can't forget how sad he was (or I think he was), neither how terrible his story was. Now I can understand why he worked so much, why he never get out, why most of the time he never drinks, and why he was so prone to quick anger. It's been months, and I have always this story in the back of my mind. I don't even know if this was real, if he could one day move on his past. I pity him, and I hate this feeling. He is way more than this horrible story, and still now I can only think of him this way.     
  We continue to see each other at the evening, and he was still pleasant and friendly, but I've never managed to get him to go out again, neither to talked about his lofe. And of course, I've never asked him about a previous girl-friend.   
  Now that the scholar year is passed, he had graduated. I was thinking that he would continue his studies. He's really a cultivated and intelligent man, capable of hard work, who clearly loved what he studied.  He has choosed to teach children far away on the country, so I probably never see him again. And I don't even know if it's a good thing or no, even if I still think about him.   
  There's more, but I think that I've said here the most of the story. I don't even what to expect, or if it will interest someone, but at least I've managed to write a little about it. Have a good day ! ",gay
Poppers?,"I know this is kind of a dumb question, buy what are poppers for exactly? I know its some kind of drug that people use before anal, but why? (Forgive my dumbness).",gay
mods,,gay
[Canada] I Left My Small Town A Bullied Gay Teen. I Returned An Olympian (Blog),,gay
Advice,"This is a situation i'd never thought i'd find myself in.  I have been gay all my life and have never came out except at school because im kind of not really that close to my parents (they're like normal parents but we just dont tell eachother everything) 

Well apparently my brother is bi (I heard him talk about tits and stuff before and I believe liked girls since he was a kid, but now previously unbeknownst to me he has a boyfriend...) well I slipt up and admitted I was into guys to him, i thought things were fine because he messaged later and said we could talk anytime if i wanted to. But then he started immediately telling everyone he was gay and had a boyfriend; my mom and my cousin now know and idk if anyone else.

My whole life i've been accused of copying him with many things, now that hes told people I know I wont be believed when i decide to come out, they may think im just trying to be popular or am being petty or something.

Idk where to go from here, It's been festering in my mind since hes done it and its effecting my happiness.   How do I not hate him?  
What to do what to do",gay
My first crush,,gay
To my sober gays,"What activities do you enjoy going out on weekends that doesn’t involve drinking. I live in NYC and it feels like every gay-centered activity is at a bar. I don’t drink. To anyone else in my boat, how do you adjust?",gay
Am I being unreasonable?,"I was crying because someone said for me to hang myself because I’m gay, but someone told me I was immature for caring about what someone said.",gay
Gym guys/lads,"I am versatile and I have been going gym for around 14 months. Do you guys have an opinion on a top or bottom that goes to the gym. I'm not exactly really muscular but you can clearly tell that I do go to a gym.

Also what is the part of a guy that goes to a gym you notice first. Like arms, shoulders, chest, legs etc? And what is your favourite part of muscular body?",gay
Why do people say gender is a construct?,I just want to educate myself about this subject. Is gender homophobic? Or it just doesn’t exist?,gay
Halloween costume ideas,"Hey girls and gays,

Our huge holiday is approaching and I still have no idea what I want to be. I want to be something cute but also hoeish. I’m terrible with  ideas so any help would be great. Only thing is I don’t want to dye my hair or wear a wig so something I could pull off with my natural hair color (dark brown) would be fab. ",gay
The word gay,"My high school is full of people who use the word “gay” as an insult. It’s nothing big but it starts to get on my nerves. When one of my friends used it as an insult I said “So why is gay an insult?” And he said “I meant like stupid kind of gay not your type of gay” idk I can’t really post this anywhere else and this seems to be the safest place to put this. But umm what are your opinions on people using the word gay as an insult? I really only confront the person if I know them enough to talk to them, but it’s getting to the point where I stop caring bc I hear it just walking around so much.",gay
This song and video clips are so powerful and really well done. I love it. The singer is pretty hot too but he doesn’t show up in the video y’all can google him,,gay
Fear of talking with other peple,So i was in this place for about two month for a camp like expirience. Now i learned that one of the people in this place is gay. I wanted to talk to him and say hello and mabe hit on him but i get scared aproching him. I only got about two more days in there then i wont see him again. I just dont know what to say to him. Hes seems as shy as i am. I just wish i had more currage,gay
I have a crush and my gaydar sucks,"So it’s this guy at my school I REALLY started to like  :p, it all started last school year I honestly never saw him before but he walked by me and we stared at each other.. I thought he was very handsome.. but I know not to just crush on random guys of course I was dumb when this school year started we just kept meeting eye to eye literally every time we see each other walking down the hallway we’d make eye contact he always holds the stare so im the one to look away 😫.
A few weeks ago he was standing near my locker ticket to his friend and I looked and him he wasn’t looking at first but then we made eye contact for like 3 seconds lmao . Now I know that staring can be a sign BUT I’m assuming he’s straight because he hangs around this same group of guys . Like us gay guys usually hang with girls :O!! Also it’s probably gonna be a stare off because I’m not gonna get rejected by him because I read wrong 
Sorry for the rambling tehehe 😅",gay
It should be illegal on how much I love dick. Anybody else like this?,,gay
It's hard,"Every day I feel like a part of me is missing. Every day I feel like I have done something wrong. I am not happy in my community even though I have tried so hard to fit in. I am worried that that finding happiness will never be obtainable. There has to be some secret that others know, I suppose I just haven't been told that secret yet. I only seem to find bliss in myself, that is the only person who truly understands my pain. No one else really empathizes towards me because their story always seems worse than mine. Every time. I am happy that the gay community is strong, I am glad that there is so much support out there for the lgbt crowd. You would think that being myself that I would find a niche to fit in, I just haven't found it yet. It may be because of where I live, or perhaps it is just because I am doing it all wrong. 

&amp;#x200B;

Just the rambling of something that I had to get off my chest. If it does not make sense I am sorry. Thank you for reading and to all those that have read I send positive vibes towards you.",gay
Another major regret,"I had a hookup again yesterday night. Many people told me that in my case(homophobic country) that is the only way to meet someone to have something more than sex afterwards. So I went through with it and I couldn't be more sorry that I did. The guy was a total ego centric asshole just like the previous 2 guys. We had only sex, no making out or kissing or whatever. He came and he told me to leave I didn't even get to cum. The whole experience made me feel sooo cheap and pathetic. I felt like I am some toy to please his needs and get kicked out the minute he finishes. I hate feeling this way!",gay
I feel like Im getting played,"So I met a really cute guy in a dating app. I havent met him yet vut he seems to be into a lot of stuff Im into. The thing is he is waaaaaay hotter than me, makes more money than me and is a few years younger than me. Anyway, hes been texting me like every day, which is nice, but he keeps calling me 'cute' and 'hansome', to the point that Im really starting to think that something wierd is going on. The way I see it theres 3 possibilites. 1: my pictures on the dating app are clever enough that he cant tell what I really look like in 3D space. 2. Hes catfishing me and is using someone elses profile to mess with me. Or 3. Hes just toying with me for the lol's. 

Im pretty much terrified about meeting him cuz I feel like he'll be disapointed or just laugh at me for thinking I was good enough to date him, and Ive been putting off meeting with him because of it. He's starting to text me less and less every day, and that makes me both depressed and relieved",gay
Red heads,I was talking to this guy on grindr and he said that most gay guys like red heads (I'm a red head which is why he said it). I myself have spoke to a few gay guys that have said they aren't into are a little put off by red heads. But just wondered what everyone's opinion is? ,gay
I'm gay or not?,"So, a few mins ago when I was bathing I started to finger my asshole, and then I put my finger sooo deep. But, I like girls and stuff, I'm gay without knowing or something?",gay
What day is it?,?,gay
So I hit him up with my friend’s profile and he agreed to sex,"The guy I’ve been dating has been distant and does not ever want to have sexual with me anymore. He claims depression and all so I sympathized and have him space and just hung out with him. But something seemed odd because he’s really secretive with his phone and on separate occasions I’ve seen the Grindr app on there and even saw a text from someone calling him “baby boy”. Since we had the whole monogamy talk, my curiosity got the best of me. So I used my friend’s app who he doesn’t know to talk to him. Basically, I watched them exchange pictures and agreed to have sex tonight. I hit him up telling him I’m in the mood for sex, and he claims he’s not in the mood when he just agreed to sex with my friend. So I think that’s it, I don’t want to keep this going because I gave him the option of staying in a friends with benefits situation or date and we agreed to date. Going behind my back and most likely doing stuff behind my back kind of hurts but at least I caught on to it pretty early so no harm no foul. I’m just going to ghost him. I hate liars with a passion. ",gay
"Just watched this movie for the first time, and it blew my mind!",,gay
Have you ever asked out/gotten the digits from a guy you met in irl (excluding gay bars/clubs/events)?,,gay
Question,Does being gay in middle school make depression worse ,gay
Preparing for Halloween 🎃,,gay
What do you guys think of this gay anime boy? 😍,,gay
What’s the weirdest thing you’ve used as lube?,,gay
Trump to End Visas for Same-Sex Partners of UN Employees and Diplomats,,gay
"Figured my post on askgaybros was good to ask on here too, plz help!",,gay
The first of our kind good read! :),,gay
Im confused about sexuality want sex with girls but not relationships,First of all I’m a female don’t mind my username anyway. So the thing is I’m attracted to women and have sex with woman which I would guess would make me gay but I have no interest in dating women at all I don’t wanna be romantically envolved I don’t see women in that way but I do like having sex with women confusing ? I like men and I date men I’m in love with a man we’ve been together for 2 years I’ve never dating a women nor do I want to . And yes I am physically attracted to men as well as romanticly,gay
Making Gay Friends?,"My husband and I got married this year, we married after dating for 7 years. We're both 26 and met fresh out of high school. We both totally skipped the majority of situations that would have introduced us to more gay people in the process of trying to find a partner. We both feel like we want more local gay friends in our life. We have a solid friend group and we love them dearly, but I'm tired of having to explain the prep and mechanics of gay sex to straight men. And the dynamic of our relationship is that of our straight friends is rather different, neither are unhealthy just different. We want guys that we can relate to better. 

While we live in a rather gay area (capital district of New York). It's a lot of younger guys that are still figuring themselves out and not as stable as we are (college town). The more stable guys/gay couples are 10+ years older than us and noticably different. We tried Grindr for a bit at a friend's recommendation and that was not a good idea. We also both aren't really into clubs and get anxious in crowded rooms. The few times we went to clubs no one talked to the established couples in the room anyway. We even met through a mutual friend that introduced directly cuz she thought we'd be a good match (she was right, haha).

We're both nerdy guys. PC gamers, Nintendo fanboys, etc. My husband is a research scientist and I work retail full time but write when I can. We both feel like we want more gay friends. We are kind of the token gays of our friend group, but we have a large number of LGBT friends. Just literally one gay man and he's been distancing himself from us lately for some reason. 

How can we try to make more friends? Maybe meet other gay couples and hang out with them? As much as we have each other, there's still this vague loneliness we have. ",gay
Why am i like this,,gay
Lesbian 'witches' chained and raped by families in Cameroon,,gay
Rupert Everett interview for The Happy Prince,"I had the chance to sit with Rupert Everett recently, where he discussed being the first openly gay movie star (coming out in 1989) and his role as Oscar Wilde in his upcoming movie, The Happy Prince, which he wrote, directed and stars in. He also chats about having recently moved in with his mum in England. 

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.wildaboutmovies.com/interviews/rupert-everett-talks-the-happy-prince-to-wildaboutmovies/](https://www.wildaboutmovies.com/interviews/rupert-everett-talks-the-happy-prince-to-wildaboutmovies/)",gay
falling for my straight best friend,"so my friend and i are in high school, and we ve known each other for years. when i was younger i had a bit of on and off crushes for him but did my best to ignore them due to the fact that he likes girls. recently though ive been crushing on him but a lot more then i used too. i really like him and i cant get him out of my head. i dont know what to do because its impossible to ignore. and recently ive been thinking (or maybe just hoping) that he likes me as well. recently he has been saying things like ""youre so amazing"" or ""you are the best guy ive ever known"" a decent amount. he also has like these lingering touches with me or occasionaly hugs me and i dont know if its beause we re feinds or if he likes me. (btw for context he knows im gay) any advice or thoughts?",gay
This needs to be here,,gay
Advice for a new Gogo Dancer,"So my friends are pressuring me to start gogo dancing. I want to do it at least once and depending on how much cash I get, continue it more frequently/semi-professionally. 

Anyone who is a dancer/has been one offer any advice on how to do well?",gay
I have to say i agree 100% with this.,,gay
Coming out into 6 hours!!,"SORRY FOR FORMATTING I'M RLY EXCITED LOL

I live in Australia, and I'm going to come out tomorrow! This is exciting, but I'm not sure what I'll say. I'm not entirely""in tune"" with my sexuality, I guess. I thought I was bi for a rather long time, but if one was to use a Kinsey scale id be like a 5. I don't really think I'd have a comfortable relationship with a woman. Anyways I'm gonna come out to her tomorrow and my immediate family soon after. I'm 15, and am comfortable with my sexuality being around gay people as family friends and one of my mother's Brothers is gay so that's a luxury which has made this much easier I guess. I won't tell my grandparents, because while they would support me like they have their son the transition for them would be much easier when I'm 18 or so. That's fine though they don't need to know and if I feel like I'm stepping around the issue and it makes my life harder I won't hesitate to tell them. And I won't tell my school or my school friends sadly as I'm in a Christian school and it really would just interfere with my schoolwork. Great thing about this school though is that all the typical reasons a Christian school might kick you out due to morality reasons don't apply here except for teachers. So even if I do come out to my school friends at some point I can't get expelled or anything and there's even a couple of openly gay kids at school! Hehe I'm so excited, I can't express it. Even though I can't sleep, I'll try and close my eyes and listen to a podcast to distract myself lol &lt;3 aaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa I promise I'm not a 14 yo girl but if I was speaking I'd bloody well would sound like one",gay
I need help.. Please,"Hello, so I would like to explain what lead to this situation I’m in.. so yeah. Anyway so I was dating this guy(I’m a guy too) and his name is Alex. We're both 16. He is exactly what you imagine when you hear athlete, big, strong, muscular (he's a therian if that helps for anything) while I'm the embodiment of the word ”Nerd”. You know, small, chubby, big glasses, weak, extremely shy and not at all athletic.
 Anyway, we have been dating for a year and a half, we would always be with each other as much as we can. He would hold me or put me in his lap and hold me, calling me his ”chubby bunny”  or something and I would always be there when he needs me to be his support. 

Anyway, life was going great until we started seeing each other less and less over timely, which honestly made really sad. It was mostly because of how busy I was with studying and working while he had his sports and training. Until one day I had enough of it and was going to call him and try to see him again. But before I called one of my friend (who I was talking to about this), texted me that my “ boyfriend” was cheating on me. I was shocked and didn’t want to believe it but she showed me the dms he was sending to other guys. I was heartbroken and extremely depressed, so I deiced to break up with and just say that it’s because we are to busy for a relationship ( I didn't tell him, that I found out him cheating because I just couldn’t bring myself to do it.. I know I’m dumb for not but I just don’t want to end unhappy note) 

Anyway, he asked after high school or when we have less busy schedules that we can start dating again. I said a maybe and that it. ( it's been 2 weeks since it happened) I'm really depressed about it and from what I hear from his friends is that he stop acting like himself, more depressed, angry and tried. The problem is that is that I think I still love him.. And I don't know what to do...Should I give him a second chance? Or should I move on and how don't move on? I don't know what to do! Please help me, anyway thanks for your time.  ",gay
How do you learn to accept things?,I know that I will never be able to move and have a relationship but how do you accept that?,gay
Parents asking about kids,"I'm not sure if this is the right sub but my parents have always asked when they were getting grandkids. Just came out in april and they both (divorced) stopped asking. I'm actually really glad they stopped asking, but it also makes me kind of sad.

The thing is I've always wanted a family and I don't see it in my future and obviously they don't either. They have even been kind of supportive of me coming out.",gay
"Gay Man Says Catholic Church Fired Him For ""Liking"" Facebook Post On Gay Marraige",,gay
Gays continue to confuse me.,"Hello. I'm just gonna go ahead and let you know what happened and you can tell me what you think. 

I've known this guy for a few years now, we hooked up and outside of the couple of hook ups we had we didn't really establish a relationship. Like we're not bf/bf - far from it. We're not really friends, although we were facebook friends and texted each other every now and again. 

Somehow I had become this guys ear, whenever his current bf's were shitty to him he'd text me and we'd talk about the situation. Outside of when HE needed ME to listen to his problems, we didn't communicate all that much. 

Earlier this year he got a new bf. And shortly after that, I noticed he blocked me (or unfriended me) on Facebook and seemingly blocked me from text messages. And I was really surprised by this, but I kind of understood. He had a new bf and maybe he wanted to get rid of his previous hook ups to stay committed to the new guy. 

About three weeks ago, I saw a friend request from him on Facebook. And I thought to myself ""he must have broken up with the guy"". So I accepted his new friend request, but didn't communicate. Like I didn't immediately say ""Hey"" or anything like that. Just accepted and moved on (plus I'm not on facebook as often anymore). 

&amp;#x200B;

TODAY, for whatever reason, I decide I want to reach out to him. So I sent him a facebook message first. That didn't go through though because it said something about ""this person isn't accepting facebook messages"". And so I text him, just a Hi. I put ""Hi (?)"", and he writes back Hi?, and I'm like ""It's \*\*ME\*\*"" and he writes back ""and?"" 

UGH SO FCKNG RUDE RIGHT!? and I write back ""i'm saying Hello"" and he's just like ""OK"". 

I am SO CONFUSED. But ... ultimately it just means I need to delete him out of my phone and as a friend on facebook and kind of forget he ever existed right!? In closing: Gays are pretty much the worst. ",gay
Beautiful &lt;3&lt;3,,gay
Someone please PM me. I need advice about a situation with my roommate!! I have a crush on him and turns out he's gay!,Please pm me I really need advice on what to do...i'm about to make a move but need to talk to someone before i do something i'm going to regret! ,gay
What's wrong with me,"Just forewarning I'm crying while typing this. 

So it all started a couple years ago, I went on grinder just to look around. I found this guy around my age to hangout with because till that point I never had a gay friend. He didn't have a boyfriend exactly he had a daddy. I so happen to know his daddy ( my friends older brother). When my friends older brother found out we were friends he freaked out and started to push the kid  and being mean. So we hooked up over the course of a good couple months. I asked him if he wanted to be steady and go out cuz things were going well and we were clicking fanomonaly. He then went ghost. Literally haven't heard anything since ( that one hurt). 
    Fast forward till about June of 2018. Again met him on a dating app but he was a 2 hour drive away. When we first started to see each other things went well we also clicked very well. We went out for a couple months then he said he could be in love with anyone at the moment and broke things off. (I'm really mad about this one beacause I spent so much money doing things with him, like 300 for a baseball game, ""loaned"" him over 1000 bucks and a whole bunch of gas getting up to him). We continued to talk a little bit after because I didn't have anyone else. And again he went ghost. ( I did a little research because it wasn't like him to not respond) turns out he raped someone and hes in jail awaiting trial.  
   Now 2 months into a new relationship he went ghost on me and I went on grindr to see if I could find him and he messages me with a pic without his face and I knew it was him right away. He ended up blocking me on grindr and I called him and he texted me he can't be in a relationship right now.",gay
Dab,,gay
Beyoncé- Haunted RODG PRIVATE MIX [Trance] ASOT689 :A State Of Trance:,,gay
Ima just put this here.,,gay
My sexuality???,"I’m asking for you guys help because I’m definitely confused about my sexuality, like thats the thing,, i feel like im kinda bi in a romantic way ?? but def straight when it comes to sex ??? Anyone with answers comment",gay
Looking For Love,"Hi guyz 48m Berkshire England. Looking for Friends, Chats, love of a nice cute guy im into F1 Football Cricket. watching tv and Movies",gay
Gay pride tie at gay pride glasgow,,gay
My first “screen time” report. Very accurate,,gay
It can’t be THAT bad...yes it can.,,gay
A loser posted this,"I'm a 19 y/o guy in the PH looking for love, not a one night stand. Anyone happy to chat it up? ",gay
I have a question,"It’s a little nsfw

So I’m talking to this guy and he’s hung and top only, the only problem Is up until this point I’ve only topped  and I was wondering if there is anything I can do to help prepare myself for taking all of that? #nsfw",gay
Coming out story of a trans youth and her childhood and journey," I found this story really interesting and informative, especially the links to the gender unicorn (vs. the gingerbread person) and how media and culture and parents impact your identity formation. [https://engendered.us/episode-17-a-dialogue-with-autumn-about-diversity-inclusion-and-acceptance/](https://engendered.us/episode-17-a-dialogue-with-autumn-about-diversity-inclusion-and-acceptance/) ",gay
Well I have made my first batch of wooden pendants. Lformations.com. I am looking at making more like wooden crosses and others. They are actually fun to make besides making furniture and figurines.,,gay
I just want cute briefs!,"I love briefs and I want a big variety, but all the stores I've been to just offer black, white, grey, and occasionally blue- I had about the same luck with Amazon too. I've seen some great porn featuring all sorts of briefs- yellow, pink, teal, and ones with pretty designs, so I know it's out there, I just don't know where to look- if anyone could point me in the right direction, that'd be helpful! ",gay
Dose anyone else feel like this?,,gay
Weighing the benefits and risks of PrEP,"My doctor's office specifically caters to the LGBT population, mostly in the realm of treating HIV and providing trans people with HRT. I go there for the latter reason, and during my last visit my doctor had asked me if I'd considered starting PrEP, with his reasoning being that being gay, trans and sexually active meant I was considered part of a high-risk population for new HIV infections. We talked about it a bit, and I agreed to get on it. 

In terms of my day-to-day life there's literally no reason for me not to be on it. I have to visit the doctor every three months anyway for another medication I take. I have a set routine already in place for other meds, so I don't have to worry about missing doses. Both the screenings and PrEP itself is completely free with my insurance. I haven't had any side effects, either.

But while the added peace of mind is nice, I do use condoms and don't have an exceptionally high rate of new partners. This is a horse pill sized medication I'm being asked to take, and I guess I'm worried that a medication like this could potentially cause my health to deteriorate long term. The gigantic pamphlet my prescription came with talked a lot about the potential fatty liver disease, loss of bone density, kidney toxicity levels. And in doing my own research online it's extremely hard to tell if I'm reading an objective analysis of the benefits and risks of PrEP or homophobic fearmongering about side effects that most people won't get or experience in any significant way.

On the other hand, both my doctor and the information from the HIV resources I've been looking at are obviously both coming from the angle of wanting to reduce new HIV infections, so I have that concern about their objectivity with it. 

TL;DR is PrEP really necessary? It kind of feels like wearing a bulletproof vest just to leave the house. And the vest might secretly be made of asbestos. ",gay
Why can't I find a good guy to date?,"I'm a 23yo gay Guy, socially akward but a good Guy, It seems like can't find anyone Interesting to date in my town, this bothers me since Junior High, first there was a Big No No to be gay when I was younger, all I wanted was and is to have someone to share my life and joy like most straight people have. And now that I don't care everyone is or taken or I don't like him.
 I live in a small town in México, everyone here is the ""gay Guy Starter Pack"" Who love to get drunk, clasist, and mean. I want that nice old fashioned relatioship with dates with candles, share a milkshake, have someone to cuddle and take he's hand on the Movie theatre, what should I do? Im still in college so move isn't an option. I don't wanna be single at my 40's like most gay men.
I hate myself for not know how to fit in.
I like to paint, draw, I'm good looking, and feels like nothing that I try have worked, what should I do?",gay
Is there a sub or website where I can just chat and make friends?,I mean gay friends,gay
“Booty” handmade embroidery,,gay
Am I gay?,I was always interested in guys. I always checked out guys at school or in the locker room. I also masturbated to gay porn. But now I finally admitted to myself that im gay. But sometimes i feel confused about my sexuality and I get a bit depressed. I dont know if this situation happened to every gay men or not. Please help me because I'm getting desperate.,gay
Galaxy is the gay-friendliest phone.,"If you are semi-discreet to discreet, and don't mind that Samsung is completely silent about LGBTQ issue, this must be your go-to phone. For several reasons below:

&amp;#x200B;

1. You can use secure folder function, which allows you to duplicate any app you have and use it in password protected, virtually separated partition.
   1. You can password protect sensitive photos/videos by moving them into secured folders. You can have two completely separate gallaries.
   2. You can partition the space and migrate dating apps to secure folder. Note that you can only use photos migrated to secured folders, because secured folder and normal folder function as if they are two different phones.
      1. You can have two separate internet apps, one operating in secure folder and the other. So, in secured internet app, you can favorite all the... ""good"" sites you visit often. In the normal internet, you can simply browse discreet stuff. This is entirely different from Chrome incognito mode. Here, you literally have two separate apps, but one with password protection without having to download those usual annoying Android app-lockers.
      2. Of course you can separate messaging apps too. You can partition your contacts into private contacts and public contacts. Because Galaxy by default supports dual messenger app, if you use any messenger app (i.e. Kakao, Line, Wechat, Kik, Whatsapp), you can use three accounts in one phone for every app as long as you have three phone#/Email address/facebook accounts. Of course, you can hide alarms for your ""gay messenger"" and display alarm for your everyday use messenger.
      3. If you are curious about how to create three phone#s, just search virtual number in Google Play. There are tons of apps out there.
2. GPS manipulation - every android can do this BUT, with galaxy, you can apply fake GPS only to secured apps so that you can still drive/call uber with your current authentic GPS, while in dating apps, appearing your desired locations. Yes. You don't need to pay to appear in other cities.
   1. Search fake gps in google play. any of those apps will do.

[Hope you don't mind Korean. Because I am Korean.](https://i.redd.it/8tjp6x79dgp11.jpg)

1. &amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
Vaccinate yourself against HPV [crosspost],,gay
Has anyone come out publically?,"I mean, did you just post something on a social network so everyone close to you would know? I'm thinking heavily about doing this...",gay
NEW COMEDY VLOG,"Hey guys, i am making a vlog channel after loads of friends say how funny i am on snapchat so now its time to play with the big boys on youtube! [https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCnBPUVW\_lzKHz8QbCOsbg8g](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCnBPUVW_lzKHz8QbCOsbg8g)",gay
I dated a straight guy,"Im not very good with words so sorry in advance if this is kinda bad, but I need some help.

I’ve had a crush on one of my friends for a while now, his name is Mario and he’s super attractive in that way where someone is cute and hot at the same time, but I could care less about how he looked his voice and personality made me melt every time I saw him. We would face time every night and I would fall asleep peacefully just knowing that he was there with me. Which was huge for me because I have really bad insomnia.

It was kind of a running joke in my group chat that we were dating because he acted pretty gay(kind, nice and lowkey submissive) plus we had alot of chemistry. I would always jokingly flirt with him to make it seem like I didn’t like him, and it worked. Until I confessed to him. He told me that he would consider it, of course I didn’t expect anything to happen because he’s straight but I was wrong. The next day he told me he was into me too and me started dating, I don’t know why that happened but it did and I cherished every moment of it. It might have been that I have a feminine figure and a masculine personality but still like gay things like yaoi and makeup.

We would call each other way more frequently around two or three times a day each call lasting about one or two hours. We moved pretty fast because it was like we’ve been dating for a while because of our chemistry. We started saying I love you on the third day we were dating, and I really did I loved him with every ounce of my being and I’m pretty sure he felt the same way. He was the first thing I thought of when I woke up in the morning and he still is even after we broke up. He is a pretty innocent person, he doesn’t jack off and doesn’t fell comfortable kissing. He liked cuddling though which was good because I love that kinda stuff. One day out of the blue he said that he wanted to take us to the next level and wanted us to send nudes to each other.  This was weird for him, I think he needed a reality check or wanted to see if he could hold a relationship with a man. We never had any big arguments except for occasional bickering over video games and shit. I think that was when he recognised truly that I was a man and it really shook him having fully absorbed the fact that I am a guy.

He told me that he couldn’t do this anymore and that he still lives me, it’s just that I have a dick. My body ruined one of the best things in my life and I felt terrible. I went back to feeling like no one could ever love me even though he just said that he still does. I was never mad and I didn’t want to hurt myself (he helped me get over cutting) I was just truly and indefinitely sad. That night I cried for around three hours before I feel asleep. It’s been around two days since the break up and I’m still super sad. The worst part about it is that I still love him and I don’t think I’ll stop any time soon. Its one of the worst feelings in the world loving someone who will never feel the same way back.

Sorry that this post was kinda long I needed to vent lol. If anyone has any advice for how I can feel better it would really mean alot. Thanks for reading ❤️.",gay
waluigi can get this hole😍😍😈,,gay
I Need Some In The Bedroom Advice,"To put it in short, we're both bottoms. I'm willing to top him cause yknow we're dating, I love him and want to make him happy but also I want to be topped too? We're in a monogomous closed relationship so I don't really know what to do? I plan on just straight up asking him if it's possible we can both switch once in a while so we're both happy but I heard from his friend that ""knowing him he won't budge"" so I guess I'm just frightened to ask since we've both never had sex and it's a little bit of an odd topic To bring up? I need hype yknow lel. ",gay
It's my second wedding anniversary next weekend,,gay
What's the best safe site to find a fast hook up?,Title says it all. Sorry if this is a bit out of the norm for this sub.,gay
gay crush now has a girlfriend,i'm a bi woman and i just found out that this gay guy i'm in love with has gone fluid and now has a girlfriend who lives abroad. how fucked can my life be? i was the one who was always there by his side. why can't he just love me? ,gay
What do you think? Relationship advice,"Hey. I'm a 32 year old man and have been going out with a 38 year old man for the past 3 months and a half.
First let me introduce my love backstory. Before meeting him I had been single for 2 years after a 5 year long relationship. During those 2 years I have enjoyed life, discovered new aspects of my personality. I also became friends with people who are into enjoying recreational drugs but also orgies and stuff like that. I gave it a try, not my thing but I have no issues with people doing that. 


Everyone has to enjoy their life and it's different for everyone. Anyways. After 2 years I guess I was ready for a serious commitment and enter my current boyfriend. We had matched on tinder several times but his profile was exactly the kind of guy I know normally don't like me. But one evening at a bar he's there with friends and we stared at each other. Nothing else. But the same evening when I went home he had messaged and yeah 3 months later here we are.


His past is more eventful than mine. He has a decent job and loves clubbing and he is also dj'ing from time to time. He's nothing like what I would have imagined i would be with. But he's nice and careful and I really like him. However, he is also taking drugs recrationnally and had been in orgies in the past.


I think it's not his thing because he had been in long term relationships before, and I think that the last 5 years of celibacy he had was pretty much what I did for 2 years. But with drugs and orgies.


So it has been 3 months and today there was this big day party where he wanted to go but he thought wouldn't be my thing. Actually I didn't want to go and that's fine. But we'll, this party is know for its sex craziness and now he's with friends in an apartment and my gut is screaming he's in an orgy while my brain is trying to convince me I'm just acting crazy.


I have to say that I am on prep and he is too. And last month he wasn't taking it because we are exclusive and he didn't find the time to go to the doctor. However,at the beginning of this week he went for getting his prescription and also got viagra. And viagra is known to be helpful when you're high to get things working down there.


With me he never needs, well he's 38 so sometimes it's not working but not to the point of needing it. So yeah... Getting viagra the Monday before the crazy sex party that happens at the end of the week... The timing is really odd.


I'm meeting him on Tuesday and I don't know what to do. Should I ask him to explain it to me or Leave it because everything he's done so far was pretty much perfect and he seems like the perfect guy for a monogamous relationship, so I'm just gonna let enter the monster of doubt in the relationship, otherwise wonderful.


He does love his parties that's for sure. And I respect that. But I don't want to feel like shit every time he's doing something like that without me.


Last information. 2 weeks ago we confirmed by wording it that we were exclusive and in a monogamous relationship.


But I know that once you've done sex with drugs it's hard to get back. And since we don't do it together I'm afraid he might want to do it when I'm not around.

Thanks for reading this long post! ",gay
(Advice thread) How to deal with being in the friendzone/unrequited love from straight guys,"Hey I know we get a lot of these threads but I could just use clearing my mind and hearing some thoughts.

Yesterday was homecoming at my school and this guy whom I've had a crush on for a couple years was having a party. I really like him and we're really good friends, pretty sure he is straight but at times I felt like that isn't fully true, so I had some hope. I really wanted to try kissing him that day. I found myself in his room and really drunk, he wasn't there, but I was in there with two other friends of mine. I'll call the guy I like John. So John's friend comes in the room to grab something and he asks us if he could set us up with anyone and I mention John. I'm only half certain the guy was fucking with me because he could keep a straight face so well, but he basically told me sometimes John swings the other way. We are such good friends that I feel like I would have known if he did, but you never know as I don't share a house with him and stuff.

His advice was basically to just mention some stuff about basketball and then go for it, which is why I think he was fucking with me but I was drunk enough to try. John didn't really seem to get it and he is kind of oblivious, also I know the advice makes it seem like he's really one dimensional but he totally can be. So I ended up having a friend try to set me up with him and John's response was basically ""oh I would but I'm not like that lol."" 

Today my heart just kind of hurts, Its like ripping a bandaid off when you're young, stings a bit. I was talking to a friend about this and he was telling me about a time when he really liked this girl who was kind of flirty with him in a friendly way as well, but was never sure what to do. We both got hurt in these situations and we don't know how to handle it. We can leave it be and move on, but there's always something digging at us to just try and tell them how we feel, but (and especially for me since my friend might be straight) that could ruin things for us. I always feel like that if it does ruin the friendship, maybe it wasn't that great anyways. But what is really the point in all this? Any thoughts would be great, thanks :)

Soundtrack for this thread: Sufjan Steven's John My Beloved, The Only Thing, Drawn To The Blood, and All Of Me Wants All Of You-",gay
My first tattoo. Not a traditional rainbow,,gay
About the gay society,"Sometimes I feel so frustrated about the amount of the gay community. Seems every guy I met/dated also dated with my friend. 

And recently I found a guy I once dated and had a crush, turned out to be my friend's ex and they are re-date again! It just makes me so gross and hate myself !!! 😅. And it means that being a gay probably also means should have lower moral standard?",gay
"Update: my female gay cousin is crashing at her friends place, she will live there till she turn 18. family wants nothing to do with her. if I get employment I will help her. looking for a job. its not so bad now",,gay
Hookup fail and now I'm even more confused,"So I haven't really known my sexuality since freshman year of high school (now a sophomore in college and just assumed I was straight before that). Ever since then I've thought that I'm maybe bi or gay but not sure.

&amp;#x200B;

I just kind of had my first experience with anyone ever yesterday (I know I'm 19 old for a first time). It was basically a guy I met on grindr and we just cuddled for a while and I felt really awkward and so I just said I'm not feeling it and left. He was super nice so fortunately it was the least awkward it could have been (still pretty damn awkward), but now I just don't know what was going through my head that made me so hesitant.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not diagnosed but I'm pretty sure I have severe social anxiety so it could be that, or maybe it's that I'm not even gay. I know it sounds crazy that I don't know but I just felt all sorts of weird kind of like I didn't know where to go next.

&amp;#x200B;

I love gay porn so I thought I was gay but I felt really uncomfortable with this guy I don't know if it was just him specifically that turned me off or the fact that he's a guy or the fact that I'm just super super shy and couldn't handle the pressure of the situation.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone else have experience with something like this or advice?",gay
Homophobia within Families,"I have never been close to any family member so recently thought I may as well try and connect with some and just see how it goes. Anyway got in touch with 2 aunts, 2 cousins and seemed to go well with a few messages but 2 were extremely homophobic when after they asked if i was married I said I was gay and single, one of them replied fuck off faggot and the other told me to rot in hell and should be dead. To be honest none of that bothers me as was never close to them so have nothing to lose. My policy is if someone does not like me being gay then they are not a friend and not worth knowing and that also means family too.
What surprises me most is its 2018 not 1918 but seems attitudes have not changed. The ages of the two above were a female cousin aged 57 and a male cousin aged 44. The two aunts not responded yet so dont know what they will say.

Its no wonder there is no equal equality and acceptance for gay people in 2018 yet if people still have narrow minded views, i think they all feel we will try and convert them to be gay if we go near them!?

As I said am not upset over this as its just another day and was never close at all to them so have not lost anything. I am basically the black sheep of the family so no loss to them or me.",gay
Is life unfair or what?,"I hate life so much, it's insanely unfair.",gay
i have great respect for all healthcare professionals👨🏻‍⚕️☺️,,gay
Same sex expiermenting,"This is men and women who are 18 and older. 

Be 100% honest with your answer. When you were younger or even in college did you ever expierment with the same sex if so how and who initiate it first and what not? if you want and answer down below in the comment section you can or you can dm me ",gay
"I started using “rad” instead of “awesome” right around the time I came out. I don’t think this is a coincidence. It is really rad, though lol",,gay
"In every sense of the word, this is QUEEN.",,gay
Self facial,"I’m just wondering, does it make me gay if I sometimes enjoy cumming on my own face or mouth. I don’t ever fantasize about a guy doing it to me, sometimes if I’m in the mood I just do it on myself. I don’t like other guys and never have but I do like that. So I’m just wondering!

Thanks for anyone who takes the time to comment their own opinion!",gay
Gay Tradespeople?,"So I've been wondering how many of y'all wonderful people work in the trades? Are you out at work? Do they care? Have you faced harassment/discrimination because of it? 

&amp;#x200B;

I myself work in Commercial Heating, Air Conditioning and Refrigeration. I don't hide my sexuality from my co-workers, but none have asked so I don't bring it up. 

&amp;#x200B;

Cheers :)",gay
I need advice.,"So recently, I've been trying to date. I have this one suitor, but I'm not interested in him physically.

I've been looking on Grindr for someone I might have more sexual chemistry with, but no one wants to date me; rather they prefer NSA fun.

I'm at a loss at what I should do. I'm 22; I've never had any sort of romantic relationship, and I'm hungry for the experience (and sex). 

TLDR:
Should I just settle? Am I being shallow?",gay
Opinion on gay bathhouses,"So I was wondering what are some of your guy’s opinions in these establishments, as I don’t hear too much about them and don’t know if they are worth checking out in 2018. 

For instance I understand they are mainly places where gay men could historically meet up for sex, but we now have apps for that. What sort of guys still do go to bathhouses? I’m a 20M and while I wouldn’t be totally against a very attractive older man being into me, I do definitely find men closer to my age more appealing.

Thoughts, opinions, yay or nay?",gay
"Relationships, how do we choose them?","Hi All,

I am  completing research looking at relationships. I am in need of some  respondents who identify as homosexual. The survey takes less than 4  minutes and can be done on most devices. It would be really great to get  some gay/lesbian responses in order to represent homosexual population.  If you have a minute please check it out: [https://monash.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_b2A7LtwyMBbv821](https://monash.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_b2A7LtwyMBbv821)

&amp;#x200B;

Note: This is a re-post as I am still desperate for more responses. Thank you so much to everyone who has already completed this :) :)",gay
Now this is the kind of pumpkin I could really sink my knife into 🎃🍆😈,,gay
"If you enjoy reading emotional and controversial stories, read ""Concupiscence"" written by yours truly. Read here: https://santiagourdaneta.github.io/concupiscence.pdf",,gay
"Homophobic Man Gets His Face Busted Up After Calling Gay Man A ""F*ggot"" On A NYC Bus",,gay
I love it when my bf pretends sportsball,,gay
Help!?!?,"So ... my friend who I thought was straight JUST sent me a Snapchat of a girl sucking his dick with the caption, “could be you, but you playin” —-  I always joke with him sexually BUT this was beyond joking. 

What do I do!?!?",gay
How to date if you are overweight.,"So I am a 24 year old bisexual male but I’m more sexually attracted to men and romantically to both. I’ve finally come out both to myself and my family earlier this year and have finally tried dating apps after being single my whole life. But it feels like I’m constantly being ignored, blocked, or ghosted because of my height and weight (5’4 and 230 pounds) and I just feel worse. I’ve been going to the gym and even lost ten pounds so far but it still feels futile.  How do people like me find other people who are interested in me?",gay
Events in Michigan,"Does anyone know if there will be any events happening in Michigan, at all, in the next few months? Because I've been looking to go to some, but I'm not in the loop of things, so any help would be nice.",gay
If I made a group on groupme for lgbt people would anyone be interested in joining,,gay
"came out 20 minutes ago, need help","im 16, and just came out via text, most of my friends are fine with it i think but im in doubt as it seems way to good to be true, there´s still a friend who apparently has his phone turned off and he is kind of homophobic, im scared as he may tell his parents and they could tell others, i live in a kinda conservative area and i really dont want other people to know. ",gay
"Finding a mate in a gay-friendly city (also, Sweden)",,gay
Dating Risks,"  I am a senior in high school and the boy the I like quite a bit is a freshman in college. I am already planning on going to the same college(the College I was going to was predetermined before I met him). Here is the conditions we are three hours apart. I have a broken car so I can’t take visits to see him and he doesn’t travel a lot.   
  Q : Should I wait to express how I feel about him or tell him now knowing the conditions I am in?",gay
Sorta heard recently a rumour about a pair of twins i used hang out with years ago.,So the story  goes like this the person that told me used to be hella close with them. He told me on private message that one day while he was hanging out with them that he walked in on the twins (mind you they are both males twins) fooling around with one another . The guy has issues with them.,gay
Hi,I just want to talk to some guys dm if you want.,gay
"Your experience of dating a guy or girl for 18+ only ,",For bi and gay men  and women how was your experiences of dating either both sexer or the same sex. Especially your first girlfriend or boyfriend . I just want to gauge on how I can be a good boyfriend if I were to be in a relationship with a guy for the first time ever,gay
the reason were gay,,gay
my cousin got kicked for been gay! my parents don't want her as they don't like homosexuals( the big muslim homophobes) what can I do for her? she is 16. I'm 24 and have no job.help,,gay
"Gay Man's #MeToo story, ending a long silence",,gay
Mission Failed,"Tried bottoming for the first time, had been doing a little bit of prep to loosen me up a bit beforehand mostly with smaller things. But damn, he was just way too thick for me and I was still too tight; he wasn't able to get more then a couple inches in before coming to a stop. I guess I just need to go out and buy an actual dildo and practice with that? Oh well, at least the night wasn't a total flop; he let me bareback him afterwords which was my first time doing anything unprotected but we were both confident about being negative so I don't regret it I guess. ",gay
Christina Aguilera Helps Gay Couple Get Engaged at Concert,,gay
FINALLY got my first BOYFRIEND!!!,"First time poster and want to give back to all you lovely people ♥️. Okay here I go.

So I came out to my brother and my 3 best friends around 11 months ago during my senior year of high school. I was in a deep state of depression because I couldn't accept what I knew I was. If their reaction was poor I knew I would hurt myself, but thankfully they were okay with it. Because of that I slowly too began to accept myself 🙂.

I also ended up taking this crazy smart guy to my senior prom. We were in piano together and one time he rested his head on my shoulder when I fell alseep during a recital. I wasn't attracted to him but he liked me to sooooooo I said why not make is happy and take him. It was nice and all my other friends were very supportive of it. My dad didn't even get too upset. I was so afraid they would throw me out for good. My parents have a pretty harsh punishment where sometimes when I would misbehave they would kick me out of the house. One time was for 12 days and it was during my junior finals. Lol that was so stressful.

Anyways, I am very lucky to have such loving friends and parents. My coming out was definitely much easier than others and I feel pretty stupid of hiding so long.

That summer I still feel pretty sad though. It really sucked because most of my friends had girlfriends and didn't want to hangout. So I spend most of the summer alone. The only things that had to comfort me was one of my projects I was working on and the hope that I would finnally meet someone in college (which is what happened! 😁)

So college!!! So far has been great. Also really awesome that me and all my friends ended up at the same place. I joined one of the lgbt club and it was cool to meet other people with similar experiences. However, I felt really down because I couldn't see myself we a single person there. I got really bummed and was starting to feel extremely desperate so I made a grindr and tinder. Tinder was alot of effort to go through and I only meet a few people who were at my same university. Many didn't seem to want to talk much, less meet despite swiping on me. Grindr honestly pissed me off at first with the amount of nude pictures I got. I just started sending disgusting shit back to them and blocking. I would only respond if they want to talk not anything else.

One night though, probably after a week and a half after downloading the apps, I got a pretty long message from a guy. I thought he was just trying to impress me cause he told me I was the cutest guy he had seen on the app since he installed it a year ago. I really thought he was just bullshitting me but that Friday after our classes we meet.

We talked for about 3 hrs and I could tell he wasn't joking when he said he thought I was cute. I was flattered and totally shocked that a big stocky football guy like him actually liked me. He is the type of big straight jock you drool over lol. I am still and inch taller than him but that's okay especially because of how sweet he is. And despite his whole football background, he is even more of a nerd than me lol. We went to the nearby lake that Sunday and talked for 4 hrs then had dinner after. That is when I decided I liked him.

Then on Tuesday I went over to his place where he stays with his sister and two other roommates. Oh man I was so nervous to be alone with him in his room. He could tell too so he put on a show and we sat next to each other in his bed (which is king sized!!!). It wasn't until he tried to wrap his arm around my shoulders that I jumps on him and buried my face into his chest. I squeezed him really hard and he squeezed me back. We stayed like that and he pet my back, arm, and hair till the end of the show. Then I sat in his lap and had my first kiss with him. It was honestly terrible and we tied for like 10 mins but it was still really bad 😂. I am the second boy he has kissed so he too didn't really know what to do. Then he kissed my neck which was crazy! I didn't even know neck kissing was a thing but oh man is it crazy. I tried on him too and he really really liked it too, so much so that he laid on top of me with all his weight. That felt amazing! But around then it was getting late and still wanted to get back in time to eat, so we stopped there.

On the bus ride back to campus I asked if he want to be my boyfriend and he said yes 😁. That whole thing was only 2 days ago but it feels like months. Looking back on it it feels so surreal, like it never even happened. It just feels like another dream or love story I made up in my head. He was also so sweet to me that it doesn't even feel possible.

Ahhhh... I feel so lucky and happy now. Like I have nothing to worry about. Like I can finally feel okay and PROUD of who I am!!! 😁😁😁

Thanks again for the support gay subreddit! 💙💚💛💜💜♥️",gay
"Man and His New Boyfriend Kept Ex's Body In The Freezer, Took Over His Identity",,gay
I went to university to escape homophobic bullying at work,,gay
Is there someone who would be willing to PM me to talk about some issues I'm having with dating?,I've just been having such bad luck with dating and I'd like to talk about it with someone neutral and unbiased. I know my problems aren't particularly bad or unique but I'm having such a hard time with this.,gay
I have a question out of curiosity,"During intercourse, are you erect while being on the receiving end?",gay
Are gay rights going too far?,"Sorry, somebody told me on r/unpopularopinion and I wanted to know if it's true. I am not that educated on this subject. ",gay
Another gay podcast,"My friend and I made a podcast and needed some new ears, as well as critiques, new ideas and would just love to meet like minded people.
great to listen to while you play a game, or do dishes. Let us know what you think we'd love to hear from you guys! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6dgneFBk0t8",gay
Can’t help myself but have been watching this over and over and over and over ...,,gay
Gay &amp; Moving From The City to a Small(er) Town,"I am getting tired of city life. 

&amp;#x200B;

It's expensive, crowded, loud, and impersonal. I really would like to get back to living in a smaller town (I grew up in a town of about 500 people). 

&amp;#x200B;

I'd like to hear from gay folks (especially single ones) who live in smaller towns. How do you meet people / date? Are you out? Do you feel safe? Do you have access to non-judgemental health care? 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks! ",gay
First time?,"I’m nearly 25 and I’m still a virgin. Being completely in the closet and also being religious stopped me from pursuing having sex. I’m no longer religious (at all) and I’m also mostly out of the closet. 

I haven’t yet had sex but I have made out with guys on nights out. I really don’t feel comfortable having a one night stand or casual sex. I definitely prefer to have some chemistry with the guy. I haven’t dated yet but I’m worried that me being a virgin will be a problem. I was making out with a guy on a night out and we were texting the next day and getting on pretty well, and then he got really freaked out when he asked me if I’m a top or a bottom and I replied with “I’d be open to both but I’m still a virgin” ... he then said he had to go and he’d talk to me later, but I got ghosted and we didn’t speak after that. 

I know that’s just one experience but being so new to all of this, any experience is at the forefront of my mind so it adds to the anxiety of future experiences. 

I’m hoping I can meet a guy who’s up for dating and taking things slowly and not jumping into bed straight away. The purpose of this post is to just ask for people’s stories especially those who lost their virginity later than the “norm”. Was it a problem? Did the person you lost your virginity to know?

If you have any advice please share, my ears are open 😁 xxx",gay
1st gay bar,"So I came out back in april / may (took a while). a week after I came out I tried to go to a gay bar with my cousin. It went super bad. Like really really bad. I lasted like 30 seconds before becoming a faucet and running out, kinda literally.

Met, through a good friend / his fiancee and dude was kinda chill. Def didn't like him like that at all tho but my 1st gay friend / or a friend of a friend. (6 months later and I still don't feel comfortable saying I'm gay) 

POSITIVE!!!! I had a good night. Like a really good night....  Might b normal to most but its been hard for me

",gay
On Grindr “omfg i didnt know you are gay”,"Me: ye I am, who is this ? :)

:blocked:

😐 So now I gotta suspect every “straight” guy I know. ",gay
Mainly to vent but I’m in a predicament,"So I’ve been friends with this guy for nearly four years. He’s 19 I’m 18 and we became friends during high school, he began dating this girl I instantly knew was toxic but to me he was just a hot guy. We weren’t close until the second year and when it happened it was rather fast. Originally we had a class together for the first year and the second we had gym and I joined drama for tech which he did as his girlfriend was in it. We bonded more and more due to the frequency of us being together and I just kinda naturally gravitated towards helping him build stuff. He offered to take me home one day and we found out that we actually lived on the same street which was a huge shocker to both of us really. After that we’d always go home together and then he’d invite me over to watch movies and stuff like that. 

He ended up sharing his past with me and all the trauma he experienced. At that point I felt really connected and shared all of mine with him as well which I’ve never done with anyone else. I started to actually develop feelings for him stronger than the stupid crush type deal I had originally. We’d constantly hang out when he wasn’t with his now ex.
So towards the end of the year which was his senior year he wanted to take his girlfriend to prom (she graduated the previous year)  but she was going with her best friend from drama and he didn’t really care all that much bc he went to hers. The next day he told me he broke up with her at prom. 

He went into detail about what led up to it, what happened was he didn’t think she was happy with him as she’d constantly be rude or ignore him. He was very upset about it and i consoled him and tried to take his mind off it. She went on to play the victim card and called him abusive and how he never loved her blah blah blah on Twitter. She failed to neglect she was sleeping with her college theatre director while they were dating which he found out before prom but didn’t tell me till later. I called her out on it (even tho she blocked me for calling one of her friends racist for being racist) and how she was manipulating him and attacking him for his mental health. She texts him with screenshots and he gets upset and we get distant for like a week but I’m pissed off at her still. He’s over it after that week or so and he says he loves her and will try and get back with her to which I tell him how awful of an idea that is and how it’s only going to hurt him. 

He does it anyway and that’s that, I start dating my ex shortly after and I got distant bc I knew I had feelings for him but I didn’t want to ruin a relationship especially when he’s with someone who doesn’t like me. We don’t talk much for the 3 months I dated my ex but during that time him and his ex broke up again and he started dating another girl but they broke up before we hung out again. 

He had moved in with his best friends house with his mom and he invited me over and we chilled for a bit a few times. After I graduated his mom was moving out because she wasn’t getting along with his friends mom and he invited me to move in, to which his friend agreed. I took it in an instant bc I wanted to get away from my family and I could afford what they wanted. 

I stayed there for two weeks unofficially while his mom was in the process of moving. I slept on the couch half of those days but he said I could sleep with him,which of course I took up bc beds are comfortable and I liked him. One night he had his recent ex and another girl over to hang out and we were in his room. He was playing on his laptop and I was playing on the PS4 and it got late and he said e wanted to go to sleep so I was like alright. He told them the couches are free but instead they decided they wanted to sleep on his bed with us. After that he said he didn’t want anyone on his bed bc he couldn’t sleep and was so uncomfortable. I understood that completely so I didn’t like try and convince him. A few of the times we slept together I woke up to him wrapping his arm around my neck which was honestly really comfortable to me and I liked it so I just went back to bed lmao.

We were hanging out with a friend of ours after a party we went to while both a tad bit wasted and he decided he wanted to chug a bottle of bourbon I had and he got minor alcohol poisoning and our friend told me to take him to the bathroom help him undress and sit him in the tub with water running, which I did more for the fact that I was about to have a panic attack thinking he was dying. I personally try not to take advantage of people so like I didn’t I did exactly what he asked I saw more than I thought I’d ever see but I just wanted him to be okay.  I closed the curtain and sat there until he was done vomiting and ready to go to sleep, checking in every couple of minutes to make sure he was breathing and not drowning. 

After that whole thing happened I felt guilty bc I felt like I invaded his privacy. He asked me what happened and I told him everything and he kept apologizing for making me go through that. I always hung out in his room because he had the big tv and ps4 which he let me use. The next day he came out of the shower and asked me to give him something and I saw he wasn’t wearing anything bc he needed a towel so I covered my eyes and he was like don’t worry you’ve already seen me naked. I laughed but after that he had no problem changing or all that in front of me but I never really tried to focus on it. 

After a few weeks we’re talking and he tells me that he’s done with women. He then says “Maybe I should just go gay, if I was gay id want a relationship exactly like ours”. I really wanted to tell him he could have it, but honestly I don’t wanna ruin it. We’d have a few moments like that where I felt he was coming into me but I really just don’t want to lose him from my life. 

The fun part about it is he has another friend who is gay but he isn’t ashamed about openly being hot for him, to the point it makes him uncomfortable. He asked me how to deal with it and I was like just be honest, give him space if that’s what you feel is best but understand where he comes from. During that same conversation I told him about me having feelings for him and why I did but he never got distant or weird which is what I thought would happen.

We had to move out after the third month because of our roommate having a breakdown and basically telling us to get out at the end of the month. we originally planned on getting a place together but he found a place on his own and I wasn’t gonna fight him, it’s really not a huge deal. 

I don’t know what to do anymore I feel like he doesn’t like me sometimes when we text bc it always sounds like excuses to not hang but after 4 years I know he doesn’t lie about that stuff, he’s honest with me if he doesn’t want to. He’s the first person I can genuinely say that I love and it’s terrifying to me. The worst part about it is I can’t pull myself to date anymore, I talk to guys and I’ve got the apps but I just can’t really get myself to vibe with them.",gay
Straight guy going to a gay tailgate tomorrow- need advice please :),Wanted to start out by saying that I’m totally cool with  the entire LGBT community and I just want general advise. I am a straight male with 2 gay male friends who invited me to a gay tailgate. First time being in a situation where I will be fully surrounded by gay people (which I’m totally cool with). Basically I’m asking for advise on how to dress to not stand out as an outcast (could be overthinking all of this) but I thought that I could come to Reddit to ask for help! :) thanks again to any and all feedback! Love you Reddit. ,gay
My parents accept me but support homophobic politicians,Like i dont know what to take from this. Do they not realise how much homophobia affects my mental health? Do they really just not give a sh*t? Do they just pretend to accept me because im their kid?,gay
Lonely,I'm lonely as f,gay
Getting outed and friends brother hitting on me,"So I've gotten myself into a predicament and  would really appreciate any advice.

I'm a 17 year old senior in high school and I'm not open yet about being gay. I'm generally a reserved individual and I don't think I'm ready to handle coming out. A couple weeks ago I kind of outed myself to my best friend (I'll call him Sean). I have Grindr on my phone and although I dont usually message anyone or have even attempted to meet people from it I do like to browse and look at people on there. So while I was at Sean's house I was messing around on Grindr while he was playing on his PS4 and carelessly I left the app open when it was my turn to play a match (we're playing Fortnite). During the game Sean tells me he cant find his phone and ask if he can use mine to call his phone. I say sure not really paying attention and then I hear him say pretty loudly ""UM"". I look back at him and he immediately looks away and starts calling his phone. It finally hit me that he saw the Grindr page on my phone, I immediately go to the restroom and sit in there for about 10 minutes until I decide to just to pretend that nothing happened. THANK GOD Sean acted like everything was normal and we went on about our day.

&amp;#x200B;

So that would have been great if that was the end of it but since that day his brother (I'll call him Jason) has been acting really flirty and weird with me. he's 26 and from what Sean told me Jason's GF of 4 years broke up with him so he's been living back home for the past couple months. So admittedly I've had a crush on Jason growing up but he's never payed really any attention to me until now. Now whenever I'm over there he's very friendly with me, makes conversation and kind of overly touches me, ex. patting me on the back, puts an arm around my shoulder when he's showing me something etc.

&amp;#x200B;

For the last week and some change I've been doing a group project with Sean and we usually meet at his house after school to work on it. Only thing is Sean sometimes hangs out with his GF so he doesn't come home until later on so I usually get a head start on my parts of the assignment. Jason usually comes and hangs out with me until Sean gets home. Today I was working on our project and I heard really loud singing, I went to go look to see what was going on. I saw Jason taking a shower with the door fully open and I fuckin panicked. This is the first time I've ever seen a guy naked! I got my stuff and went home as fast as possible.

&amp;#x200B;

I've been racking my brain trying to figure out what's been going on. Obviously Sean told Jason about what he saw. So I'm wondering if maybe they're trying to bait me into coming out?? Sean's been a good friend but he's done fucked up things to me in the past so I wouldn't put it past him. Or maybe this was just Jason's idea? I'm so confused and don't know what to do. Any advice is appreciated.",gay
"Is it weird that I changed my mind about ""Not letting my sexuality control who I am"" kinda thing?","I'm Bi but I teeter more towards guys than girls by maybe 80%. I don't feel like I   have a personality. I always come off as a ""Gross standard straight guy"" but I've been thinking about getting into shape and maybe embracing more of my feminine side. Is that wierd? I don't want to be super flamboyant but I would want to be a little fem. I feel a little worried about how I've been feeling lately.",gay
Feel bad about gay guys,"Well! I just broke up again with my boyfriend...
I just wondered why gay guys always just want sex...I just wanna have a pure relationship! I really don’t know where I can find someone who for a pure relationship! ",gay
Anybody in the Tampa area looking for NSA head ?,Hey new to this place and just want to know what’s it about. I had a friend make good progress here . So don’t be afraid to hmu . I have my own car. Black fem chubby guy ,gay
I'm a good 15 and I like a 18 yr old seinor and I know he's gay and I know I'm under age but I really like him. Any advice??,,gay
"Gay penguin couple take chick away from ""bad straight parents""",,gay
Fall in love with my best friend,I am secretly falling in love with my best friend. He is straight and he doesn't know about that. He may have suspected that but I have tried so hard to hide it. It is so painful but the damn nature or whatever people call 'God' created me that way. I feel it is unfair. Unable to confess about your love is the worse kind of love.,gay
I’m so sad I just want everyone to be happy,,gay
Still Reeling,"Last year I had an amazing relationship with a younger person, due to fear of causing harm to our reputations, I withdrew from it all. I hurt him bad and I fell into a dark state of depression. Since then I have barely changed, I am still hurting as bad as the day we went seperate ways. I have dated and tried to move on and still, he is on my mind, I'm having such a hard time getting over it. In all honesty, suicide is something that has crossed my mind on the daily, I've had two attempts in the last year and I still consider trying again. People tell me to meet new people, but that is hard for myself looks-wise. I try dating, but guys make me feel inadequate and that turn discourages me from even wanting to try again. I don't know what I am supposed to do anymore",gay
Ha! I'm still lonely as fuck!,"Like i see every one over here with there boyfriends and there one true love and others talking about how they had love but something happens and I'm like over here still lonely af

***Imma bout to go on a short rant so yeah***

So I lost my mom when I was 12 she had cancer we all knew it was her time but I didn't want her to leave cus she loved me she loved me with all her heart and I knew it but then October 14 rolled rain and that love was gone just like that and yeah I know other have lost there mom but this hit me so hard it broke my heart in to so many pieces I have started to put it back together but it gonna take forever and bc of her passing i am unable to actually fully heal and hey maybe I don't need love  but I want I need that love that passion I just want to touch someone and feel there heart beat and know deep down that they love me do you understand? Probably not but you don't have too.",gay
"In the Mennonite Church USA, congregations realign on sexuality - Religion News Service",,gay
Montana gay men?,"Hi guys, I'm looking for a sub reddit for gay men in Montana. I have a quirk where I like to know who is gay in my area, and what they're packing. No matter where I move. And since craigslist personals don't exist any more, I'm kinda bummed out. And if one doesn't exist (which I think is the case) I'd like to start a nsfw one. I love to see what the guys around me are packing. Hard and soft. God I love side by sides. What do you think? ",gay
It's time to admit I was sexually assaulted,,gay
I feel like I'm wasting my youth,"Hello everyone, I'm new here, my name is Alex. I came to this subrredit because I didn't know where else I could share this, hoping that someone would help me or at least identify with the situation.

So, I'm 22 and I have never been in a serious relationship. I had plenty of dates and very short relationships (the longest being 6 months, and for me that doesn't count as serious) and that makes me feel sad. I feel like I haven't still met that person to make me have **real** feelings, even if it's not supposed to be forever. I just feel like I've been going through several people, hook up, kiss, share storiesm, laugh and cry, and that's it, I haven't felt loved even once.

There's the big problem that I'm now living in a small city, where it's impossible to find gay people because it's such a small and closed mind community. It was easier when I was studying in a bigger city. Now I'm stuck here, using Tinder (even Grindr is useless), hoping that the match would say hello back (which almost never happens, never understood why). I've been using that app for over 3 years when I wouldn't be with someone and I don't know why I keep using it. I feel like I'm stuck in a vicious endless circle and that I'll never get to know **that** someone. You know, someone with whom you can have real, genuine conversations and feelings, not thinking about whether it's gonna last long or not. And making my heart beat so much because of how gorgeous that person is inside and out. And all of this make me feel like I'm wasting my youth because I don't wanna grow up knowing that in my young days I never had the chance to experience those feelings you'd normally only feel until a certain age. 

All of this leads to some kind of depression, watching gay movies endlessly and fantasizing about the day when I'll finally feel better.

Has anyone experienced the same thing or has any idea how to get better with it?",gay
Where to find people to meet.,"Probably been asked a million times but where is everybody chatting/ meeting up with craigslist gone? Besides the obvious grinde, growler. Any other good ones I'm missing out on ?",gay
Gay people are cool,,gay
Who was the person/character that caused your gay awakening?,"mine were probably:

* Padme Amidala (Star Wars - Prequels)
* Esmerelda (Hunchback of Notre Dame)
* Cleo Sertori (H20: just add water)
* Kiera Knightley

there's probably way more, but those are the ones I can think of at the moment. ",gay
Latecomer to dating,"Hypothetically, if someone asked you for advice about starting to date in his early-to-mid-twenties, what would you say? Let's imagine this hypothetical person only came out to his family quite recently, and doesn't have very much experience of anything romantic or sexual. For the sake of argument, we could also imagine he has a full time job and lives in a city in the UK. I mean, that's just off the top of my head.",gay
This guy i like....,"Hello everybody my first post! 

&amp;#x200B;

There is this guy i really really like. We went out on 5 dates. On the fifth date he told me that he likes me as a friend and does not see us dating which is fine. Then we went out to breakfast Saturday telling me its not me and its him because he has been hurt in the past.

&amp;#x200B;

In the same breath he tells me he has been talking to this guy on grindr for two weeks and they met once and he really likes him.  From what this guy is telling me the guy he like is completely manipulating him.

&amp;#x200B;

The guy he likes has been married for 11 years to another man and still lives in the same condo with the supposed ex husband until next spring 2019.  He even read some texts from the guy he likes. Guy said, i miss your kisses, your cuddles and your smell. They met once and ended up at the apartment of the guy i liked and cuddled all night drunk and the guy felt him up the whole time. Can't go back to the apartment because of the ex. Something seems off.  Its moving too fast.

&amp;#x200B;

The guy he likes told him that, i went on grindr looking for nothing but found you. Guy is love bombing him big time and my friend just does not see. I will be his friend but its hard to watch this train wreck.

&amp;#x200B;

My friend has been hurt before in the past by the same type of guy and history is repeating its self.

&amp;#x200B;

Any suggestions on what i should do?

&amp;#x200B;

Thank for listening.",gay
My Modeling Blog,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/c02ns31vlxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/ik7qldculxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/otq7qyptlxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/xov9vbprlxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/wu5k6lfqlxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/59uu0onplxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/rve4c3fplxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/jypbuh7plxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/215syrwolxo11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/nquyj2g6wxo11.jpg",gay
Heyyy You....yes YOU! Click on this.,"I know this isnt an r4r sub for me to post this kind of thing but I just wanted to know and hear from the people on here. I'm a 20 year old guy who lives in a distant part of the world(the other side of the world..yeah). I'm looking for something serious and not a hookup or like a fling...I know people might hate me for saying this but I want to be ""discreet""...at least in the beginning since I'm not completely ""out"" yet. Do you think that it is possible to find real or true love online? Is it a possibility? Most people make it sexual whenever I tell them I'm a bottom and a virgin(only because they ask me). I just wanted to know your thoughts. :/",gay
"""Find Yourself"" relationship advice help","About a year ago I met a great guy and we started to hang out, a few months later we started seriously dating and it was the happiest time of my life. But he broke up with me, sadly he's still the love of my life. So moving on has been difficult. 
He says I need to find myself and sort myself out. 

I've only ever had 2 boyfriends. 1st guy I met when I first moved to Toronto when I was 20 and were together for 8 years. I took a year to do my own thing. Then I met guy before my year of experimenting was over and with guy 2 we hung out for about a year and seriously dated for 3 months before he ended it. 

The thing is I've spent most of my adult life in a relationship and don't actually know how to ""find myself"" I feel like I have a good idea of who I am and what I like. 
I admit while I was with guy 2, one of my friend circles fell apart and I tore my ACL and couldn't play on my rugby team anymore more. So I found myself with a very small social circle and we'd mostly hangout with his friends, most who have become my friends.

I think he wanted us to each have our own friends and own lives. But when we were together I just wanted to spend time with him.   

The point is I literally don't know how to find myself. I didn't grow up with much and went from high school to college to job. I never took time off to go venture which is where I hear everyone ""finds themselves"" I still don't have a lot of cash. Mostly living paycheck to paycheck. So how does someone or yourself, really find yourself?

TL;DR
Ex broke up with me and said I need to find myself, but literally have no idea how to do that. ",gay
"Arrested and harassed, Russia's LGBT+ community fears crackdown worsening",,gay
Don’t forget folks,,gay
Homemade anal safe semen,"Hello everyone i would like to ask if someone know some kind of recepie for anal safe fake cum that I can make at home from some kind of household items (if possible).I couldn't find anything so I decided to try it here.
",gay
My story/ perferences,"Hi, I'm new here, I'm not out yet (waiting to move out) I'm 20.ummm, I don't like labels.

MY STORY: 
Ok so. I've only had a couple of experiences with sex (all with boys), well there was an ""orgy"" but, I only chose to have fun with the boy (7 years ago), because I was comfortable and naturally knew what to do for him.

MIDDLE SCHOOL:
 When I was in middle school I was at lunch and there were 3 girls and a guy (Jose) sitting across from me, minding their business. The girls were complaining about the boys hair and such; I said I liked it. They stared at me, we conversed about things, they whispered. They tried to get him to talk to me. As the year went on we became lunch buddies, I will always remember the laughs we shared. The girls would sit across from me and Jose. We'd laugh, tease, gossip, study, you know casual ""friends"". I didn't know at first but, the girls knew I liked Jose (Jose probably assumed too) they just wanted me to admit it. I couldn't do that, the fear, the labels, the hate, I couldn't deal with that on top of my depression. I don't remember how we started to separate, but I do remember the day my heart broke, and it still makes me emotional to this day. 

MY HEART BREAK:
 We were graduating middle school, Jose and I weren't friends anymore, I talked to the girls occasionally. My depression was so deep. A few nights after we graduated I cried rivers in my room alone because of my feelings for him were like a tower of Hope and someone came tearing it down. After I sent him the message on my feelings for him. He blocked me, it hurt me so much that through the first 2 years of high school I continued to make fake accounts and see how his life was going, I messaged him a couple times and he blocked me again.

Current: I graduated high school, doing online classes, about to get a job, fighting depression, finding myself, and I'm moving on. Some days are hard, I feel like my depression is apart of me, I don't want that.

PREFERENCE:: 
OK SO, I don't know what I identify as I am who I am. No fucks given. But I have a type I guess, I know what my brain likes. Atm it's tall white athletic men. But that's just lust, I can fall in love with whoever, it's more to relationships that just wanting to have sex with that person, but here's my question.

First, is it wrong for me to have  a perference? Second,So'm new to dating sex and all that. Experience wise , not knowledge. So, I find a man attractive, I find out he's gay by a little small talk. We talk exchange #s, go out to dinner, his place, movie, drink, talk, cry, cuddle. Nope no sex. At first I wanted him like to be all over me, but the feeling was just horniness. Sometimes it may turn to sex, is that normal?

I'm so sry if I sound confusing feel free to ask questions. I'm trying to understand myself too lol.
Thanks for reading!
",gay
Anyone else?,I think it all the time. Since many of my peers are already becoming dads I feel I will grow into a really bitter person over the years watching everyone around me settle down and create families which is what I want most but can't do and I will just live like shit with noone to even be with on Christmas. Has anyone been or maybe is in such a situation? How did/do you get by?,gay
Straight guy looking for femboi,Looking for fun understanding femboi to show me just how good bussy can be,gay
'AfroQueer' keeps it real with Africa's first LGBT+ documentary podcast,,gay
New here!,"Hey, new on here living in Seattle. Looking for some friends, message me.

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/434fn3ictoo11.jpg",gay
Hi,Any one 40 years bottom? ,gay
Going on dates? Relationship? HOW?,I’m 18 and I’ve never been in a relationship with a guy. I came out last year and been looking for a special someone to come into my life but no luck! Advice?,gay
Crazy neighbors,"I recently moved to a new city (Valdosta, GA) and got setup in my new apartment .  I went outside and heard the neighbor sitting on her front porch complaining to someone on the other end of the phone saying that she ""wanted her son to be a man"" and she told him ""if he keeps doing that gay shit she is going to beat him""  

I can't stand this on two fronts because beating on anyone regardless of circumstance is not acceptable in any form , and beating someone because of their POSSIBLE orientation is also deplorable.  

I will answer any questions as they come up about the situation, but is there anything I can do?",gay
Things I get in my Grindr inbox. He practices yoga and the outcome is just exceptional.🙈🙉🙊,,gay
Gay Spanish NSFW Subreddit," 

Hey, not long ago I asked if there was any subreddit where Spanish gay guys could share NSFW pics of themselves, and I didn't find any, so I decided to create one myself.

I'll leave the link here and I encourage you to post pics if you feel like it!

[https://www.reddit.com/r/GaySpainGoneWild](https://www.reddit.com/r/GaySpainGoneWild)

Hey, hace poco pregunté por aquí si existía algún subreddit dónde chicos gays españoles pudiéramos publicar fotos NSFW de nosotros mismos, pero parece ser que no existía ninguno...hasta ahora, ya que he creado uno yo mismo.

Dejo el link debajo y os animo a que colgéis todas las fotos que queráis!

[https://www.reddit.com/r/GaySpainGoneWild](https://www.reddit.com/r/GaySpainGoneWild)",gay
Ex Teacher Sues After He Says He Was Fired For Being Gay,,gay
"I ghosted on my ""friends"".","I'm not sure if I'm just being immature, or if I'm actually leaving behind toxic people. Most people I tell about my friends say I should find new ones. 

But yeah, this just feels toxic; so I'm done. I still have one friend, but he's moving away soon. 

They keep messaging me and I'm not sure what to do. 

One of them is also a suitor I have no interest in. The other one I've had sex with, and the other one I dated, and am still very attracted to. He left me for another dude and said I'm ""not enough"".

It's funny; you can see my whole year in my post history. It's funny how things turn out.

Tldr; I'm wondering if my method of severance is justifiable.",gay
Help to stop Romania's anti-gay REFERENDUM,"No sure if this was posted before but I can find no posts about it on r/gay

So a little contex: [https://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/romania-gay-marriage-ban-referendum-vote-lgbt-rights-a8541461.html](https://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/romania-gay-marriage-ban-referendum-vote-lgbt-rights-a8541461.html)

[Romania](https://www.independent.co.uk/topic/Romania) will hold a referendum on changes to the constitution that could effectively permanently ban gay marriage.

If you don't know anything about Romania, let me brief you about this country. This is mostly a peaceful country but a lot of the population is poor and uneducated. The young people in the upper-middle class are obsessed with american television and hollywood culture so most of them have no problem with gay people.

The thing is this country just until 1989 was a communist one, combine that with the level  of poverty in most areas the result aren't good.

&amp;#x200B;

To make matters worse, this referendum costs  35,120,000 euros, in a country were hospitals are in dire need of money, this is outrageous. And to be clear even if the referendum is denied, this still doesn't mean gay people will be able to marry.

&amp;#x200B;

The problem is that an organization called ""Coalitia pentru familie"" (Family Coalition) is spreading hate messages towards gay people, implying that a family is only formed between a man and a woman.

&amp;#x200B;

This is where you could help:

Comment on/Report their page:

[https://www.facebook.com/coalitiapentrufamilie/](https://www.facebook.com/coalitiapentrufamilie/)

Dislike/Report their song:

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i4ZwvGY4NqE](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=i4ZwvGY4NqE)

&amp;#x200B;

Unfortunately there aren't any strong campaigns pro-gay that I may refer you to but one of the relevant organizations is this one:

[https://www.facebook.com/asociatia.accept/](https://www.facebook.com/asociatia.accept/)

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
What is sex ed like?,I’m gonna need some answers from younger gays cuz I’m in 7th grade rn.,gay
National Organization of Gay and Lesbian Scientists and Technical Professionals Awards Scholarships,,gay
Need some advice... thanks,"So basically there’s this one guy whose 18 keep in mind I’m almost 16, and he’s dating another guy that I don’t know, he says “I miss you, I want your body” and I like him a lot but I wouldn’t wanna cause any problems... should I get with him or not...",gay
St. Petersburg’s Allendale United Methodist Church uses vandalism as teaching moment,,gay
Question for tops,"Do tops think that bottoms are hard to find and there are more tops than bottoms? Just asking because every bottom will roll his eyes and say that he is surrounded by other bottoms everywhere and always.
Or tops do know that there are fewer of them?",gay
Poker Face by Lady Gaga is 10 years old today,,gay
This is a new one. I assume it’s a scam?,,gay
I Just have to tell someone,"So I recently got out of a long term relationship that was working against both of us...It was somewhat mutual and are still in communication but it still hurt. Then finally about a month ago I started talking to guys online again, I found one who I talked to for a couple weeks and it we got along quite well. Happens to be a drag queen, which I also LOVE, and finally we went on a date. I had to drive an hour to pick him up and bring him back to the city to have a romantic night and hopefully everything worked out so I wouldn't have to drive him home later that night...Well it did, after the romantic dinner...which was us talking, staring into each others eyes, and both with the biggest smiles on our faces for a couple hours...we came back to my place around 9 and before we knew it, it was 2 am. Getting hot and heavy just going constantly....I fucking LOVED it. After that literally all day my mind is on him, and I'm pretty sure its the same for him. Then a few days later it worked out where we both had time off work again so I picked him up and we hand a nice day, played some disc golf, went to a provincial park, and fucked in my truck....put sweaters in the windows and sat in the back seat with the fronts pushed all the way forwards...Holy hell was that hot. He also gave me the best bj I've ever had and he said the same...after gulping down his special sauce. We just sat their and stared into each others eyes. 

The reason I have to put it on here is because I know I am falling for him and him for me, however he is just getting out of a bad relationship so needs time before he commits...I just want to call him my boyfriend that's all but I don't think I should bring it up until he gets over his past...which I'm completely willing to wait for it just sucks waiting. I think about him right before I go to sleep and their's always a loving message on my phone for when I wake up. I literally can't think of or talk to anyone else in a romantic or sexual way. I just want to call him mine and show our happiness off to the world.",gay
[22M] I Fell In Love With A Guy After 2 Months And He Left Me,"I met him in February and we dated until March, we both were 22 years old and geeky, but cute, guys. We told each other everything in that two months. 

We lived about an hour away from each other, but we always made time during the week to come see each other and we genuinely enjoyed each other's presence. 

I didn't know at the time, but I do know now that I was in love with him. I don't throw that word around -- I have only been in love one other time and that was with a guy that cheated on me after two years -- but even then, I didn't get the connection as I did with him. 

He was amazing, he really was. He was good-looking, talented, and very funny -- everything was going great, until one week he got very distant and he broke up with me. At the time, I cried -- but I wasn't devastated. He didn't give me a reason for the breakup and soon after he stopped answering my texts and calls and eventually unfriended me from Facebook and blocked me on Instagram. 

I find myself thinking about him more often lately -- and even getting upset. I wish he would have told me why he left me, why we couldn't work it out, but he didn't and he won't even start a dialogue with me. 

I only realized a few days ago that at the time, I fell in love with him -- and it's so weird because I am a person that is usually in full synchronization with my feelings but this one got past me for months. 

Any advice? 
",gay
Porn,What's your favourite porn? Feel free to link it.,gay
Trip to Italy.,"So, I may be overthinking things. But, since I met my BF, he’s brought up us taking a vacation to Europe like almost every week. Talks about how we’ll go to Italy, or maybe a Mediterranean cruise. So, occasionally I look at plane tickets... and today they’re only like $650ish! I sent him a screen shot and said “look how cheap these tickets are!” Thinking he’d be as excited as I was. He wasn’t. He ended up telling me that he doesn’t know because he may end up going to California next summer. I don’t get what that has to do with anything. Why does it seem like all of a sudden he has no interest in going with me? He’s the one that brought it up in the first place.... he even wanted to pay for my passport renewal for me.",gay
Story of my life!,,gay
I just used my first anal toy and wanted to tell somebody.,Been wanting to get one for a while and finally did. Annoyed at myself for waiting this long.,gay
Why do most gay men only want to fuck around and not have a proper relationship?,Is it just me or most of us. I am 26. Will turn 27 next month. And fuck my life. I am a relationship virgin.,gay
Bi curious sissy,"I want to wear a dress and fool around with a guy in a nutshell, im in lansing michigan",gay
Advice on how to help a friend/crush without screwing up,"I've been hanging out with a guy a lot for the past spring and summer.  I've been helping him with landscaping, car trouble, just being there for him while he's depressed, etc.  The topic of dating has been broached and mostly dismissed.  I say mostly because we're both gunshy but not totally ruling out the possibility.  I would love to date him.  I have really fallen hard for him.  I think about him constantly.  First thing when I wake up, last thing when I sleep.  I just want to see him smile.  It's odd.  I've never felt anything like this before and I don't quite know what to do with the emotions.  He knows how I feel and that I am not going to act on how I feel because that would be very disrespectful.  I acknowledge that I'm just getting out of a very controlling long term relationship and now is not the time to jump headfirst into anything new.  

One of his previous boyfriends was very abusive.  They clicked on a spiritual level and my friend says that were it not for the abuse they'd still be together.  This is where his hesitation comes in (and an age gap if we were to date that causes him no small amount of discomfort).  Occasionally, his ex messages him or calls.  He always tells me afterwords (not sure why).  It usually makes his mood odd for a few days and he says he would never go back because the abuse was mental and physical.

My problems are: 

1. I love him very much and the fact that this guy hurt him makes me very upset.  Not really angry as much as I am conflicted.  It's his ex, his situation to handle as he sees fit, and all that.  I just wish he didn't hurt like this and didn't have to deal with it.  I wish his ex wouldn't contact him (I know that part is what it is and I can wish all I want).  It's kind of like, ""you hurt someone this incredible, you don't deserve to even cross their mind!""  What should I be feeling on this?
2. How do I be there for him without it seeming like I'm making a move, jealous, interfering, etc?  I don't know what to say when he gets that odd mood afterwords.  It's not quite like he's depressed.  It's more akin to severe distraction with a touch of depression tossed in for good measure.
3. What should I do or avoid doing so that my hatred for his ex (who I've never met or even seen) does not show?  I don't want to seem like I have a problem with them talking, because I don't.  It's his decision whether or not they talk.  I just hate anybody who would hurt him.  That's my emotion to deal with.  Not his.  So, I'd rather he not know that I feel like I do.

Any advice is appreciated because I've never felt this deeply for someone.  I spent 7 years with someone and never felt like this for him.  I have no clue what I'm doing and don't want to screw this up.  Even if me and this person never date, I don't want to risk having them in my life.",gay
"Maybe im being petty, but honestly in so tired of this.",,gay
Am I in love 😍,"So I’m not sure how to start this but I’ll give it a try (please excuse my punctuations and maybe bad spelling also) well I’ve had a group of friends since 6th grade, me and three other guys. After two years of friendships we decided we’re brothers and nothing will change that no matter the circumstance. Before we started our freshman year of high-school I came out as the only bi guy in our group. Sophomore year I realized I had a bit of a crush on one of them, but I shunned it off. We all graduated together two went to the air force but he and I stayed close we eventually got a apartment together and went through a few relationships by each others side. That ended around November 2016 we cried together about losing our two bedroom apartment together tho we always stayed in the living room together. It was then I realized I never got over the crush I had two years back. I figured because he was straight there was no point of trying any further. But now he’s the only person I go to for anything and everything tho w aren’t living together he’s the one person I think of more than anyone no matter what I’m not sure what to do here. We always say I love you bruh or I’ll see you later bruh   He’s my Parabatai literally we got the tattoo together I know now that I love this man I’ve never met anyone who I feel is as special please help ",gay
How Grindr be,,gay
TMW when the Pope is okay with you being gay.,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/9axvgic53lo11.jpg",gay
Emotional Venerability or Real Emotions,"So I had feelings for someone since January. I developed a crush for him ever since. He offered me a place to stay with him a night and he would bring me home. We walked on the board walk and he took me to dinner. We got back to his place and watch a movie I invited him to cuddle with me and we start to make out/have sex/ and he invited me to sleep with him after a shower with him in his bed. I slept with him and we woke up a few times at night we wrestled and went back to sleep. After I bottomed for the first time and he topped the first time I felt confused kept asking my self, “Why me?” And when I asked he never gave me an answer. I can’t tell if it’s that I was very venerable after sex and they just raised or I have actual feelings for him.  

(Can you say run on sentence?) - // Sorry about that kinda emotional... 
",gay
I don't know why l'm not out and proud...,"I'm 26, female and have been aware of my attraction to girls since l was 8. I have a gay-positive family, and l live with roommates who are complete accepting. 

So why can't l just be okay being out? How is this still so hard to deal with?",gay
Gay journalist calls out Superman for being a bad LGBTQ ally in an epic Twitter feud,,gay
"Effeminate / Flamboyant / ""Camp"" guys (also - my first post here)","Hi guys, I've just joined and this is my first post - I'm 30 - I always felt I was straight, masculine, the usual but have come to question almost everything in recent years, sexuality, identity, and whatever else - the short story is I'm very confused about myself right now, (hey well join the club right?) - and this is mainly due to a strict upbringing - but the reason why I'm posting is to do specifically with the topic of feminine / camp acting gay guys.

If I search this reddit (or almost any gay forum I've found) I always find a history of posts and debates about people hating feminine men, or the frustration that comes with people expecting ""straight acting"" partners - or the general discrimination against effeminate guys within the LGBT community, I've read some really awful, frustrating and heart-wrenching stuff.

I guess the question I want to ask is... are there guys out there (fem or not) that like effeminate / flamboyant / ""camp"" acting men?

All I ever hear is about discrimination against them but never about those who are actually into them - do they exist? are there forums or apps, or chatrooms that tailor for, and / or create a safe space for feminine guys to chat with each other?

The whole topic makes me sad, as a curious and slightly confused guy I just wanted to say that I find myself drawn to effeminate and camp guys, wanting to be around them, wanting to listen to and chat to them - in fact all the gay or homosexual thoughts or ideas that have entered my head recently are almost exclusively around these kinds of guys, I've started to wonder what it would be like to have more friends like them, and what it might even be like to become fem myself.  
If there's anyone out there that wants to chat, or be friends with a ""straight"" guy like me, I'd love to hear from you - I'd love to know of any resources or chatrooms / apps that are aimed at effeminate gay men, I can't be the only person who is drawn to or maybe dare I say it.. even attracted to guys like this, but it feels like it somehow - I guess if I search deep down in my heart I realise I want more guys like this in my life.",gay
Why did this gay guy say that he could take my man to me?,"I’m a straight female. I had a gay guy in college look at me and say ‘I can take your man’ 
I was taken back by that comment. My partner isn’t gay. And I’m a straight female so I don’t see him as competition. Can someone explain why he would?",gay
How do you get over straight crushes?,"I just confessed my feelings to my straight best friend of 2 years who i have a crush on because i couldn't stop thinking about him; and i feel empty and lonely. He came off as gay to me, he was always playful but i guess not. How do you fine people deal with knowing alot of the people you find attractive will not feel the same about you?",gay
Something in between casual sex and Dating?,"So I had a casual hookup the other day it was fun, I don't regret it. But it left me feeling really disappointed. 
I needed an emotional connection.

But I'm not in a position to enter into a relationship right now and I'm not about lead anyone on. 

How do I go about finding a more intimate hookup, someone to share an evening with.

I know it can happen, a few years ago I went to a hookup but we just clicked and there was cuddling, kissing and interesting conversation. 

Any advice?",gay
This has got to be *someone’s* fetish...,,gay
Anal sex hemorrhoid advice?,"I’m a 24 y/o gay man who feels like he can’t bottom. In the past year and a half I started experiencing blood and pain while having anal sex with my partner. It took a little time, but I realized after a doctor visit that I have a hemorrhoid. According to my doctor, it’s “between an internal and external hemorrhoid.” Succinctly put, the hemorrhoid is practically on my anal sphincter (on the inside). I used prescribed suppositories and Preparation H. I also changed to only using wet wipes and trying to eat more fiber. I abstained from anal sex to heal and have tried to be cognizant of any activity that strains that area. I started taking Rutin supplements and I really believe that they made a difference.

Twice in the past month I decided to bottom (about a month apart). The first time there was some initial discomfort, but it subsided. After, I immediately used Preparation H. The sex wasn’t too rough. A couple days ago I bottomed again. There was plenty of foreplay and lube. The sex was a little rougher, but not extreme. We stuck to missionary to avoid directly agitating the hem. I forgot to use Preparation H the first night and things are a little tight and sore. The area is tight and swollen to the touch. When I dab the area, there is trace amounts of blood. I stopped using Prep H to see what happened. My bowel movements are uncomfortable, but not painful. I started taking more fiber.

I’m suspicious that the soap I use in the shower has also been irritating the area. I feel like it may have contributed to the itchiness. Before I continue rambling about butt health, what regiments work for you and your anal sex life? I want to be able to bottom more (and confidently), but my hemorrhoid seems to eat at my ability to do so. I don’t want weeks of healing after one bottoming experience. My hem isn’t at a state it can be removed as far as I know. I might need to see a specialist. I’m feeling a little put out about the entire situation. Feels like my butt it broken haha.",gay
Vice President Mike Pence to Speak at Anti-LGBT Conference,,gay
How to get the best sub body,"Hi, so I got my first boyfriend pretty recently and I’m pretty sure I’m a sub, and I was wondering what some excercises were to get the best sub body. I think I’m old enough to develop muscle so if that’s a part of it I’m sure I can do it. Also, what traits do you find sexy in a sub and how can someone get them?",gay
I’m on Cloud 9- had a photo shoot with my boyfriend today and the results were fantastic,,gay
To homophobes/transphobes/jerks,"This is something I’ve always wondered ever since I first knew what being gay even was, why are people homophobic and all that? I get the whole religion point and whatever, but it goes so far as to commit hate crimes, and cause lots of discrimination over something that hardly even matters?

What I don’t get is, if it doesn’t effect them in any shape or form why can’t they mind their own business and get a life? People are so disgusted by it, but you never really see a solid reason why, and if you do get a reason it’s either completely stupid like “god hates them and there’s no denying it” or they just avoid awnsering it

Also if you’re homophobic or any of that stuff, why don’t you just take a step back and realize how childish you’re being, and how much you hurt people from things you say to them.

Stay strong friends",gay
Needing a little insight,"Sorry if this isn't an appropriate place to post... if not mods please lmk and I'll remove immediately! 

First of all, a little background info... I'm a married hetero woman with 4 kids, ages 12 to 18. This story involves my 14 year old son, freshman in high school, who has Asperger's (form of autism... he's very high functioning but definitely has issues with social situations).

I let all my kids have a pretty active online social media presence, but intermittently check-in to make sure all their activities are safe/appropriate. They know at any time I can check in on what they're up to. Especially with this kiddo....I worry about him talking to people he doesn't know or giving out his personal info. We talk a lot about safe interneting, but he's pretty naive and wouldn't necessarily recognize predatory behavior. 

A few days ago I went into his room to tell him to get ready for bed, and he immediately jumped/looked guilty/tried to hide his phone. I had him hand it over for a quick look. Turns out he was reading gay porn/fan-fiction. Think of a popular 90's video game character that he's currently into in all forms. After a little more research, he's been reading AND writing gay porn about this same character for several months. Also messaging back and forth for awhile with another user/writer on this app, where each of them traded messages back and forth, line by line, creating as they went along a VERY graphic adventure of this character and related characters in quite a few scenarios that even made me blush, and I've read some pretty kinky stuff lol! 

So I didn't freak out.... he's a 14 year old boy, not a shocker that he likes porn. Because of his autism he is very socially inept and at times comes off very immature or child-like, but he's still 14! I asked him matter of factly if he's gay or thinks he might be... he says no. I reassure him repeatedly that it doesn't matter to me if he is, I just want to know how best to support him. He still says he's not. But he's been for many months now, almost daily, reading and or writing gay porn, all exclusively about this fictional character. With his autism, when he gets interested in a topic the way he is right now with this character, he'll become obsessed with it and everything he reads, watches or plays will be related to this topic. Idk if that's how he came across this particular type of porn or what. Doesn't matter. I'm just trying to support my son in whatever way possible. I would hope he feels comfortable in telling me whatever....

Sorry this got so long, but basically what's your opinion? Am I reading way too much into this situation?  Do I let it go and just let him know I'm here if he ever wants to talk? Just want to be there for my kids, in whatever way they need me. 

tl,dr My 14 year old son has been reading/writing gay porn exclusively for months, insists he's not gay and that it doesn't ""turn him on"" but says he doesn't know why he likes it",gay
Do gay men really hate other gay men for not being masculine enough?,"On r/AskReddit, they said to me most of the gay community is like this. Sorry, I'm just not informed enough about this. I hope this isn't true.",gay
Palm Springs Bitch,,gay
Hii,Hii,gay
How do I know if I am gay?,"I know i like girls, even though I have never had a girlfriend but recently I have started to be attracted to guys. Could I be Bisexual?  
Sorry if this isnt the right place to post this.",gay
It’s the little things that make your day,"Just today, I had double periods of Maths first thing and the walk to school was absolute shit due to the blistering cold morning we had, so my day was already poor and I had barely started school. So soon enough, Maths started and my class entered, the tables were split into 3s so one set of tables could only sit 3 people, my Maths class usually comprises of 16 people, so I guess you can see the divide there.

Everyone manages to find a table and seat next to their friends (I was new to the school so I had like no friends, especially not in my Maths class) and 4 tables fill up, I sit down alone on one table and then 2 more people enter, I think, oh thank god I’m not sitting alone, but then the two decide to sit on a completely different table to me, so I’m completely alone still.

Then this guy comes in cause he’s late as well, at first I was hoping he’d sit with me but knowing that the two that just entered are his friends, he’ll just fill up the seat next to them, so I drop all hope if that happening. I turn back to my bag to grab my books as my teacher is taking the register and low and behold, I feel someone sit next to me and it’s him, I just stare at him as he takes his jacket off (we have to wear suits in school, fucking sucks) and I look behind me to double check if the seat next to his friends is suddenly full, it’s not. Once he’s done with his jacket, he literally turns to me and smiles and says “Hi”. I greet him back as quietly as I can (social anxiety sucks) as I try to shrug off the shock of what just happened and class starts as usual.

We don’t socialize or talk much since our Maths teacher is pretty strict on his silence policy while he’s talking, but when we’re on assignments, it’s endearing to hear him sigh and groan as he can’t solve a problem I solved about 5 minutes ago, we occasionally talk (usually me tutoring him through a problem and him just staring at me and the books), but other than that, we’re silent, we acknowledge the others presence, but we don’t talk. Usually he’s pretty talkative in class, apparently not today. Plus he’s literally the hottest guy I’ve ever met and I sorta had a crush on him before this, but that’s not a big problem.

TL;DR: Had a shitty Monday morning, got double Maths first thing in the morning, end up sitting alone but then hot guy sits next to me and makes my day.",gay
"Facebook flags post critical of Islam’s treatment of gays as “hate speech,” bans editor for 30 days",,gay
World's only transgender minister seeks to break barriers in Taiwan,,gay
My friend,My best friend just became a dad! I am very happy for him and his girlfriend! It just got me thinking how behind I am though. He has a kid and I haven't even been on a date. Being gay sucks. For real.,gay
Fetishes,What are some of your fetishes?,gay
I'm gay but I don't like gay porn.. Is it normal?,"As the title say, I'm gay and I'm open about it, everyone in my life knows and I'm okay with the fact, I enjoy gay men and all, but there's this thing that bugs me: I can't watch gay porn.

It just doesn't turn me on, it bore/disgust me.
Usually I watch straight porn and sometimes even lesbian porn and I can't really understand why. 

I'm not into girls at all and this thing sometimes makes me wonder what's wrong with me being gay and watching straight/lesbian shit. ",gay
If Vogue was written in 2018.,,gay
I need more gay friends 👬,,gay
First prostate orgasm. It was incredible!!,"I actually never knew you could get an actual orgasm from anal penetration, so it was a shocking surprise, but here's a little story.

So a couple nights ago, just browsing Grindr like every bored = horny gay person does, an Italian dude messages me. We've spoken previously, and had a few ongoing conversations before, friendly ones. He was horny this time around, so we agreed to meet up at a nearby park not far from his house. We see each other, chat for a little while, and eventually head to his house.

Now the dude was just my type. Kinda short or about my height, a bit stocky/muscly, brown skin. Although I'm down for anyone, he was in my high type hotness levels. We end up at his house, and he's READY. As soon as the front door closes, he's all over me. I was ready and definitely in the mood, so after a few kisses, we head to his bedroom.

Now I'm predominantly a bottom bitch, so my booty was bound for pound town. We tackle each other onto the bed, and vigorously make at and do some foot play, since we both have foot fetishes. After the aggressive foot worshipping and everything else, we end up fucking. He's of average length and girth, so I wasn't to shy to take it. But once he entered, he knew what he was doing. I don't know how to describe what he was doing, but it was such a pleasurable experience. 

Now we're in 20 minutes of anal, and we're both nearing climax, but the unimaginable (to me at least) occurred. As soon as he had finished, I get an extreme tingle from my butt. It was so strong, I was actually clenching my fists until they were white, and scream crying. It was the most incredible, intense and euphoric thing I've ever experienced. I came a few seconds after the anal climax. I few seconds after, I convulse on the bed for about 20 seconds while crying, still. Now I can't see his face as I've buried mine into his bed, but I imagine he's scared 😅. The convulsing stops, and I can still feel such intense euphoria down there still. He turns me over and checks if I'm ok, which I tiredly breathe, ""yes"". He grabs us both a towel and suggested I take a shower to relax, which I did. Quite thankful he was hospitable. 
The feeling stayed even after I had left his, which was very difficult to hide and keep quite about it on the bus.

I think I'll be keeping him on my favourites list 😅",gay
Gamers?,"I hope I dont sound lame but, does anyone one here play fortnite? ",gay
Long distance is killing me inside,"It's not like we ever fight - or I'd actually prefer fighting over this stalemate. We've been talking slightly less and less over time. I wish I just finish my school in lightspeed and start earning money, bring him to the states haha... But then the worst thing is that we being together means either him or me giving up career, because I have all my career here and he has all his in Korea. Our careers are not internationally transferrable.

&amp;#x200B;

Seriously whenever someone tells me ""OMG my b/gf is in CA and I'm in NY. what I'm gonna do"" I want to punch his/her face. Where do you think mine is at? Across the pond?",gay
FORT LAUDERDALE - MEN'S GUEST HOUSES! RECOMMENDATIONS PLEASE.,"I'm looking to go to Fort Lauderdale this coming February for my Birthday. I'm on Gaycities looking at different resorts and guest houses, trying to find out which ones are the most Sex positive because I really want to have a sexy good time while I'm there. Unfortunately, not a lot of guys are talking about hooking up or cruising on these reviews. So I was hoping some of you all can help me out. 

If you've been to Fort Lauderdale and had a good sexy time, let me know where you stayed so I can decide where I want to stay. 

&amp;#x200B;",gay
When someone online calls me a Gay Nerd.,,gay
Stop making things up,To many gay people out there: stop pretending like being gay is a huge party. It isn't . It's actually a gigantic NIGHTMARE to so so many of us. The bad sides of being gay FAR OUTWEIGH the benefits. Anyone who says otherwise is a liar.,gay
my kind of yard,,gay
"What's the appeal of a ""dad bod""","Okay so I'm a 19 year old gay man. I have what we know as a dad bod, not overweight, but not a twink either. What I am curious about is what the appeal of a dad bod is. Personally I like toned guys or twinks, but guys that I do talk to seem to be into the whole dad bod thing. I understand everyone has their types, but whats attractive about it?

&amp;#x200B;

With a twink, I can see the attraction of a small, pretty looking boy. On the opposite side I can also see the appeal of a bear, a big strong man with lots of body hair. So for those into dad bods, what is it that makes it attractive to you?",gay
Sex crazed,A friend just asked me how often me and my boyfriend have sex on average and i told them 3 or 4 times a day and a little more on weekend. First they thought i wasnt being serious then they acted like we were a couple of sex addicts and asked how my bf says hard for that many times. But that cant be that unusual for 2 guys under 25 yrs old right? I mean young guys being horny af all day is normal right?,gay
I didn't see that coming.,,gay
Several coming outs... and potential issue (Lawyers are welcome to comment),"1. This is order that I've come out: my brother -&gt; friends -&gt; parents -&gt; Some employers
2. Brother and Friends had no problem digesting it. Parents, had some problem ""internally"" initially (That means while they said OK, I could clearly see them suffer) but now they seem calm just like before.
   1. I just wonder. I've never discussed this issue with my parents ever since I told them the first time. Should I bring it up again, or leave it at that and let my parents suffer less? I think I will eventually start a family, though I might not adopt a child. Should I discuss my marriage with them? I just want to minimize their suffering. If me not telling them about my family plan and showing up in Newspaper or something with my husband is a worse choice, I want to tell them in advance.
   2. (Current 2nd year Law School) I've been open about my sexuality only to potential employers that mention equal opportunity or diversity in their careers page. But my current best offer is from a mid-sized firm which says nothing about either. I know that biglaws will never discriminate against gay associates but mid-law... Does that mean my sexuality might adversely impact my career in this firm if discovered?",gay
Uncut doesn’t do it for my partner,I have a 7 inch UC dick and it seems my bf doesn’t feel t when I top him. He says it’s because of my foreskin he doesn’t feel anything. I’ve asked about my size and he says it’s great for him but it’s mostly because of my forskin. Any advice on what to do in this situation? Trying to help my partner feel attracted to me again and get horny again,gay
Trying something new,"Not to much luck with girls so I decided to try with guys. I've been talking to this guy for a while and recently he brought up sex...I just wanted to know, is anal painful? Is there anything I should know if I'm gonna try it for the first time?",gay
Choosing long-term partners,"Hi All,

I am  completing research looking at relationships. I am in need of some  respondents who identify as homosexual. The survey takes less than 4  minutes and can be done on most devices. It would be really great to get  some gay/lesbian responses in order to represent homosexual population.  If you have a minute please check it out: [https://monash.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_b2A7LtwyMBbv821](https://monash.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_b2A7LtwyMBbv821)

&amp;#x200B;

Note: This is a re-post as I am still desperate for more responses. Thank you so much to everyone who has already completed this :) :)",gay
Please Help Me,"Please help me. I was an idiot, I cheated on the love of my life three times and I told him about it some time after they happened. We've been together for 11 months and he doesnt wanna give me one last chance. I know I fucked up but I wanna fix it, I really do. What do I do?",gay
Opinions on yaoi?,,gay
Where do gay characteristics come from?,"Most gay stereotypes are accurate. The voice, posture, personality, the way gay men dress, are all pretty consistent. The biggest one for me is voice, it's always a dead giveaway. I've long wondered why so many gay men share similar traits. Is it subconsciously conforming to and reinforcing the stereotypes, or is it a sort of shared part of our brains? Are we wired differently? I know we're chemically different from straight men, it's the reason we're gay to begin with, so could it be connected?",gay
I don't know anything about this,"I came to a realization that I wasn't straight about a year ago. But I can't figure out how to move forward with this. For example I want to try to enter the dating scene but at the same time it feels like I'm running blind. I have no idea about how to talk to men. 

In kinda closeted as well as only my roommate really knows.I feel like I have to tell my family and the rest of my friends before I can truly be at ease, but I am still concerned about being treated differently after i tell all

I dont know how to embrace the culture of this whole side of myself. I dont know where to start

Why does liking guys have to be so confusing",gay
Boyfriend wont come out.,"I've been with my boyfriend for nearly 18 months and living with him for 4. He's amazing, he's the hottest guy ive ever met and he's sweet and funny and a devil in the sack. But he still hasnt come out. I have to keep my stuff in his spare room, just to keep up apperances that we are only room mates, and when he goes out drinking with friends he flirts with and fools around with girls for the same reason. For almost the first year he said he just wasnt ready to come out which i was patient with then he said he would come out but he had too much going on in his life to do it just now and its been that way for 7 or 8 months now. Always saying he'll come out when thongs 'calm down' whatever that means. I really hope he can come out soon. He's so perfect except for the internalized homophobia. I really wanna help him with it but dont know how. Ive tried all the cliche lines about coming out",gay
New to Dating and Don't Know Where to Begin - Help!,"I’m a 23/M/UK and have never had a relationship. I badly want to change that but have NO idea where to even start dating. Or more importantly, finding people to go on a date with.

I’m an introvert, so meeting people in a club is a no go! And there is no one in my extended friend circle, so I’m going to have to go looking elsewhere. But there are so many dating services and I have no idea what to use / who to trust.

I’d be interested to hear what you think, particularly if you’re in the UK (where I’m from).",gay
Gayming!,"Hi, first off I'm really new to reddit. I was just wondering if there were people who would want to play League of Legends with me haha. I just came out to my mom 40 minutes ago and I feel like a brand new person! I'm \[M20\] currently GoldV my IGN is: AluxSon",gay
Advice?,"So, I met this really nice dude that moved to my area recently off of grindr and we've had a fwb thing for the past couple weeks. I have no problem hanging out with this dude occasionally but he has been insisting on hanging out every day or whenever I'm not busy with work and school. I can't stand clingy people and I don't know how to tell this man to give me space without sounding like a dick. I also think he might have feelings for me which I've already told him I'm not interested in dating at least for awhile. ",gay
What we're all made of,,gay
What percentage of male teenagers are gay?,,gay
Have you ever felt lonley?,"Do you think, gays are more picky? Have you ever felt lonley cause you can't find Boyfriend/girlfriend? ",gay
Please please help,My boyfriend and I have been dating for 11 months. He cheated on me a couple months ago but I forgave him. Today we had a fight and it was brought up that he cheated on me two more times a month after the first. What should I do? I don’t even know why I’m asking. I love him so much. I can’t trust him anymore though. He says he’ll fix it and everything but it all just sounds like bullshit,gay
How to come out when you already have a boyfriend?,"Hi,

So I'm a pretty young teen and I've known I'm gay for a while now but I just got my first boyfriend. Because of this, I don't think I can hide it from my mom for much longer so I think it's time to come out and I was wondering if I could get some advice on how to do it? I'm kind of panicking right now because he's due to introduce himself to my mom tomorrow and I really don't know what to do, please help. Thanks.",gay
"Slightly to the right, I'm Batman! NSFW",,gay
Kinsey Test Results 😂😂😂,,gay
Just my luck,"Well i don’t consider my self gay. This morning i went out with a friend (female). She left me with a severe case of blue balls. Well i was horny &amp; I started watching porn. Than gay porn. Gay porn turn me on so much I decided to give it a tried. So i make a profile. I started talking to this guy we sent each other pics no face pics tho. I was like “fuck it he just going to suck my dick and thats it” last pic he sent I instantly thought about this gay guy from hs. But i was lime no what are the odds. So I showed up to his house and yes it was him. I was like “fuck” and he was like “fuck” . He knows alot of people i know from hs, damn it i tried to date her best friend back in high school. He tried to play it cool like he didn’t remember me but he did. I tried to tell him if he could please keep it on the low and he was like yeah dont worry about it. But yeah just my luck. Tried to make happen First gay experience. With someone i fucken know. ",gay
Gay?,Maybe I am gay?,gay
I need some [gay] advice,"I’ve known this guy for about 1 year, but I’ve only started talking to him since the beginning of the school year. Not long ago, I realized that I like him. I had been getting lost in his eyes way too much and I found his voice extremely calming (I was really stressed in that moment). We got kind of in an emotional talk and he said that I am a nice person and that he loves me (I don’t think of it in THAT way, obviously). 

My problem is: I don’t know if he is gay or anything, but he has never dated anyone, so should I try to ask him out on a date? I think he is just too nice and I don’t want to ruin the friendship if asking him out fails",gay
[Throwaway] Bf has cheated for 7 months. (Continued in post),"On mobile, so forgive formatting plz. 
--
Also this is a throwaway but I'm bookmarking the page so I can come back and see the replies. I'll also view this post on my main account so please feel free to comment as I'll see your replies regardless of when you post them. 
--

I've been seeing the most sweet, adorable cinnamon roll for the last 7 months, but 3 days ago I found out that he'd been cheating on me the entire time with more guys than I can remember. 

Seriously, there were SO many on his phone.... 


He'd sent pictures, videos, whatsapp voice notes, (Including discreet ones in public places) and had been flirting hard with over 100 or so guys. (And plenty of calls) 
Fingering himself, smirking, doing the peace sign, jerking off including on a bus etc, bondage.... And way more stuff I don't wanna think about. 
It's breaking me just thinking about it.

Nothing of him with anyone else though. 
(Although the conversations showed that he'd been with a few of them.)

I sent myself copies of everything I could find and saved it all to a discreet folder online. 
Half out of jealousy because none kf this was sent to me and half so I'd have proof etc. 

Pics of similar lookalikes of him below. 
(1st one's head on 2nd one's body basically) 


I went on his Grindr and changed his profile pic to a sad adsfmovie style character that strangely enough he had saved in his album, his username to Cheated(caught) and his bio to something like:
Don't contact me,
I've cheated on my 7 month bf with over 100 guys and got caught. I feel sick with myself and don't want any contact with anyone. 

I did something similar explaining that he'd been cheating to what seemed like his ""favourite"" guy via WhatsApp.


So I confronted him with it all. I told him that I had plenty of proof because I'd screenshoted it all and taken screen recordings and sent everything to my phone. (Tons of storage space left on my phone.)


I told him to choose from me 
(love, relationship etc) 

or them (sex, o.n.s, flirting, pics, vids, calls, etc) 

and he said on the afternoon,evening,night,the next morning, that he ""didn't know"" but the next evening around 8pm,
after me holding him, kissing him and reassuring him and him crying all day and ""hating himself"" and trying to hurt himself he told them all he cheated and wouldn't be talking to them again, then blocking them, then deleting the conversations, and deleting all of the pics and vids on his phone.....all 100 etc of them. 

I told him that if I ever find him cheating without him openly admitting it to me before I find out then there won't be any more chances. 

And even if he does cheat again and admits it and blocks etc that'll be his last chance. 


(To note: I never go through a partner's phone but this was the second time I'd seen Grindr on his home screen after him promising to delete it the first time I caught him with it) 

At this point some of you may be thinking that he's a slut, and I'm ugly. 
I'm saying ""you may be thinking"", not you are btw. 

Incase that's what you're thinking a pic of a lookalike of me will be in the comments below. 
(Yes, I'm being realistic and not pretending to be hotter than I am) 

The worst thing is that after our first date, we went to a gay sauna and well...  Yeah. 
Then after a mutual great time, 
(I'm experienced enough to know) 
the next time I saw him he cried and told me that he was scared of sexual contact because he'd been raped and beaten a few times in the past and had trauma, was too tight etc. 
The whole 7 months he'd been avoiding sex etc and sent me maybe 2 ""selfies.""
I accepted that and was understanding and kind about it, holding him when he cried, kissing his forehead etc...
We tried a few times, but the interest wasn't there on his side. 

....now I know why... Extreme guilt etc....

He'd always show tons of interest in me, constantly messaging and calling me, taking interest in everything and just genuinely having an awesome relationship..... Minus the sex etc. 

I need a way of getting all of this frustration out (in addition to toys) and reddit seems like a good place to do it. 
I'm expecting trolls because ofc but I'm also hoping for some real advice etc.


EDIT: The comment is being blocked below so here:
(they're bitly links)

His lookalikes:
This face 2NxXhQa
On this body 2QUw2gH

My lookalikes:
2QTNzFG",gay
“Hip” Churches Are Really Good At Hiding Their True Beliefs About LGBTQ People,,gay
[Wojnarowski] ESPN Sources: Another team pursuing a Jimmy Butler trade with Minnesota: Cleveland. Cavs owner Dan Gilbert was seen talking privately with Glen Taylor at NBA Board of Governors meeting on Friday. Both owners played a part in negotiating the Love-Wiggins deal.,,gay
The Truth Behind Gay Guys Sitting In Weird Ways,,gay
Good love songs?,"I really like music. I enjoy sharing it and having it shared with me. Whenever I've been in a relationship, I've always shared a lot of music with my partner. Now, I've been talking with this guy for a while, and we both like each other, but we're taking it slowly for now, since we want to know each other before doing anything.

The thing is, we have a date planned for a few weeks from now. Since we're going to go to watch a movie after class, I'm thinking about telling him to give me his backpack to put it with mine, and when he's not looking I'll put a pendrive with some love songs in it as a way to ask him to be my boyfriend. But most of the love songs I know are about straights (ugh), since they always include words like she, her, etc.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Update: I've ended up doing it before the day I had planned to do it. I have a boyfriend now.",gay
Need some friends to talk .,Hi . Iam here to talk with other in this community . So iam 17 years old Algerian . I play lol and eu4 . And i like geography . Art . Architecture and other stuff,gay
"I seek for council, oh wise and illustrious gay community.","So he's 19, and I'm 29. We've been on a few dates and they've gone well. He seems pretty mature for his age, but, regardless, he's 10 years younger than me. Has anyone else been here? I feel kinda like a weirdo cuz he's so young :[ I need advice please",gay
Time For Love with sexy Scottish accent,[Homophobia In 2018 | Time For Love](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=anD9ZrMJT8k),gay
Poppers to become as illegal as heroin in Australia - sign the petition in the comments,,gay
Reading suggestions?,,gay
"How do you make friends, aside from the apps?","I feel like there's something missing in my life like actual relationships with people. 

I'm 17 and I don't have friends although I have about 3 different people I hang out with at school but it's just because the school is forcing us. When I go home or when we have holidays we don't have any contact at all so that's why I would say that I don't have friends. I feel like we're using each other only because we don't have other friends so in order to not be alone, an outcast or even a target we hang out during breaks. When I go home from school I'm basically all alone and by myself. I like them but they seem like boring people so it doesn't really bother me that we only talk to each other when we're in school. Plus they drink and sometimes smoke which is something I don't do and don't want to. 

But the way I saw people were making friends outside of school was : there were people in other classes who knew people outside of school so some people in my class got friends with those people who would eventually meet up as a group and be friends with those new people. 

one of those people who has friends outside of school is actually someone I hang out with during breaks who always tells me like crazy and exciting new stories and I get really really depressed because she already had her first time and I didn't have it yet and she has a boyfriend and I wouldn't mind finding a boyfriend too :/ She's even 1 year younger than me. 

But nobody knows that I'm Gay and we don't even have gay people at our school. And even joining an lgbt club wouldn't be something I would feel comfortable with (we don't have one at our school but I'm sure in our city) but you know it's like outing yourself and exposing yourself and I live in a small town so everybody knows everyone here. 

But this girl also tells me a lot about her problems she has with her boyfriend and with her friends and she drinks and even sometimes smokes or goes partying - you can see it affecting her grades a little - which is something I don't really want to. I just want to have intelligent and mature friends.

I'm in 10th grade and I'll graduate next year. In the US you could say I'm a senior. So I'm not going to stay with those idiots for long, plus I'm moving to a big city next year so making friends here in my small town is not really an option. 

I tried apps but noticed I'm attracted to older guys (like early, mid 30s max.) and I guess some people seem like genuine people but you'll never know what that person is really like. There's a big city (with skyscrapers and all) like an 1 hour away from here so I couldn't potentially meet up with someone but the age difference would make me soo uncomfortable but at the same time most of them I find really really cute. I'm not interested in a toxic relationship even though it's inevitable and although I would consider myself a little independent, I still am dependent on my mom (because of money etc. , I don't have a job and I think I've never even had a job but the autumn holidays are coming up and I'm actively looking for one right now) but I can already manage to do a lot of things by myself. 

My second problem is that I live in Germany and I really love English (I wish English could be my best friend haha) but I'm too insecure about to talk with someone in English. When I'm traveling to that big city for example to visit my many aunts, I hear some people on the street speaking English and I get really intimidated and nervous. People here in Germany obviously speak only German here but in the bigger city's there's a lot of international people because of university and jobs in finance and business etc.

I've chatted with one person in particular on a dating site who was 31 years old and is a PhD student in economics. He's from Slovenia and moved to the U.S. and then lived for 2 years in London and now he's here and he has the cutest smile in the whole world :) His profile said that he is looking for friends, dates and maybe a relationship. Although he's 31 he doesn't look like 31 maybe you could say mid or late 20s. It's probably because his nickname has a ""h2o"" in it and he's said it's a reminder for him to drink enough water ;) 

Long story short after couple of days he lost interest because he said I was a little too young for him but he was always very sweet and kind. But we somehow managed to chat for a month and a half until he said that we've chatted enough and he kindly suggested that I should try to find people who were closer to my age, he told me this 2 or 3 times in a polite way and I just didn't listen and now I feel very bad for bothering him for so long. 

We have never met in person but in the beginning he said ""Although you're a little too young for me, I would love to go on a date with you"" where in my head I was ironically like "" yeah sure.."" but after sometime the tables had turned and now I was the one who wanted a date but he already had changed his mind because I was ""soo young"" which I can understand, but we talked about lots of just normal stuff like movies and music. His favorite movie is ""Amelié"". And his favorite band are The roots. 

But now when I think about it, going with someone to a public place where people are and people look at you (that's what I meant earlier with people see you and you're basically exposing yourself) and speaking in a completely foreign language plus I've never ever been on a date, makes me feel crazy anxious. 

I'm black and he's white which he didn't mind because never ever even mentioned my skin color once which was very sweet too, he just saw me as a normal human being. But combined with the age difference we would really stand out from the crowd which would make me feel exposed and being a closeted teen makes me feel feel even more anxious but I'm now I'm really glad he said no, I think I couldn't handle the guilt and the shame I would have felt after going on that date. 

Although I am almost finally over him. I can't forget him. There's not a day that goes by where I'm not thinking about him. I saw him first and foremost as a friend who listened and was very kind. I guess the reason I can't forget him was that this was the only genuine human connection I had made in a loong time.

I unfortunately can't use apps. For a number of reasons, I'm not 18 yet, I'm in the closet and my Mom doesn't even know that I'm Gay and she said in the past that she hates gay people and wants them all to die. I don't really want her to play a big part in my adult life not just because of that, when we go shopping or whatever we always get in fights and I then get really sad because the only person I'm forced to hang out with is my Mom.
I sometimes can't even look in her eyes because all of this. 

If anyone has some words of wisdom to give, I would very much appreciate it. ",gay
BLOG (Please be kind),"[https://lifefromthecloset.wordpress.com](https://lifefromthecloset.wordpress.com)

Hello peeps. This is a blog I discovered from a friend's classmate in law school. Read and please be kind. It's a wonderful blog with amazing stories.",gay
Something greeted me after my long road trip today when I got back home (Sorry about the quality and raindrops),,gay
"Surprise surprise, the other gay kid in math doesn’t sit right either :P",,gay
Welcome to the gay world,"I'm known for being a fountain if info, and it always surprises me how little my friends know about the gay life. 

When my girl friends start asking questions or we're talking about sex/ our sex lives,  I like to through in that gay guys try to cum at the same time.  They are always blown away by that idea (probably cause straight guys don't care). Have you all had similar experiences?  What are some of your gay life fun facts that shock the hets?

(Also when the word 'breeder' slips out during me ranting I have to explain what that means)",gay
For 18 year old and older men .,"Hey men I want to as you a serious questions about relationships with guys. 
 
Question#1 is would you consider dating a bisexual guy based on his personality and loyalty??

How were your experiences with dating guys in general ? Private message me if you prefer to tell me about the experience instead of in the comment section. 

Do you guys acknowledge that bisexual men exist? 
",gay
I’m Falling Hard,"There’s a guy on a dating app that messaged me earlier this week. We started talking and then I found out he’s located overseas. I proceeded to say I wish him luck with finding the one. He immediately said, “you’re the one I want”. 

My heart went up into my throat. I have never been complimented before in my life by someone outside of family. We started chatting heavily. We sent selfies to each other and voice notes and I fell deeper and deeper. I did a test to make sure he’s the real deal. He’s 1.5 years older than me.

We hit it off so quickly. I fell into tears because I’ve never had someone think I’m even remotely appealing. He’s sent me voice notes in other languages that had beautiful meanings. He’s very attractive, incredibly smart and kinder than any person I’ve ever met. I don’t think it’s a set up.

That being said, I enjoy every second talking with him and it makes me feel special because he’s usually the one to initiate the conversations. My stomach has been in knots and butterflies all week.

He’s told me that if we hit it off as well as we are for a couple months, he would consider visiting or planning to move to the US. I don’t want to jump the gun at all, so I’m glad that he’s talking down the road. 

I am enjoying his company. I’ve been told things like I am an abortion survivor, I look like I have Down syndrome, etc, etc. And then he swooped in and saved me from emotional failure.

We have such wonderful chats as well 😍 . 

I don’t want to set myself up for being hurt (though this guy has no mean bone in his body)

Any tips you could give me?

I hope you all have a safe night! ",gay
"Getting mixed signals from a guy who’s taken and now I’m conflicted...fair warning, it’s a long post.","There’s this guy (I’ll name him James) that I developed a crush on ever since the first day of grad school. My heart leap and I felt like I could be with this guy for the rest of my life.

When I found out that he was taken and in a LDR (long-distance relationship) I felt a bit sad. However, when we first made eye contact in class, I felt like we had a moment. I smiled and him and he smiled back. I’m not sure if he’s just being nice and all.

We started talking to each other, as well as texting each other every day until around midnight or 1:00am about random stuff or about our current relationships (at the time I was on a break with my then boyfriend, but now I’m single). We connected starting there because I was also in a LDR and we felt that our boyfriends were giving us double standards (for what they wanted from us/what they don’t want from us). Long story short with this part, I felt like he was flirting with me because of the way he texted me. He sometimes asked me what I was doing, or if my roommate went home for the weekend. He also asked me if I want to go out and get food at times. I’m not sure if I’m reading into it too much.

Next, we shared how he’s a bottom and I’m a vers top and all he replied to me was 🤭🤧 (which I don’t get at ALL!). Is he just leading me on? I also told him that he was a very good-looking guy, to which he replied “you do know I have a boyfriend RN lol”. I replied back saying “yeah I know, but I just wanted to let you know and I wanted to be honest with you so you’re aware. I’m not that asshole to get in the middle of other people’s relationships”.

From then on, I still felt like he was giving me mixed signals because some of his texts still looked like he was flirting with me/wanted to hang out if I was free. We also got into the habit of texting each other “good night” too. Idk maybe I’m just reading into things...

I was going to ask him if he really IS aware of my feelings for him today, but after getting to know him more, I guess I’ll just stick to being friends with him (hopefully become best friends as time progresses). He wanted to focus on school right now (we’re actually in the same class), and he felt like he actually wanted his boyfriend physically here, instead of on the East Coast. His boyfriend was always on/off busy and free, so while it was busy season, he didn’t give James any attention at all.

Tl;dr idk what to do with someone who’s giving me mixed signals and has a boyfriend. Should I confess my feelings to him just so I’m honest with myself and show him I care about him?",gay
Any one here who is a girl?,I'm seeing lots of men posting but hardly any women. I need to talk to women. Are you here?,gay
NYC help!!!,Just lost someone very dear to me. Not sure what to do with my life and I've lost everything. Thinking about moving to NYC but I've got nowhere to go but I've bartended for 15 years and worked as a personal assistant.  Not trying to be in the streets. Is there anyone who can offer suggestions. ,gay
So we talked a little bit and I feel better,"The guy I was talking to and that was still using Grindr and I talked. I asked him what we were doing or what he thought we were doing and he told me that he thought this was a friends with benefits kind of situation. I didn’t mind it because we don’t know each other that long. So I told him that now that we’re getting to know each other better I don’t want to do that because my feelings are starting to get involved and he said he won’t mind a relationship with me. I told him I just don’t want to jump into it but now I want to date with the mindset of getting into a relationship, which he agreed to. So then I set some boundaries and expectations for us while dating, monogamy, respect and honest and open conversations. And he set some of his own, like not being touched when not in the mood, and pay attention to his body language more. I agreed to that. I hope he doesn’t think I’m in love with him or anything like that because I honestly am not. I am starting to catch feelings for him which is why I want to see if it’s going anywhere. I’m just happy to finally get it off my mind because it was really bothering me, and either way it went I would have been cool with it but I’m really glad it went that way. Do you guys think that was a good approach or is there something else that needs to be done?",gay
Anyone else ?,Do you just get that feeling when you’ve been in love before and it doesn’t work out and you try looking for it and it doesn’t come and you just feel empty and useless. Anyone else ? Just me ?,gay
Looking for boyfriend and friend,"I'm looking for a handsome attractive single guy who is **caring**, **loving**, **trust worthy**, **honest**, able to do **video chat** with me, able to **visit me**, and be with till the end of my life. Must be in the age of **20s** \- mid **30s** and in **USA** or **Wisconsin**. PM me if you're the one for me. If you have **discord**, pm me and I'll send your friend request.

Friend are welcome. Hope I can trust you after getting to know you more because I really don't trust lots of people since they show there true color to me. If you have discord, pm me again and I'll send you friend request.",gay
Am i gay?,"Recently i have been feeling strange urges. I have been entering into gay chatrooms to talk with random strangers, and often we exchange skype names and fap in videochat. What arouses me of this exchanges is not the other persons body, but the fact that we is watching me fap and that he is aroused by that. 

Some i also send nude pictures of my self to those strangers. Again, i get aroused by knowing those pictures arouses others.

Now, i have xonsidered myself to be straight my whole life, but now i am doubting.

What do you guys think?",gay
"This is gay for “thank you so much, you really shouldn’t have”",,gay
#allgays #justmen,,gay
look at my username lol i'm dumb i need to stop saying lol,"If you're reading this, hey!  I just joined reddit for shits and giggles and decided to share my life with the community.  I hope you enjoy the ride of my relationships (and lack thereof).

About me: I'm an 18 year old college student studying at a university in New Jersey.  Personality wise, I consider myself smart, analytical, both extroverted and introverted, open-minded, and funny af.  Physically (without sounding like a prick), I consider myself handsome and in shape.  With that being said, I'm often the ""fuck"" in marry, fuck, kill and I get a decent amount of swipes on tinder.

Realizing my sexuality around 17, I'm bi-curious, that is I'm positive I'm attracted to men but unsure if I like women sexually.  Also, I'm a guy myself, which I just didn't mention yet.  So, I tend to go for men only but still leave women as viable options for relationships.  My close friends know about my sexual identity and only one of my family members does too, for the most part I'm masculine.

So yeah, this was more of an formal introduction for follow-up posts but if I sound relatable you should definitely stay updated to my posts.  I genuinely have no clue how reddit works but I'm sure that's definitely an option lol.  I know this was kinda boring like why would you want to stick around I feel that.   I look forward to chatting with people and gaining insight from different perspectives of the gay community.",gay
Can we talk about these tribes?,"I think it is one of the things I dislike most about the community. Why does it seem like so many people are eager to jump on the band wagon and cram people in boxes? Like, I'm me first, being gay is just a part of that. I do what I like to do regardless of my sexuality or ""tribe."" 

It seems like when people in the lgbt community find out I'm gay, especially other gays, they start appending descriptions. (I'm not in the closet, but by and large my sexuality is irrelevant so I don't bring it up.) ""Oh he's a masc discrete twinky nerd."" How about rather than use tribes and stereotypes we promote individuality? How about instead of encouraging people to try and shoehorn themselves into a group based on appearance and other shallow traits we promote diversity? 

The first step is recognizing whether or not being you are being yourself. I was so unhappy when I was younger because everyone always said I was a twink and pushed me to fit the stereotype. I tried to convince myself that I enjoyed being feminine and bubbly, that's what was expected after all. One day I had enough and started pursuing my own interests. I'm now a happy me. If you are in a similar spot then learn from my mistakes, people who try to get you to fit the mold are not worth your time.",gay
Info about gay sex,"I'm a 20yo male, never had sex with another man all the way. I'm trying to look for info about this,  beyond ""be yourself', ""don't forget protection"" and ""talk with each other to establish boundaries bla bla bla"". I'd like *technical* counseling.

Like is it better to take a shower just before ? What about butt-cleaning, do I have to purchase a butt-cleaning device or if I just go poop it'll be clean enough ? What about hair : is it better completely shaved, just a little trimmed, or bushy and free (I guess it depends on the partner) ? What are the precautions to take before unprotected buttsex, beside being sure  both participant are clean ? What about equipment and gear (lube) ?

What are your experience, what do you think is indispensable to know about gay sex on a technical level ?",gay
When you unknowlingly become an offender *trigger warning*,"Hello world, 

I have been Google phrases like ""I made a friend really uncomfortable after drinking last night"" or ""How do apologize to a friend who you think you might have sexually assaulted,"" was getting no results, and I thought I would turn to this community. 

To give a little bit of context, I am a  gay man in his mid-20s happily in a relationship. My boyfriend and I are currently in a long-distance relationship, so we have kept it open. This year, I have quickly become friends with a new coworker, who identifies as straight, who I find very attractive. So there is definitely some flirting going on in my part, and he good-naturedly plays along. But recently, I am thinking that he may have feelings for me too.. We watch a lot of TV shows together,  he sometimes sort of snuggles right up next to me, and it makes me feel... confused. 

Yesterday, we had quite a lot to drink and smoked (weed) a bit as well. We were watching a TV show, he snuggled up again, and I started touching him. Never in the genital area, but thighs, chest, and generally places that would be considered sexual. He never said no, and seemed to even enjoy it a bit, but after the TV show finished, he got up and left. I wanted to hang out with him a bit more, so I asked him to stay, but he left.

And this is where my drunken / high self crossed a line.

I basically went over to his place (we get accommodation from work), knocked on the door, and asked if we can hang out some more, and he said no and shut his door. This morning, I found that he's deleted me off on social media and is not returning my texts.. 

How do I go about this situation!? I feel horrible, and would love some advice from you folks. I don't know if reddit is the sort of place where I can get support like this, but I thought I'd try it out. Thank you! ",gay
Friends?,29 m here looking for friends/texting. Must be 18+ please ,gay
Is philipp plein the designer gay?,,gay
"Gay men of reddit, do you ever fight your spouses or boyfriends?","There’s much much less social stigma about men hitting men and women hitting women than there is for a man to hit a woman. It’s. Also usually socially acceptable for women to hit men. But same sex duos are really the only times it’s socially acceptable for people to fight. So I was wondering if two people sexually attracted to each other ever fight and don’t report it. 

I have heard of many relationships where women abuse men but the guy is big and strong and doesn’t want to hit her back. And obviously, most abusive relationships we hear about are when a bigger man beats up a smaller woman.

But for gay people of similar size, have you ever had a physical fight with your significant other, and just not reported it because you didn’t feel you were in any long term danger?

I know plenty of guys who have been in fist fights with their friends or family members before and still been friends and caring for each other the next day. Not in an abusive fight where one person is constantly dominating the other and all that. Those are ALWAYS unhealthy and I’m not condoning one of those. Just, have any of you gays ever just dukes it out with a boyfriend and made up the next day.

I just find it interesting to think about to me.

**I mean CONSENSUAL FIGHTING**

Once again I’m not trying to normalize or give anyone in an abusive relationship hope that what they go through is normal, abuse is always bad, physical fighting is not. Unless both of you want to fight and are fighting on equal grounds, IT IS ABUSE. Please don’t stay in a relationship where you are abused regardless of if you are the same sex, the person hitting you is weaker than you, etc.",gay
Should your first time be special?,"I want to use a dating site but I’ve never you know and I’m still 16. Im not sure if I’m just having anxiety over nothing or if i have a good reason to nervous.

Im also worrying about the effects long and short term. My school has a vary poor sex education that is straight based.",gay
Taking a stand,"So me and my group of friends just recently started high school and we’ve already gotten bullied a lot for being gay, so we’re all going to start “Pride day Friday” and we’re going to wear pride things every Friday to show the other kids that they aren’t alone, and to show which people are safe to talk to (because the chances of a homophobic person participating is unlikely) and tomorrow is the first day we’re doing it! 

UPDATE: so when I walked into school this morning the principal stopped me and brought me to the office and asked me why I was wearing my shirt, so I told him that I won’t let people be harassed anymore for something they can’t change, and he shrugs and nods and says, “well I don’t know if I can help with that, maybe you could find a teacher or staff member to help” and I say, “I don’t need help, but if I did why couldn’t you help?” And he says “it’s too childish for me to handle, I’m not wasting my time on elementary school level problems when people are in and out my door for fighting.” And I tell him “well maybe one day you’ll look back understand why I did this” and he says “No no no, you gotta change, you can’t be walking around with that outfit, it’s inappropriate” and I give him a confused look, because it’s literally just a t-shirt tie dyed with the colors of the rainbow, no holes, no words, just rainbow colors with a heart in the center. He says “you know what I don’t have time for this get where you need to be” 

Also a solid 30 ish people participated so that wasn’t very good, but the people who did went all out and drew flags on their arms and chanted during lunch (completely unplanned) it went fairly well besides the kids who are very stubborn giving looks of disgust. ",gay
Low sex drive due to constant rejection,"Hey all,

I'm a 34yo gay dude who's basically looking for everything I could expect in the love and sex department. I've never been in a relationship, and have only fooled around with a guy a couple times, with no penetration, meaning I'm a virgin.

I'm ready to let that go, and because of my own needs, I realize I don't want to put much pressure on how things turn out. I'm open to a hookup, friends, fwb, and of course a real connection and possible relationship. But right now, I need to get laid, and have some good sex! It's about time!

&amp;#x200B;

But

My whole life I've felt a lot of rejection from the gay community. I've always been a bigger bear (300plus lbs) and recently I've lost weight for my own sake. 

I realize there is an entire community of bears, except one problem: I'm not attracted to bears. 

So I've had this quagmire where I'm attracted to twinks, otters, even some cubs, and I get a lot of rejection.

Since realizing I need to get my shit together, I've been amping up my game the last year. I've had a lot of straight crushes in my life, because it's so damn easy to turn back to a fantasy when reality isn't stacking up the way I'd like it to.

So I've been on the apps (grindr/scruff) off and on for a few years, but have never actually hooked up with anyone.

I used to get a lot more hits in the past, guys woofing at me, telling me a complement. 

I've been on the dating sites too, okcupid and plentyoffish. What's funny, is I'm actually a more connection-minded guy, and on those sites I get nothing. Nothing. Rarely has a person ever written me, or written me back. Tons of rejection where matches started disappearing on okcupid.

In real life, at my job I work with a bunch of straight boys at a pizzeria job and that doesn't help matters. 

I've been afraid to go to the clubs and bars for years, because of rejection issues in the past and feeling shy. Now I'm more ready to approach the idea, because I secretly hate all these apps. I want something real in real life.

In any case, I've been staying on Scruff and now I'm getting next to nothing. Rarely is a person even viewing my profile or woofing at me. My pictures are looking great.

I even recently decided to make a shirtless pic my profile picture, to show off my fur and finally own and accept my body as it is. Not a single complement.

I mean, I do get older guys occassionally - but I'm not into that. 

&amp;#x200B;

So, where I stand is this:

I've experienced a lot of rejection in my life, mostly online and some in real life. 

I am experiencing even more rejection now on the apps and dating sites, and I think I'm forming negative beliefs about myself to process it.

My sex drive is taking a nose dive and I'm getting depressed.

&amp;#x200B;

Like, what would make me SO HAPPY?

To have a guy I'm into write me back! To have a guy I'm into woof at me, or tell me I'm hot, or he likes my fur, or he thinks I'm cute.

&amp;#x200B;

Like what gives? I know I'm cute and I'm handsome. And I know I have flaws. I've felt negatively about my body my whole life but you can't seriously be telling me THAT alone is causing all these men to be repelled or not attracted to me?? 

Certainly everyone has something about their body they feel self conscious of (mine are my man-boobs and my belly)

Certainly there's gotta be men out there who want me for me, and want my body too, that I'm also attracted to.

God, I'm not so picky as to exclusively only want to screw a guy who looks like Joseph-Gordon-Levitt or Jake Gyllenhaal. BUT those are my types, and I most definitely have a range. I just like guys smaller, skinner. 

I don't want to apologize anymore about this. I LIKE WHAT I LIKE. 

And I'm not sorry, but I can't force myself to be into other bears. I tried that once and it didn't work. If anything, it really backfires because my long-term goal IS to lose the majority of my weight, which would make me unattractive to the bear community. (because then I will become a cub/otter) Like there's a scene in the bear community where they want each other to be big and get bigger, and that REALLY turns me off.

&amp;#x200B;

Any thoughts guys?

Thanks.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gay
When you suck dick for the first time,,gay
All my friends are homophobes,"Everyday, I’m made fun of to much, to the point where I start to feel bad about myself. I need help on how to avoid them, I see them every day, even if I’m away from them. ",gay
Forking,,gay
"Dilemma of mine, I'm gay and my mom is very religious, Help?!"," Dilemma of mine, I'm gay and my mom is very religious, Help?!

I  was forced to come out. I put a romance novel in my downloads and she  saw that I had a lot more. Being in pressure in the moment, i told her i  was gay. She then proceeded to shove me and told me that if she had to  choose between me and god she would choose god. Fast forward a few  months later, im pretending to be christian, Im pretending to be a  normal person, putting on a face of"" Ive repented"". At this point im  just waiting till i have a chance to bring my inner hoe out but, still,  it hurts.

Advice?",gay
